1 A
MYRTIS.
Lo! darkest hours wring forth the hidden might
That hath lain bedded in the secret soul,
A treasure all undream'd of: as the night
Calls forth the harmonies of streams that roll
Unheard by day.
Mrs. Hemans
.
Twilight
gathered heavily over the city of the
Csars. Lights began here and there to glimmer
from the patrician palaces, and along the banks of
the Tiber. Rome, which Augustus boasted to have
left built of marble, had lost none of its
magnificence
under Adrian and the Antonines. Effeminacy
and corruption were sapping the foundations of the
empire, though the virtue of the last of the Antonines
still arrested or disguised the presages of its doom.
In the gorgeous apartment of a palace a woman
was seated, evidently of high rank, and surrounded
by the appliances of luxury. Her arm rested on a
small, oval table, richly inlaid with ivory and gold,
while her jeweled hand partly shaded her features,
as if to conceal some emotion, in which Roman pride
contended with woman's nature.
Her eye was intently fixed on a young man who
stood near her, arrayed as if for a journey. The
folds of the toga fell gracefully around his lofty form,
and his noble countenance was marked by thought
even to sadness. He appeared to wait her words,
which at length were slowly uttered.
Go, then, my son, since the gods and the emperor
have thus willed it. Would that this trial might have
been spared my widowed heart. Yet go, for the hour
of thy departure hath come.
The young Roman knelt at her feet, and pressed
her hands to his lips. His voice was scarcely
audible
as he besought her blessing.
The gods of thy fathers will not forget thee. My
vows shall keep thee ever in their mind. Already
have the salted cake, and a pure lamb crowned with
flowers, been offered, with costly libations, for thy
sake. I have vowed to Apollo a rich temple if thou
return in safety. Daily shall the Lares and Penates
be invoked for thy protection in a far clime.
Then, determining not to weaken his purpose by
vain regrets, she arose, and threw all the strength of
a loving soul into the farewell smile. There was no
tear in her eye, and she trembled not at the last, long
embrace.
He departed. She listened to the echo of his
footsteps
,
and gazed to catch the last glimpse of him and
of his train. Then burst forth the sorrows of the
mother. She dismissed her attendants, that no eye
might witness her grief. Only the surrounding
statues
beheld her with their marble brows. But the
frown of warriors or philosophers from their
pedestals
reproved her in vain. She remembered only that
she was a mother, and desolate.
Day was high in the heavens ere she arose from
the couch, where, in the anguish of parting, she had
thrown herself, burying her face deep among the
pillows. The Emperor Marcus Aurelius was
announced
,
A 2
and she started from her wildering trance
as one ashamed. Hastily she arranged her
disordered
robes, and washed the traces of the burning
sorrow from cheek and brow.
Calm, serene, and like a habitant of a higher sphere,
Marcus Aurelius entered. That philosophic
emperor
,
who, according to the creed of the Stoics, was
never known to change countenance, either for grief
or joy, regarded her steadfastly, yet without reproach.
He saw how deeply flowed the inward tide of
emotion
,
and seemed to await its ebbing ere he spoke.
Thy son hath gone forth on a noble mission, to
gain the wisdom and philosophy of Greece. He is
an honor to thee, and to the manes of his father.
Deeply wouldst thou hereafter have reproached
thyself
hadst thou withheld him by the weakness of love
from this discipline, so essential to a finished
education
.
Had I not beheld in lius Marcellus so much
of noble promise, I had not prompted him to the
effort
,
nor thee to this sacrifice.
Sire! emperor! Thou art ever good, and thy
wisdom shall be our guide. From earliest
remembrance
thine affection was my chief treasure. In
widowhood, thou hast been a solace and protector;
to my only child, more than a father.
Tender recollections stirred anew the fountain of
grief. Her compressed lips quivered, and she burst
into a passion of tears.
Annia Cornificia, my sister, pray unto the gods.
Offer sacrifices for thine absent son; and for me
also, not so happy as to be bound, like him, to the
sweet fields of heaven-born philosophy, but to the
banks of the Danube, to quell an insurrection of the
barbarians. Rest and contemplation are most sweet;
yet I shrink not from privation or peril. Comfort
Faustina in my absence, and throw the mantle of thy
tender virtues over the boy Commodus. Let thy
wounded, maternal love expand itself on him. So
shall it find healing, and bear fruit worthy of the
gods.
The ardent woman felt the channel of her grief
divided. The all-absorbing image of her absent and
only child faded for a time in sympathy for her
imperial
brother, and she fondly expressed her
apprehensions
for his safety.
The life of man, he said, is but a vapor. What
folly to seek to preserve that, and neglect those
duties
in which alone is its happiness. If I return no
more, my sister, shed not such passionate tears for
me as thou hast shed at the parting of thy son; for
when this little voyage is over, and we reach the
shore, shall we not get calmly out of the ship into
another life? Are not the gods there? His voice
deepened as he added:
Annia Cornificia, my sister, if it be my lot to die
among the barbarians, I commend unto thee the
Prince Commodus. Remind him of what he owes
to the people of Rome, and to the memory of his
father. Teach him that he who restrains not his own
passions can never rule a realm justly or with
prosperity
.
I charge thee, let thy son freely associate
with him, that through his example the follies that I
fear may be repressed.
The imperial father, who seemed to have before
his eyes some prophetic vision of the turpitude of his
successor, listened with complacency to the promises
of his sister, that his wishes should be held sacred;
and, taking an affectionate leave, soon departed with
his legions to subdue the rebellious tribes of the
Quadi
and Marcomani.
Among the tributaries to Roman power, Greece
stood like a temple, dismantled, yet beautiful. The
wrath of conquest had crushed some of its fairest
columns, and stripped the acanthus leaf from their
capitals. Yet the divinity had not forsaken its shrine.
The whispers of an eloquent philosophy, to which
the world had knelt, still drew votaries from distant
climes, and the sons of her haughty victor came as
pilgrims to linger and to listen amid the groves of
the Academe.
At the period which we contemplate, Athens had
arisen from her deepest degradation. The
intellectual
and magnificent Adrian had taken her by the
hand, and striven to efface the ravages of his
predecessors
.
Antoninus Pius and his successor sought
to restore her fallen dignity. Many of her
desecrated
edifices had been rebuilt, and her privileges
restored
.
Still the footstep of the Roman made but harsh
echo among her shades. Though reinstated in her
seat of honor, it was with a melancholy brow and a
shuddering heart. On the hope held before her, she
gazed like the pale planet, drooping from the recent
deluge, remembering rather the bitterness of the
waters
,
than the promise on the prismed cloud, that she
should be submerged no more.
Yet it was not held a slight honor in Athens, that
among the noble youths whom the study of arts and
letters attracted to her clime, should be the favored
relative, perhaps the presumptive heir of him, who
wore the imperial purple. Marcus Aurelius
Antoninus
,
whose own intense love of philosophy had
been imbibed from the Greek sages who instructed
his youth, had decided that the mind of his nephew
should be enriched by the same lore, gathered in its
own native soil; and overruled, as we have already
seen, the reluctance of his solitary sister to the
consequent
separation.
The virtues and accomplishments of lius
Marcellus
fully justified the affection of his mother, and
the earnest cares of the emperor, who, disgusted with
the vices of his colleague Lucius Verus, and inly
shuddering at the developments of his son
Commodus
,
perhaps coupled with the training of his
nephew
,
the future prosperity of the realm.
It was an autumnal evening when the young and
noble traveler first entered Athens. A liquid
moonlight
bathed her towers, and heightened, like the
silver
veil of the bride, the beauty of her sculpture.
But the proud and enthusiastic stranger
contemplated
with disappointment that melancholy symmetry.
He turned dissatisfied even from the Acropolis and
the Parthenon, with their coronet of moonbeams, and
sought some counterpart for the Coliseum, some
substitute
for those ranges of patrician structures which
clothed with gorgeousness the eternal city.
Patriotism
swelled his bosom, while his thoughts
recurred
to Rome, portraying her as she lay that night in
queenly repose, conscious that at her wakening the
world would be at her feet.
Such were his feelings as he looked on Athens in
the garb of Autumn; yet the young vernal moon
had scarcely filled her horn ere a change stole over
his spirit. No longer he trod those streets with the
haughty consciousness of being one of the masters
of the world. The solemn beauty of fallen Greece,
the antiquity of her lore, softened and subdued him.
Yielding to the enchantment of her eloquence who
breathed her antique history on the harp, he made
the pages of Herodotus the companion of his pillow,
or inhaled, amid the murmurings of Hissus, the
sweetness
of the Doric muse.
But most, the enthusiasm of philosophy stole into
and ruled his soul. He communed with the shade
of Plato, as with a visible friend, in those gardens
where his voice still lingered, an imprisoned
melody
.
The sculpture which he had once passed with
indifference, now stood forth in severe sublimity, the
sad and silent statues seemed to beckon and
commune
with him, till he felt that it was better to sigh
in Athens than to reign in Rome. The new
atmosphere
breathed on him like magic, enkindling a new
existence.
Yet was it not solely the scenery of Greece, nor
the exquisite symmetry of her architecture, nor the
charm of her language, nor the ideal presence of her
sages, that enchained the heart of the young Roman.
The touch of pity and the breathings of philosophy
prepared it for another guest. Love had been to it
like the angel at the Pool of Bethesda, and its
troubled
fountains were gushing upward with strange
untasted
streams. His favorite instructor in
philosophy
was Demetrius, a follower of Plato. He
possessed
a serene, contemplative character, and an
innate
eloquence, which delighted the intellectual and
ardent disciple. The liberality of the Antonines had
placed the teachers of philosophy beyond the reach
of want. Their restricted finances no longer
justified
the caustic reply of Diogenes to the question
why philosophers followed rich men, and not rich
men philosophers?because one know what they
have need of, and the others do not.
The house of Demetrius was adorned with taste,
and lius Marcellus was there a distinguished guest.
He was pleased to study the manners of the sage in
his own home, and to perceive how beautifully they
confirmed the theory of their common master, that
happiness is the fruit of virtue. He could not but
remark how the spirit of Attic grace modified even
the most common household utensils. The lamps,
the pitchers, the vases, illustrated the taste of
Pericles
.
The very slave, who bore on his head a
basket
of grapes, the young female, who presented the
ewer of water for ablution, gave the rudiment of
those attitudes which guided the chisel of Phidias.
Then the Roman learned that the nation which would
be perfect in the arts must take the graces home to
its hearth-stone, and make for them a place at its
board, an indwelling amid its domestic sanctities.
But the most exquisite specimen of grace in the
household of the philosopher was a maiden of the
noblest blood of Athens, who, by the affliction of
orphanage
,
had passed under his protection. She, with
an infant sister, had been bequeathed by their parents
to the charge of Demetrius, a distant relative, and a
friend in whom such high confidence was wisely
reposed
.
Over the fortune of the orphans, which was
considerable, he exercised a paternal care, and they
entwined around his aged heart like the ivy,
covering
it with the fresh green of hope.
Myrtis was one of those beautiful creations which
fancy sometimes forms when her revery has been
among seraphs. Her sylph-like step, her smile,
imparting
happiness, without seeming to expect it again,
her manner, gentle almost to pensiveness, finely
accorded
with features formed on the most perfect
Grecian model, with a complexion transparent as
light, and eyes often downcast, but never raised, and
quickened by speech, without interesting or affecting
the beholder. Unoccupied with self, and ever
seeking
to promote the enjoyment of others, she evinced
gratitude to her protector by the most affectionate
deportment, by skill in the arrangement of his
household
,
and attention to the comfort of his guests.
But it was more particularly in intercourse with
her little sister, the sole surviving scion of their
ancient
house, that the fullness of her soul was poured
forth. To enrich her unfolding mind with the
treasures
of knowledge, to fashion her docile dispositions,
to supply to her the place of the mother who had died
at her birth, were the highest efforts and purest
pleasures
of her existence. It was this sweet illustration
of the sisterly virtues, which, more than any symmetry
of form or feature, won the heart of the young noble.
He had, indeed, admired her exquisite beauty, but
with such lineaments he had been familiar among
the patrician daughters of Rome. It was not till the
grace of a lovely and sublime spirit looked through
and gave life to it, that he felt it to be irresistible.
He saw her toiling with an earnest eye, to simplify
and adapt the precepts of wisdom to the
comprehension
of a child of eight summers, or cheering her
to playfulness by merry music, or, with a mixture of
maternal pride, wreathing fresh vine-leaves among
her luxuriant, golden curls.
It was thus that lius Marcellus, the favored
relative
of an emperor, the unmoved idol of the more
ambitious beauties of Rome, became the willing
captive
of an artless Athenian maiden. His letters to his
mother gradually assumed the coloring of the image
B
that absorbed him. If he began a synopsis of the
lectures of the philosophers, it suddenly diverged
to Myrtis; his praise of the perfect language of
Greece took the name of Myrtis as a key-tone; and
if he attempted a description of that architecture
which the world will never be too old to admire, it
was transformed into an encomium on Myrtis.
He was surprised at the ease with which his
thoughts arrayed themselves in a Grecian garb.
Conversations
with Myrtis, in which he was as frequently
indulged as the somewhat reserved courtesies of
Athens admitted, untwisted the idiom of a foreign
dialect, and taught it to run smoothly o'er the lip,
as the accents which a mother softens for her babe.
And, apart from the necromancy of love, he who
would so conquer the difficulties of a new language
as to speak it with fluency and grace, should seek the
society of educated females, for with them is the
colloquial
affluence of their mother tongue, and the clew
that most readily guides a stranger through its
labyrinthine
refinements.
While lius Marcellus was sounding the depths
of a passion which, as yet, his lips uttered not, she
who inspired it had not even advanced so far as to
assign its true name. All her life she had been
sighing for a brother. She supposed herself to have
found one. In the loneliness of early childhood,
and amid the sorrows of orphanage, she had painted
fraternal intercourse as the fullness of bliss. She
believed, in her crystal singleness of heart, that her
new happiness sprang from this adopted relationship,
and rejoiced to see the little Alethea greet their
brother, at every interview, with the overflowing
warmth of an affectionate heart.
One evening, lius Marcellus entered with a
troubled countenance. He had received tidings of
the dangerous, perhaps fatal, illness of his mother.
Tears started to the eyes of Myrtis. Memory turned
to the death-bed of her own parents, and her
sympathies
were strongly moved. The young Roman
added
that his immediate return was required, and that
the period of his absence from his studies in Athens
was uncertain, and might be protracted. Tears now
gushed from an unexplored source, and blushes of
a stronger tint than the maiden had yet known
suffused
both cheek and brow at finding herself
addressed
by a fonder name than that of sister, and feeling
that it awoke a true echo in her heart.
The discoveries of that parting hour were
priceless
and indelible. Yet, to describe love-scenes is
but a losing office. He who attempts it is unwise;
for the dialect of love, counting speech impotent, is
especially ill represented on paper; as if it were
possible
that light, in its most subtle transmission, should
borrow, or bow to the stammerings of sound. Love,
scorning so slow a medium as language, except the
eye be interpreter, is indignant at the tardier
ministry
of the pen. The words of lovers dilated upon
the dead page, are, like the shorn locks of Samson,
stripped of their talisman and scattered to the winds.
Yet, in the few tones of that Athenian maiden,
when her heart first awoke to self-knowledge and to
reciprocity, there was a treasure which her lover felt
the world were poor to purchase. It was with him
on his journeyings as a spell, annihilating distance and
neutralizing fatigue. He best loved the lonely
valleys
,
where he might repeat its sweetness unheard,
and the hermit cell by night, that he might invoke it
as the tutelary goddess of his repose.
He arrived at the eternal city like one traveling
on the wing of dreams. His mother, the noble
An-nia
Cornificia, lay in the last stages of a fatal disease.
She had caused it to be concealed from her son as
long as hope remained, and summoned him only to
receive her parting counsels and benedictions. Yet
the declining flame of life, revivifying and feeding on
the affections, lingered for a time on the verge of the
grave, cheered by the kind attentions and filial piety
of her earthly idol. He passed almost his whole
time by her bedside, striving to assuage her
sufferings
,
and receiving, when she was able, her directions
respecting the fortune which had been intrusted by
his father to her care. The emperor, whose
presence
in her last extremity she greatly desired, was
still absent from Rome, engaged in the wars of
Germany
.
While these mournful duties occupied lius
Marcellus
,
there remained with the bereaved Myrtis an
interminable void. He whom she had long loved as
a brother, and more than a brother, without being
conscious of it, whom she had just permitted herself
to regard as the dearest of all earthly objects, seemed
to have taken away with him the life of life.
Demetrius
,
prizing him as a scholar and a friend, and
the affectionate Alethea were incessantly talking of
him; while she, whose heart was most interested,
seldom trusted to her voice the utterance of his name.
There was about his image a sacredness which she
reserved for the hours of solitary meditation, when
she might embalm it with such tears as do not cover
the face. Yet that chemistry in which the most
perfectly
balanced minds are the best adepts, gradually
taught her that the duties of benevolence contain a
balm for sorrow. She sought out with increased
zeal the poor and afflicted, and, in distributing
consolation
,
derived comfort. Among her pensioners
was an aged man, who had held in her father's
household
the rank of steward. His intelligence and
fidelity
caused him to be considered by her parents less
as a servant than a friend, and his grateful
attachment
was unbounded. He was now, in his childless
age, the inmate of a small tenement connected with
the garden of Demetrius, where it was convenient
for Myrtis daily to visit him, and cheer the languor
of his decline. Her attentions to this lonely and
worthy retainer now redoubled, as it became
obvious
that his span of life rapidly decreased.
Myrtis, I am not well pleased, said the little
Alethea, that you sometimes go to see poor Proclus
without me, and that you stay so long. I love him
2 B 2
as much as you do. And what is that book which I
wake at midnight and find you reading? and why do
you hide it so carefully away? Sister, sister, you
never used to have secrets from me. And now that
our brother is gone, you ought to be kinder to me
than ever, and not begin to shut me out of your
heart.
Myrtis hasted to reassure the little trusting being,
reproaching herself that she should thus have grieved
her, for she found that in her dreams she sometimes
convulsively sobbed out complaints mingled with the
name of Proclus.
One morning the sound of heavy steps was heard
advancing toward the inner apartment, and
Demetrius
entered, with more of agitation than his calm
philosophy, and his still calmer nature, were wont to
indulge. Following him was the proconsul of
Athens
,
to whom he said, in hurried tones,
Will there never be an end of slanders? Behold
the noble maiden, whom you so unjustly suspect. Is
it necessary that here, in the very home of her
protector
,
she be insulted by the question, whether she
be a Christian?
There needs not this clamor, replied the
proconsul
.
It is sufficient if the lady simply indicate
whether she will sacrifice to the gods.
What an indignity is this doubt of her piety!
Think you she could be thus faithless to her long
line of ancestors, to her teachersto herself?
Instructed
in our most ancient rites, would it be
possible
to adopt an odious heresy, which is but of
yesterday
?
Myrtis, daughter, will it please you by a
single word to dismiss the proconsul?
Thus invoked, the maiden arose. Her slight, but
perfect, figure seemed to assume new height and
majesty. There was no fading of lip or cheek, as
she firmly pronounced,
I am a Christian
.
The philosopher stood as if the blast of Heaven
had dried up his spirits. He listened, gasping, for
some recantation. He feared to speak, lest there
might be a repetition of those fearful words.
At length, overcome with agony, he fell prostrate
and powerless, and the proconsul, with a glance of
triumph and of scorn, departed. Newly clothed with
deputed authority, he was eager to turn it to the best
advantage. The single prominent blemish in the
character of Marcus Aurelius was severity to the
Christians. Mild and forbearing to all besides, he
seemed to concentrate the whole bitterness of the
Portico to pour it upon the Cross. The governors
of the subjugated provinces found the most direct
road to his favor lay through the persecution and
punishment of that sect which was every where
spoken against. This new proconsul, a bold man
and a bad, was neither insensible to such ambition,
nor averse from the machinery which it involved.
Our next scene is in the prison at Athens. It was
thronged with habitants. In one of its cells was
a fair young creature, and a child ever near her
inseparable as the shadow from the substance.
By their side was seen a hoary-headed philosopher,
whose beard descending, swept his aged breast.
He came with early morn, and late departed.
Incessantly
he argued of the antiquity and omnipotence
of the gods of Greece, and condemned the madness
of those who followed the Crucified. But the
beautiful
being whom he addressed spake with a gentle,
yet clear voice of the hope that was in her, or read
to him from a hallowed page in which was the
reason
of that hope; and every evening he bade
farewell
with a paler and more troubled brow.
One day he announced to her that he had obtained
permission, though not without difficulty, that she
should visit the cell of Proclus; for age and sickness
had been no protection against his being torn from
his humble home, and subjected to the rigors of
imprisonment
.
Breathing gratitude for a liberty so
long sought in vain, she took the hand of Alethea,
and followed Demetrius and the guard who
accompanied
him.
The old man lay on a little straw in the corner of
his narrow cell. His eye, dim with the gloom of the
prison, and with a deeper darkness which had begun
to settle upon it, saw not who approached him. But
those sweet, low tones that he loved called back the
life-tide to his marble features.
Art thou here, Angel of Mercy? Once more, art
thou by the side of the poor old man, thou who art
so soon to be an angel indeed? Often, since I have
lain here, have I wept to think that in the beauty and
flush of life thou must be cut off. But it was a thought
of earth. I ought to have remembered, and given
thanks as I now do, for the portion that awaits thee,
for the `blessing, and the glory, and the honor, and
the eternal life.'
Bless me also, good Proclus, said Alethea. I
too am standing by thy bed. I read in the book of
the true God with Myrtis, and she teaches me to
worship him.
Ah! art thou here, youngest scion of my master's
house? What a doom for thee, thou lamb reared
in green pastures, beside the still waters! I pray
thee come nearer, that I may lay my hand on thy
head, and name over thee the name of Jesus. Who
will raise this dead hand for me, and place it among
the curls of that beautiful one whose welcome to this
sad life was the bosom of a dying mother?
Blessed saint, said Myrtis, from whom I first
heard the hope of immortality, how can I comfort thy
soul in its passage? Shall I read for thee from the
book of our faith, or sing a hymn to the Redeemer?
Fain would I listen to thy voice, said the dying
man, for it is melody. But now I may not stay.
They call me. My soul exults. I come. Is there
yet one drop of water, sweet one? The last want of
this poor clay. Moisten my parched lips, that I may
go with singing unto Him who loved me, who gave
himself for me.
And, with a faintly warbled strain of praise, the
soul of that old man went upward.
The mind of Myrtis was prepared by its own
structure
,
as well as by its high culture, for a more
consistent
belief than the mythology of her country afforded.
The very philosophy by which it had been refined
taught it to seek for some more stable foundation.
Her simple and severe rectitude was confused by the
countless deities naturalized at Athens, where it was
said to have been easier to find a
god
than a
man
.
Her purity revolted from the rites of gods, partial,
changeful, passionate, unjust, whose attributes were
rage, revenge, or lust. Plato led her to the gate
of truth, and taught her to breathe the pure
atmosphere
that surrounded it; a humbler hand was
appointed
to open that gate for her, and light and
radiance
flowed through its portals, and she became a
faithful worshiper.
By the bedside of the lonely retainer of her
family
,
where she went in the ministry of her
single-hearted
benevolence, she was first initiated into the
rudiments
of Christianity, and gained a gift of
inestimable
valuea copy of the Sacred Scriptures. This
was her daily study. The faith derived from it she
received in humility, and was ready to maintain with
fortitude. Yet martyrdom, which holy men counted
as a crown, and enthusiastic devotion sometimes too
eagerly coveted, was not, to her gentle spirit, an
object
of ambition. To renounce life just as a
newly-admitted
love had given it the coloring of Eden, could
not be desired. Her young heart, won by the noble
Marcellus; his heart, beating, as it were, in her bosom;
she weighed for him and for her the claims of this
world and the next; and her constant supplication,
amid her prison solitude, was, that her Father in
heaven would reveal her duty, and gird her to
unswerving
obedience.
Once, while the philosopher sat gazing in silent
affliction upon the sisters, the massy bolts of the prison
were suddenly withdrawn, and lius Marcellus
entered
.
Astonishment, dismay, and indignation
convulsed
his noble features for a moment; but love, like
the lightning flash, dispersed all their cloudy
symbols
.
Myrtis vainly strove to give utterance to the
emotions that oppressed her. Sensation forsook her,
and her brow, paler than marble, drooped over her
lover's shoulder. But the deadly faintness was short.
The long fringes of her dark eyes unclosed, and a
tint, like the young rose-leaf, started to her cheek,
still deepening and spreading, till the very snows of
her temples caught its trembling suffusion. Then,
in tones like the varied melody of a fresh-tuned lute,
she hastened to relieve his anxiety, whose breath
seemed to depend upon her own, and to cheer the
bewildered spirits of her sister and their foster-father.
Supported by lius Marcellus, and with Alethea
seated at her feet, a conversation of the deepest
interest
commenced.
The philosopher felt the kindlings of a hope to
which he had been long a stranger. The agitation
of Myrtis, who, amid all other remonstrances, had
remained serene and passionless, proved to him the
omnipotence of her love. Retiring to the extremity
of the cell, he enveloped his head in his garment, and
prepared, by an elaborate orison to Minerva, to
accelerate
the victory which he predicted.
Notwithstanding
the fervor of his devotions, the accents of
the speakers sometimes arrested his attention or
lingered
upon his ear. The tones of the Roman were,
at first, as one who complains, or, perhaps, contends,
but with the consciousness of wearing invincible
armor
.
The response was tender and subdued, yet
musical as the wind-harp swept by the sweet
south-west
.
Then there was a tide of manly eloquence,
rushing like a river which surmounts every barrier
when the spring rains have swollen it. For my
sakefor my sake, seemed the burden of every
argument
,
and it was echoed in the sobbing of a child,
for my sake, too, dearest sister. Demetrius
blessed
the youth in his aged heart, and began a prayer
of thanksgiving to Pallas, with vows of a costly
libation
.
At length the Roman was silent, and,
supposing
him to have destroyed the last defenses of that
stubborn faith which all the weapons of philosophy
had assailed in vain, he removed the robe from his
face, and looked up.
But the evidence of the eye overthrew the
exultation
which the more obtuse ear had fostered. She,
whom he had so long pictured to himself as the
listener
,
convinced, confuted, repentant, was speaking
with an upraised, soul-lighted eye. He knew that it
was not of earth that she spoke; for such holiness as
of a seraph would not then have settled upon her
countenance. Her hand rested upon the open page
of a book which she had drawn from her bosom.
Every trace of earthly passion had faded from her
features, and her whole soul seemed to pour itself
forth as an essence of truth and power, and such love
as hath root fast by the throne of God.
The young Roman leaned his head upon his hands,
with every lineament of entranced attention. Deep
sighs burst from his bosom, like the dividing of the
soul from its terrestrial companionship. The maiden,
bending tenderly toward him, pointed on the page
which she held, to the words, I am the resurrection
and the life. He covered his eyes with his hands,
but tears gushed through his fingers like those large
rain-drops that herald the tempest. Starting from
his seat, he strained her in one short, agonized
embrace
,
and rushed from the cell. The philosopher
hastened after him, amazed at such abruptness, yet
dreading to decipher the cause.
Sister, dear sister, said Alethea, clinging round
the neck of Myrtis, lius Marcellus will return no
more. I know it. His heart is broken. But I will
never leave you. No; we will die together; and
she sobbed out her deep love as the nursling pours
its griefs into a mother's bosom.
Alethea, beloved one, go forth and breathe the
fresh air. A prison cell suits ill with the free spirit
of childhood. The flush is fading from your cheek,
and your fair flesh wastes away; and she folded the
dove-like child in her arms.
C
Myrtis, I do not wish to go. The gardens are
changed. Your voice is no longer there. The turf
is neither green nor beautiful. The oleanders do
not look as they once did, and my white cyclamen
has a tear in its eye as it puts forth its feeble buds.
Little Alethea, Demetrius will lead you to see
how our birds fare, and our bees. You shall bring
me word again. The comfort of the humblest
insect
that God has made should be dear to us. In
the health and industry of those innocent creatures
you shall once more be glad. I will leave them to
your care, and my amaranths.
The fair child kneeled by her sister, and hid her
face in her lap. She was silent for a few minutes.
Then, raising her head, she said, calmly and solemnly,
Speak no more to me of the charge of birds, and
bees, and flowers. I shall die with you. Never
more will I press you to live, and cease to be a
Christian; for now I know that it gives you pain.
I love the same Jesus Christ that you love. Tell me
more of Him, that I may love Him better. Then,
when I stand up to die with you, I shall wear the
same smile that makes your brow like the angels',
when you kneel and pray for me.
It has been mentioned that the Emperor Marcus
Aurelius was engaged in wars with the Quadi and
Marcomani. They involved a long absence from
Rome, and many hardships. The barbarians
succeeded
in shutting him up between the mountains
and themselves. The heat of summer, the privations
of an uncultivated region, and the most distressing
thirst, annoyed and discouraged his army. Forced,
under these adverse circumstances, to meet the
enemy
,
the Roman cohorts might have whitened with
their bones the wilds of Germany, and scarce a
survivor
have escaped to tell their fate. They invoked
the gods of their nation, and the boasted idols of
Egypt, in vain. At length a legion of Christian
soldiers
knelt on the arid battle field, and besought help
of Jehovah. A plentiful and blessed rain, which fell
as the conflict began, and which the famishing soldiers
caught in their helmets and the hollow of their shields,
so invigorated them, while the tempest, with thunder
and lightning that followed, so terrified the
barbarians
,
that victory declared for those who, but a moment
before, seemed ready to yield without a struggle.
Even pagan history scruples not to connect this
wonderful event with the prevalent prayers of those
Christian soldiers, enforced, as they were, to follow the
fortunes and share in the battles of a persecuting
emperor
.
She bestowed on them the distinctive name
of the thundering legion; thus perpetuating at
once her gratitude, and the terrible voice from
Heaven
that discomfited the barbarians. They were
permitted
to have a thunderbolt engraven on their shields
a coat of arms of high and peculiar heraldry. The
beautiful Antonine column, boldly resisting the
tyranny
of time, still preserves the scenery of that
remarkable
occurrence, among other imperishable
records
of Roman glory.
At evening the emperor sat in his tent, revolving
the wonderful deliverance of the day, and thanking
the gods to whose interposition he ascribed it. He
mused, also, upon the evils of war, which drew him
from his palace and his people, to do deeds from
which his better nature revolted, and to forego that
philosophical retirement which declining years
rendered
still more dear. The revery was disturbed by
tidings that a young Roman, apparently charged with
urgent dispatches, claimed admission to the imperial
presence.
The next moment lius Marcellus was at his feet.
After salutations of surprise and reverence, he
received
permission to unfold the cause for which he
had thus dared long travel, and an enemy's land. As
he proceeded, the brow of the emperor grew stern,
and darkened.
Would that thy first mediation had not been for
one of that race, whom duty to the gods requires me
to humble, perhaps to extirpate. A Christian
maiden
!
What has she to do with the son of the noble
Marcellus, the nephew, perhaps the heir, of him who
wears the imperial purple?
Again he listened to the suppliant, till his lofty
forehead
lost its painful contraction, and his classic features
resumed their native cast of contemplative thought.
The Christians have ever been represented to
me as disaffected to our laws, and leaders of tumult
and rebellion. Yet I am not ignorant that there are
in my army some of their soldiers who have done
good service in this very war. To-day they knelt
upon the field of battle, and prayed their God for
succor, and lo! the elements came to our rescue,
and Heaven's thunder-bolts discomfited the
barbarians
.
My heart even now swells with gratitude to
them. Thou knowest that I seek to show justice to
all men. What is thy petition?
A mandate to the proconsul of Athens, overruling
this doom of death, which he purposes to inflict.
By my decree have the governors of the provinces
punished the Christians. How shall this
discrepancy
be reconciled?
Thy noble and just nature has been deceived by
the falsehood of those who hold the Christians in
abhorrence
,
or by their avarice coveting the gains of
confiscation. If they have now proved themselves
faithful in camps, and brave amid the disasters of
war; if, through their prayers, the legions have been
rescued, an emperor, so generous to foes, will not
surely withhold from his own soldiers the approval
due to them and honorable to himself.
Marcus Aurelius paced the tent in silence and
agitation
.
Then, fixing on his nephew eyes that
seemed
to read the soul, he said, Art
thou
a Christian?
Color rushed to the brow of the young man, as he
half indignantly replied,
No, I have never abjured the gods of Rome.
At my last interview with her for whose sake I thus
venture to implore thee, I sought vehemently to draw
her from what I deemed delusion and madness. But
C 2
I love that maiden better than my own soul. If she
must perish, trample, I pray thee, on my life as a
rootless weed, for henceforth I am nothing to Rome
or to thee.
The emperor, still hesitating, murmured, half
audibly
,
half in self-communion,
Did I not sanction the doom of Polycarp, and of
Dionysius, and of the multitudes whose blood
saturated
the valleys of Gaul?
Marcellus, pressing his hand in both his own,
exclaimed
,
If an old man, weary of life, took only one step
toward his grave; if an enthusiast, greeting
martyrdom
as the crown of earthly glory, eagerly seized
that crown; if those who were represented to thee
as ripe for insurrection, and subverters of the gods
of our nation, have shed their blood; what then?
canst thou restore them? But a maiden, nurtured in
simplicity and in philosophy, no troubler of thy realm,
no sower of sedition, must she be sacrificed because
she hath drawn secretly into her bosom some form of
faith which, to her purity, seems more pure? Have
I said that she is the daughter of one who was
honored
as the munificent patron of philosophersthe
friend of Rome? Have I said that insolence dared
even to outrage the domestic sanctuary, and drive her
thence in her beauty and innocence to such a prison
as felons share? Let her look, in her desolate
orphanage
,
to thee as her protector from such tyranny.
The emperor regarded him, as he ceased to speak,
with deep and tender attention. He scanned his
haggard eye, and the marks of rugged travel that
he bore. The sympathies of kindred blood wrought
strongly within him.
My son, since last we met, the soul of thy
mother
hath been summoned to the eternal gods. She
was my only sister, dear to me from the cradle. Her
love shall be thine. Even now her voice pleads
within
my heart for thee. Not in vain shall be thy
perilous
appeal for this Grecian maiden.
He traced a few lines, and gave them folded into
the hand of the youth.
This will suspend all execution of Christians, on
account of their faith, until my arrival in Athens, for
I purpose to visit that illustrious city ere I return to
Rome.
Emperor! father! yet more to me than either
father or emperor! Representative of the mercy of
the heavens! how shall I give vent to my eternal
gratitude?
Go to thy rest, my son, for thou art sore wearied.
In the morning I will confer with thee of the
philoophy
of Greece. It will refresh my spirit under the
toils and burdens of this war.
Forgive me, said the youth, embracing his
knees. I may not tarry for a night. Sleep is a
stranger to mine eyelids. Even the moment in which
I so vainly strive to utter thanks, may frustrate the
very purpose of thy goodness.
The lips of the emperor trembled. Scarcely had
he articulated, the blessing of the holy gods be with
thee, ere the flying tramp of a departing steed was
heard, though the storm still raged, and the darkness
of midnight overspread the landscape.
The summer sun lay bright and broad upon
Athens
.
Footsteps hurried through the streets, and the
low murmur of suppressed voices was heard from a
spot where the dense throng congregated.
Preparations
were seen for the extinction of life. The fatal
pile, rising here and there, bore witness that this
extinction
was to be through the torturing agency of
fire. Individuals of various ages composed the band
who were sentenced to look that day for the last time
on the waving olives and fair skies of their beautiful
clime. There the hoary-headed man came to give the
remnant of his life joyfully away, and the delicate
female
,
made strong by the faith of her Redeemer, stood
forth a spectacle to men and to angels. Amid all the
softening influences of nature and of art, the same
spirit
was dominant which adjudged Socrates to the
hemlock
,
and it was enraged to find that neither threat nor
torture could intimidate those whom it had marked
for its prey. Still a semblance of justice and
moderation
was preserved. Opportunity was offered to
each of the victims to sacrifice to the gods,
arguments
to persuade recantation were adduced, and an
affected reluctance testified to inflict the doom which
multitudes had assembled to witness; but the
alternative
was refused by every Christian, and death
nobly
welcomed.
Then there was a moment of awful silence. It
was broken by sounds strangely sweetthe hymn of
the martrys. Its prelude was tender, almost
tremulous
,
as of souls spreading a timid wing over the
crushing of their clay casket, fragile, and beloved.
But then it swelled out in fuller chorus, as if angels
from the open gates of heaven took up the melody
and made it a song of triumph.
The listeners were appalled. Those who
conducted
the execution, dreading a revulsion of
popular
feeling, strove by the clamor of martial
instruments
to interrupt that solemn, unearthly music.
Among the little band of martyrs was one on whom
the universal gaze settled. Youth, and a beauty
rendered
more exquisite by seclusion from crowds, were
suddenly exposed to the rude glare of the multitude.
By the side of the maiden stood an ancient
philosopher
,
wasted to a skeleton, a mute effigy of powerless
sorrow. Clasping her hands was a fair child, whose
exuberant curls partially shaded a face ever raised
upward to the object of its love, as if from thence it
derived breath and being.
The time arrived when the victims must be bound
to the stake. Orders were given that the child should
be removed; but, embracing her sister with a
convulsive
grasp, she declared her determination that
nothing should separate them. The martyr soothed
her in low tones, and strove gently to put her hand
into that of the philosopher; but in vain. She clung
to her as the clay to the struggling spirit when Death
3
summons it to be free. A murmur of sympathy ran
through the populace. The proconsul approached.
Maiden, art thou so rashly bent upon death, that
nothing can annul thy choice? Have all the joys of
life no weight with one so beautiful?
Speak not to me of the alternative by which life
is purchased. Am I again to repeat the assurance
that I will never deny my Savior?
Then bid farewell to this child. Or is it thy
pleasure that she make trial of the flame?
The martyr bowed down and clasped her soul's
darling in one long embrace. She pressed her lips to
hers, as if she fain would breathe there her last breath.
As she withdrew them, she said gently, but firmly,
Dearest, go now to our father Demetrius. If we
both leave him, he will die comfortless, he who has
for so many years been as father and mother to us.
Go, cheer his aged heart. This is your duty. Be
a daughter to him. Remember my last message to
your brother, to lius Marcellus. And now, little
sister, farewell. We shall meet again. There is a
place for you in heaven. I will watch over you, and
welcome you there.
Her words fell unheeded. The lips and forehead
of the child were cold, but the pressure of her
embrace
relaxed not.
Old man, said the proconsul, take away this
child. But the hoary-headed philosopher moved
not. He stood as the statues that in their marble
majesty looked down upon him.
At a glance from the proconsul, a soldier laid his
hand upon Alethea. Even his iron nature recoiled
at her piercing scream.
No, no! I shall die with my sister. I worship
the Christian's God. I love Jesus Christ. I hate
the idols of Athens. Let me stand up in the fire by
my dear sister's side. I will not shrink, nor cry out.
My heart grows to hers. It can not be torn away.
I have a right to die with her. Do I not tell you that
I am a Christian?
Away with her, then, said the proconsul: let
her test her young courage by a taste of the flame,
if so it pleaseth her.
There was a tumult among the throng. A shout
of Tidings from the emperor! A horseman was
seen approaching with breathless speed. He leaped
from his gasping steed, which the same moment fell
dead at his feet. He caught in his arms the
sentenced
maiden and the pale child, who adhered to
her with the clasp of the drowning when he sinks to
rise no more. Hurling toward the proconsul the
edict which he drew from his bosom, he exclaimed,
Hence, persecutor! with thy minions. Thou
shalt answer this before the emperor. See that these
Christians, in whose tortures thou wert so ready to
exult, are sent peacefully to their own homes; and
let this multitude disperse.
The proconsul read the writing, and quailed before
the wrath of the young Roman. He dared not meet
the lightning of his eye, for there is in every tyrant
the rudiments of a coward. And the fickle thousands
who, but a moment before, condemned the
Christians
to the stake, departed with curses on their lips
for the baffled proconsul.
The next gathering of a throng in that
amphitheatre
was for a different purpose  the triumphal
entry of Marcus Aurelius into Athens. The car
of the emperor was attended by his conquering
legions
,
whose invincible might Greece well
remembered
,
and could too feelingly attest. Captives, torn
from the German wilds, with dejected countenances
and wild elf-locks, swelled the pageant of the victor.
He was welcomed by all that Athens could devise
of pomp or of music, of procession or of praise.
Flowers were strewn as he passed, and clouds of
incense
ascended as to a god. Since the entrance of
Adrian, to whom the Eleusinian mysteries were
revealed
,
Athens had beheld nothing so imposing. She
hoped to receive from Marcus Aurelius such
benefactions
as were then heaped upon her; and the
splendid edifices which Adrian had erected,
especially
his library, with its alabaster roof and its hundred
columns of Phrygian marble, glowed with the richest
wreaths and echoed to the rarest minstrelsy.
But peculiarly did philosophy regard this festival
as her own. Never before had she seen one of her
own votaries robed in imperial purple, and wielding
the scepter of the globe. With all her boasted
indifference
to earthly pomp and pride, she might have
been forgiven the quickened step and flushed brow
with which she threw her garland at his feet.
Especially
did the disciples of Zeno lift up their head
with unwonted dignity. Marcus Aurelius
Antoninus
was a brother of their order, an adept in their
lore. His constant favor had distinguished them, his
eloquent pen maintained their tenets. The point of
precedence was therefore, on that memorable day,
conceded to the scholars of the Portico; but
pressing
near them, and with more of heart-felt joy in his
demeanor, was a Platonist, the silver-haired
Demetrius
.
Regarding the emperor as a beneficent deity,
he poured forth a tide of scarcely audible gratitude.
Yet he, to whom every eye was lifted, bent his own
with serene earnestness on a single group. There
knelt at his feet a lordly Roman, and a graceful
female
,
enveloped in a veil, to whose side clung a
beautiful
child. The vast multitude listened in breathless
attention as the youth broke silence.
Emperor! Sire! Behold the maiden for whom
I besought thee. Since we last met, a change hath
passed over me. I am no longer able to resist the
truth. I have embraced the faith that once I
condemned
.
I am a Christian. To whatever
punishment
thou shalt adjudge, we submit ourselves. If
our doom be death, suffer us to share it together, that
together we may be with the Lord.
He who was thus addressed, bending from his lofty
seat, united the hands of the lovers; and Marcus
Aurelius, the heathen and the Stoic, sanctioned, not
without a tear of tenderness, the bridal of Christians.
D
THE EMIGRANT BRIDE.
Fare ye well! fare ye well!
To joy and to hope it sounds as a knell;
Cruel tale it were to tell
How the emigrant sighs farewell.
Tupper
.
Two rather antique-looking people were
conversing
cozily, toward the close of a vernal day.
The bay window where they sat, looked out upon
lawn and gaden, and was partially shaded by the
convolvulus, so redolent at dewy morn, of its deep
blue and crimson bells.
Brother, did you ever think our Susan had some
thoughts she did not reveal?
What kind of thoughts?
Why, has it never crossed your mind that she
might be in love?
In love! The child! What can you be
dreaming
of, Sister Sibyl?
Child indeed! Eighteen next Candlemas, Mr.
Mortimer. If I am not mistaken, her mother was
younger when she stood at the altar with our
brother
.
Perhaps I might say, when she led him there,
for he was utterly bewildered, and blinded by the
love of her.
She was truly lovely. But tell me whose image
your imaginings have coupled with our pretty
niece?
Whose image? Why, the young spark Henry
Elton, of course. A fine match, upon my word;
he having nothing, or next to nothing, and of no
family, as you may say. I always thought Susan
ought to marry some nobleman; and so she might,
with a proper ambition. Such sights of money as
you have lavished on her education, tooplaying on
the spinnet, and working tent-stitch. Of what great
use will these be, when she is the wife of so very
undistinguished
a personage? I think she is
ungrateful
to you; indeed, to us both.
It is most probable that your fancy outruns all
fact. Still, if your suspicions prove true, I should
regret it not so much for the reasons you have given,
as that the young man has some spice of wildness
and want of consideration, which might affect the
happiness of the poor girl. Shall I speak to her?
O mercy, my dear brother! not for the world.
You men are always so hasty. Such matters need
the utmost tact and delicacy. The young heart is an
exquisite harp, which few can play upon without
disordering its strings. Trust that to me. There
she is, coming from her wal, and that very Henry
Elton with her, to be sure! Have the goodness,
brother, to leave the room. No time like the
present
time, as the proverb says.
A fair girl was seen approaching the house, the
rich curls of auburn hair escaping from under her
hat upon neck and shoulder. By her side was a
graceful young man, who bore upon his arm her
basket of wild flowers. A ramble in the green
lanes of merry England had given them new spirits,
D 2
and their voices, mingling in occasional laughter,
rang out joyously. Her companion took leave, and
she entered with a light step.
See, aunt, these fresh violets, and this
Bless me! Miss Mortimer, I suppose it is highly
decorous to walk with your hat untied, and to
chatter
so long at the gate with a gentleman.
Amazement seized the young creature, a moment
since so gay.
Miss Mortimer!
This was always
an epithet of great displeasure. What could have
happened? The full, blue eyes, which just before
had sparkled like sapphires, dilated, and with lips
slightly parted, and foot advanced, she stood,
checked
and silent, a song-bird startled by the thunder.
Do you know that every body is talking of your
familiarity with that Henry Elton, and of his awful
dissipation, too; your uncle and all?
My dear aunt!
Yes! dear aunt indeed! Your uncle is not
quite blind, nor deaf either. Poor man! he might
have had higher hopes for his favorite brother's
daughter. So liberal, too, as he has always been
no expense spared. It is a burning shame to show
no more regard to his feelings.
I assure you, aunt
You need not
assure
me at all; I'm able to
assure
myself. But, if you do not see fit to give up
Henry Elton, and mate yourself with some titled
person, or one more fitting for our family, it will not
be so well for you, I can
assure
you of that. It will
not be difficult to find one who will show more
gratitude to us, for lesser favors. You need not
take the trouble to answer me.
The surprise of the listener gave way to a rush of
other feelings. The color deepened in her pure
Saxon complexion, but she replied not, though the
compression of her bright lips proved that it cost
some effort to be silent. Henceforth a new subject
occupied her meditations, and the floating filament
and shadow of a preference became a fixed thought.
Miss Sibyl lost no time in reporting to her
brother
than Susan was deeply in love, and desperately
bent on having her own way.
I could see it in every movement. She is her
mother over again, whom I never could bear. Her
father, too, had a right obstinate temper.
Considering
he was only a half-brother, I have sometimes
wondered at your partiality for his daughter. I am
sure our own dear sister would be glad to give us
her Euphemia, who would not make us half the
trouble that Susan has.
This matter had been hinted before by the adroit
lady, but her brother's heart still continued to turn
to his orphan protg. Yet, having always
maintained
toward Susan a reserved and dignified manner,
she was not aware of his attachment, and too timid
to approach him with freedom. Mutually
misunderstanding
each other, constraint deepened into
apparent
coldness, and diffidence was mistaken for
pride. The blight of a joyless home fell on the
spirit of the young girl, and she grew care-worn
before her time.
Days passed away on leaden feet, and the early
flowers, for whose birth she had waited, withered,
scarcely noticed, in their turfy beds. At the foot of
the pleasant garden of the Mortimers was a
summer-house
.
The full moon, looking through
vines and lattice-work, saw that it was not
untenanted
.
Two persons were discoverable, with heads
declined
,
as if in conversation more profound than the
gayety of youth would prompt.
Suddenly one starts into action, genuflection,
gesture
,
such as excited feeling or eloquence inspire.
It might be seen that he had an auditor absorbed,
and not unmoved.
The pantomime, though protracted, has a close.
Of its scope and result, somewhat may be gathered
by the bearing of the parties, as they issue from the
bower. Moving slowly through the long lines of
shrubbery, the manner of one is earnest, tender,
and tinctured with the power of prevalence. The
other leans heavily on his arm, her fair brow
inclining
toward his, and as they reach the porch where
they are to separate, her clear, lustrous eye gazes
steadfastly into his, as if to gather one more
assurance
that the image of her own love is fully
reflected
there.
A ship rides at anchor on the English coast. The
night is rayless, and winds moan with a hollow
sound. The midnight watch is called; but the
captain
still lingers on deck, as if engaged in some
preparation for his expected departure at early
morn.
The tramp of flying steeds on the shores is heard,
then the dash of an oar. A boat has put out into
the thick darkness. Soon a group, muffled in cloaks,
ascend the deck of the vessel. One seems
exhausted
,
and is supported by a stronger arm.
Then, by the dull, red light of the barnacle, a
cavalier
stands forth, with uncovered head, and by his
side a vision of beauty. The melody of the
marriage
service trembles strangely upon that bleak,
midnight air. Hands are joined.
Till death us do part
. What a place, timid
and tender creature! for vows like thesethe rough
ship and the tossing sea. None of thy kindred blood
near to bless thee, or soothe the pulsations of thy
fluttering heart.
Safe from all persecution! Mine own
forever
!
Well-timed words, young bridegroom. They bring
a faint rose-leaf tinge over cheek and brow, so
deadly
pale. The benediction of the priest fell like oil
upon the troubled waters; and throwing himself,
with his attendants, into the waiting boat, he rapidly
regained the shore.
The next morning beheld the ship and her two
companions, with unfurled sails, leave the harbor of
Plymouth. Cloud and blast had passed away with
night, but were replaced by a dense fog. So they
still hovered, like half-wakened sea-birds, lazily
along the coast.
At mid-day a barge was seen approaching. With
a buoyant movement it skimmed the waves, now
rising half upright upon some crested billow, and
anon sinking gracefully into the intermediate vale
of waters.
Among the many who watched her progress,
none testified such overwhelming anxiety as Henry
Elton and his bride. Apprehension that they might
be the objects of pursuit, raised a tide of tumultuous
emotion. The young man walked apart with the
captain, vehemently demanding that the ship should
hold on her course; and when he again seated
himself
by her side, whose azure eye followed his
every
movement, weapons were observed to glitter
beneath his mantle.
A cavalier, closely muffled, with a single servant,
leaped on board. Requesting a private interview
with the captain, they descended together to the
cabin. Henry Elton, passing one arm firmly around
his bride, whispered in her ear,
Till death us do
part
, while a sword, partially drawn from its
scabbard
,
gleamed in his right hand. How endless
seemed that interval of suspense!
At length ascending footsteps were heard, with a
suppressed murmur of Sir Walter Raleigh! The
eye of every gazer testified pleasure as it rested on
the noble form of the most accomplished knight of
his times. His Spanish cloak, thrown over one arm,
discovered that magnificence of costume in which
he delighted, and which his elegance of person so
well became. To all who surrounded him he
addressed
some kind or courtly phrase, with his
habitual
tact and fluency. Fixing his eagle eye on the
bride, he drew her toward him, and said,
And thou, too, here pretty dove? I knew thy
father well, in the wars of the Low Countries. A
brave man was he, and a noble. Heaven help thee
to build thy nest in yon far flowery groves, where I
would fain myself be.
Pressing a paternal kiss on her pure forehead,
and once more heartily shaking the hand of the
commander, he said,
My good people, that you will show all due
respect
and obedience to so excellent a seaman as
Captain White, I make no doubt. But more than
this: I present him to you as the future governor of
the colony which, God willing, you are to plant in
the new Western World.
Then placing in his hand a sealed paper,
containing
instructions for the new government, and the
names of the twelve assistants by whose aid it was
to be administered, he bade all a courteous farewell,
with good wishes, and a golden lot.
Loud and long was the voice of cheer and
gratulation
as he departed. He bowed his thanks, and
then standing erect in the tossing boat, waved his
hat, with its fair, white plumes. Far in the distance
they saw it dancing amid the sea-foam, and
conversed
enthusiastically of the man who, yet scarcely
thirty-five, had already become illustrious in arts
and arms, a scholar, courtier, poet, and statesman;
liberal as a patron of literature, and the very soul of
all enterprise for the settlement of the new-found
continent of America. As they watched him until
his barge was a speck on the far waters, no
prescience
revealed the darkening of his fortunes, the
conspiracy of his foes, a tyrant king, the prison, and
the scaffold.
Three small ships, long beaten by the Atlantic
surge, approached the shores of that region which,
less than a century before, the world-finder had
unveiled
.
The conflict of months with blast and
billow
had not left them unscathed, and they moved,
like the flagging sea-gull, toward the desired haven.
It was the summer of 1587, when Virginia, in her
gorgeous robes, gleamed out to the worn voyagers,
like the isles of the blessed. Her flowering trees
and shrubs sent a welcome on the wings of odors,
ere the embroidered turf kissed their feet.
Vines, loaded with clusters, enriched field and
grove; here forming dense canopies and bowers of
shade, and there springing loftily from tree-top to
tree-top, with bold festoons and flowing drapery.
Deer glanced through the forest, and birds of gay
plumage filled the balmy air with music.
The strangers sought out the spot, near the fair
waters of the Roanoke, where, two years before, Sir
Richard Greenville had planted a colony of frail
root, whose remnant had been borne back by Sir
Francis Drake to its native soil.
These guests of the hospitality of the broad, green
West were full of exultation, and zealous to
construct
places of shelter and repose. None more
ardently rejoiced when a little dwelling was ready,
which they might call their own, than Henry Elton
and his bride. Its rudeness, its narrow limits, were
naught to them, so entirely happy were they to
possess
a home amid the charms of nature and the
solitude
of love. Here was their most romantic wish
fulfilleda lodge in the green wood, and a
beautiful
world to themselves.
Alas for Susan, when a change first stole over her
dream. Enthusiastic, and turning, like the flower of
the sun, to one alone, she had not taken into view
that the cloud and the frost must have their season.
At first she wondered that Henry could so often
leave her and so long be gone, or that, at his return,
he omitted the tender words she had been
accustomed
to hear. But the smile was ever radiant on her
brow when he appeared, and during his absence
she found solace in household toils, putting her
slender
,
snowy hands, with strange facility, to the
humblest
deeds that might render a poor abode
comfortable
,
or vary his repast who was ever first in her
thoughts. While thus employed, her voice rang out
sweetly from the catalpas that embowered her
dwelling
,
4 E
so that it would seem that the birds and herself
were at a loving strife. But the tuneful emulation
soon ceased, and her song rose sad and seldom, and
then was heard no more.
A deeper shadow had fallen upon her lot.
Captiousness
was added to indifference by him for whom
she had literally given up all besides. A fearful
conviction, which she strongly resisted, forced itself
upon her, of his frequent intemperance. Careless of
the duties of a protector, he would sometimes be
away whole nights, while at his return she was
doomed to witness the disgusting gradations from
stupidity to brutality.
Compunction, indeed, occasionally seized him, and
at his reviving kindness her young hope whispered
that all would yet be well, and her woman's love
forgot that it had ever wept. The adversities of the
colony proved, also, a temporary remedy. Poverty,
and a scarcity of the means of subsistence, checked
the power of revelry, and taught inebriety
abstinence
.
Some fear of savage warfare drew the
little
band more firmly together, for consultation and
safety. The fierce Wingina, with his followers,
were observed prowling around the settlement.
There was then no Powhatan to succor the
strangers
,
no Pocahontas to save the victim, at the
jeopardy
of her own life.
In the mean time, she who had staked her all on
love, and lost, was fondly tenacious of its fragments.
Every pleasant look or gentle word, though few and
far between, was treasured as an equivalent for
many sorrows. She was learning, day by day, the
lesson that human love may never lay aside the
element
of forbearance. It was touching to see so
young and fair a creature so sad, and yet so calm.
One evening she had waited long for her husband,
but he came not. A step was heard. Can that be
hisso stealthy? The slight fastening of the door
was burst in. Dark faces peered, wild forms
glimmered
.
The stroke of a hatchet, and the red flame
bursting from the low roof-tree, were the work of a
moment; and from the girdle of the tallest warrior,
when he strode from the spoil, hung a fresh auburn
tress.
That night the wail of a wretched man was heard
over the ashes, and the dead. Daybreak beheld
him, with others, armed, and going forth in quest of
vengeance. The fires of wrath fell on many a quiet
wigwam, and innocent women and babes perished
for the crime of their chieftain. Such is the justice
of the war spiritblind, bloody, and ferocious.
Three years notched their seasons on the trees,
and threw their shadows over the earth, ere England
stretched forth her hand to that far, forsaken colony.
Then three storm-driven vessels, as the dog-star
commenced his reign, were seen contending with
the terrible breakers of Cape Hatteras. Outriding
both surge and tempest, at length, with strained
cordage and riven sails, they neared the shore.
They fired signal-guns, and anxiously listened.
But there was no sound. They pressed on toward
Roanoke, Governor White, who had been absent on
an agency to England, taking the lead. Where was
his sweet daughter Ellinor Dare, whom he had left
in her green-wood home, singing the lullaby to her
young babe, Virginia, the first-born of English
parents
in the New Western World? As he drew
near the spot, he kept his eye fixed, with agonizing
earnestness, on a copse of lofty pines that had
encircled
her habitation. Smoke reared its curling
volume
among them, and his heart leaped up. It was
the smouldering council-fire of the Indians.
Not a home of civilized man was there, not a
form or face of kindred or of friend. They call.
There is no answer, but echo murmuring from rock
and ravine.
Names and initials are still cut deeply on the
trees, but where are the hands that traced them?
All is silent save the steps of those who search, and
the sighs of those who mourn.
By the shore there was no boat. Over some
broken
oars, grass and weeds had crept. Ruins of
former
abodes were here and there visible; portions of
household utensils and implements of agriculture
scattered along the sands, and corroded with
moisture
;
mingled with these were fragments of chests,
torn charts, and mutilated books.
Among the latter was a thrilling relica Bible
with the name of
Susan Mortimer Elton
, covered
with sanguine spots. Ah! were those fair eyes
resting
upon that blessed book when the destroyer
came? Was that pensive pilgrim there gathering
strength for her thorn-clad journey, when that
journey
was about to close? Sacred pages! did she
learn from you that earthly love, without divine, is
unsafe for the heirs of immortality? When her
heart's idol was broken, did she hearken to your
whisper, Come, weary and heavy-laden, and I will
give you rest?
Blood-stained Bible from Virginian sands! we
thank thee for thine enduring friendship, for thy last
holy offices to the Emigrant Bride.
E 2
LADY ARABELLA JOHNSON.
The honeysuckle o'er the porch hath wove its wavy bowers.
And by the meadow trenches blow the first sweet cuckoo flowers;
The wild marsh-marigold shines like fire in swamps and hollows
grey,
And I'm to be Queen of the May, motherI'm to be Queen of
the May.
The building rook will caw from the wind-swept, tall elm tree,
And the tufted plover pipe along the fallow lea,
And the swallow will come back again, with summer o'er the wave,
But I shall lie alone, mother, in my far mouldering grave.
Tennyson
.
Mother
, said the sweet voice of a young and
happy girl, shall I pass for a May queen of the
olden
time? A deal of trouble have I, and my
tire-woman
had to study out and fit up this antique
costume
.
The Countess of Lincoln might be forgiven for the
flush of maternal pride that passed over her usually
pallid and serious face as she gazed on the exquisite
beauty of the joyous creature before her.
Go to your grand-mother, my love; she can
instruct
you in all the mysteries of the toilet of her
own day. Though, if your dress should be
somewhat
of the composite order, it is surely not
unbecoming
.
With buoyant step the fair being glided through
the lofty halls of the baronial castle, and bowed her
graceful form before the stately countess dowager,
whose hair was silvered by time, though the fire of
her dark, aristocratic eye was but slightly changed.
Heyday, my Lady Arabella! Queen of the May
indeed! Come nearer, and let me arrange your
shoulder-knots. There should have been more starch
in your standing ruff. Turn round, and walk before
me a few times. Well, on the whole, it is quite as
well as could be expected. A merlin on your hand,
too! Indeed, where did you obtain that fine bird?
I supposed that a falcon was indispensable to the
array of a fine lady of the last century.
True; but I think I asked you where you
obtained
it.
It has been trained for the occasion, and was lent
me by a friend of the family.
Trainedfortheoccasionand lentbya
friendof the family! What possible need can there
be of blushing, my Lady Arabella, about a goshawk
and a friend of the family? I wish, however, that
you could have seen some of the belles of my day.
Why, I might have lent you some rich ornaments, had
you condescended to apply to me.
Dear grand-mother, have you forgotten how often
I consulted you about the dress worn by the queens
of May in the times of Mary and Elizabeth?
No, child, no; I gave you the best advice I could.
I was never fond of this kind of mummery for
noblemen's
daughters; it savors too much of the common
people. Would that you had been taught the
courtly
science of hawking. That was a right royal sport.
Majestically indeed did Queen Elizabeth ride; and
well do I remember when my Lord Montacute
entertained
her at his castlefor I had also the honor
to be invitedhow she would take with her falcon
several birds before breakfast. One morning early,
a cross-bow being delivered into her hand, with due
ceremony she rode into the park and shot four fine
deer in the paddock, and was back before you would
think of rising. Truly, after she was seventy years
of age, she delighted in the chase, and managed her
steed and falcon as well as ever. How many of
you, dainty, fair-weather dames, will do as much?
Arabella had been trained to listen with a martyr's
patience to the repetition of old-world stories; but
now, as soon as she perceived that she might be
released
,
bending with respectful observance, she
bounded
away like a young gazelle.
The park, to which she hastened, was like shorn
velvet; and the feet of those high-born ladies tripped
there as gayly as those of the peasant girl who feels
the breath of spring in her heart, and exults, she
knows not why. A select party were assembled, and,
amid songs and flower strewings, a crown of fresh
blossoms was placed on the head of the chosen Queen
of May. A sumptuous entertainment was spread in
bowers erected for that purpose, and under the
kingly
oaks.
Afterward the servants, in their best attire, danced
around the lofty May-pole, and partook of
refreshments
bounteously distributed. It was the pleasure
of the young Earl of Lincoln to retain some of the
festivals of the olden time, and to make his domestics
happy. He felt that their toils were thus lightened,
and their homes rendered more dear.
On his arm leaned his widowed mother. Near
them stood a man of middle age and thoughtful
aspect
.
This was Dudley, the friend and faithful
assistant
of his father, through whose financial talents
the ancestral estate, formerly impaired, had become
unencumbered and rich in revenue.
Seest thou, my lord, he said, in a somewhat
quaint tone, the comely countenance of the damsel
who hath just crowned the Lady Arabella? She is
the daughter of the pious Lord Say. Heretofore I
have spoken of her unto thee. Right happy would
be the young nobleman who should win her to his
house and heart.
Color deepened on the cheek of the earl, and he
turned to speak to a young man in the group, of lofty
form, with a broad, pure forehead. Still the words
fell on an almost unconscious ear, so fixed was the
gazer's eye upon every movement of the Lady
Arabella
,
who, with perfect grace, and the lightness of a
happy heart, sported among her companions. When
the revels drew near a close, she waved her hand,
and the bird flew from it to his; and, though the
smile that accompanied the deed spoke only the
language
of girlish and guileless simplicity, yet to him
it was beautiful and priceless.
When another May shed its gifts on the earth,
the loveliness of that fair creature had come forth
into rarer and more exquisite ripeness. It had taken
a different and higher character. Deeper thoughts
sat upon the brow, and a more serene happiness;
the thought gave proof of an earthly love, the
happiness
of a heavenly piety. Both these guests had
become
residents in her bosom. One spoke in the
tender
glance, in the varying rose-tint of the alabaster
cheek; the other, in forgetfulness of self, in high
resolve
,
in tireless charity, in every meek and sweet
modification of womanly duty.
Month after month glided away on swift and
blissful pinions. Pure love clad earth in
brightness
,
and the faith of the Gospel made it as the gate
of heaven.
Winter resumed its sway. Ample fires diffused
warmth through the spacious apartments
appropriated
to the Countess Dowager of Lincoln, and the
evening lamp revealed her in close conversation with
the young earl.
My lord, I have no doubt that this reference to
me is but an idle ceremony. Young people make
up their minds about matrimony, and then consult
their elders, merely to give countenance to their
choice. Yet I must say, that I deem you no very
vigilant guardian of the noble blood of our house.
Your own meek bride, the daughter of the Lord Say,
I like well. The marriage of Frances with Sir
Ferdinando
Gorges I approved; but I never sanctioned
that of Susan with Mr. Humphrey; and now it seems
you advocate the suit of another commoner, and that
to the most beautiful of your sisters.
Mr. Johnson, madam, is my friend. His love is
reciprocated by Arabella. It was not the question
of their union which I wished to submit to you, but
one still more trying. You know, dear and honored
lady, that the signs of the times are dark.
Religious
liberty is invaded, and portents of revolution are
abroad. Attention has been turned to our American
colonies as a place of refuge in case these fears should
be realized. It has been deemed expedient that
they receive accessions of men of wealth, influence,
and education. Such are ready to proceed thither.
Among them, Mr. Johnson has received a high
appointment
in the government of New England. He
has accepted, and, of course
Of course
what, my Lord of Lincoln?
Of course
,
Arabella is to have a hut on that bleak shore, and,
should she chance to escape the perils of the sea, may
either die of starvation, or be scalped and eaten by
savages. Has her mode of life fitted her for such
hardships?
It has not; but in her soul is a heroic courage,
a holy desire to do good. My revered father, your
beloved son, would have strengthened her in this
self-devotion
.
Methinks I hear his voice from the
mansions
of celestial joy, `Daughter, go, and the Lord
be with thee.'
A chord was touched, to which the heart of the
aged countess ever responded. The image of her
son still ruled her spirit with a magician's power.
Her voice grew tremulous as she inquired,
Has the mother consented?
She freely gives her darling to the great duties
which she has chosen, and to God, in whom she has
believed. Let her cheerful resignation be our
example
.
F
Will you give me permission to bring
Arabella
to receive your blessing, ere you retire to
repose
?
He left the room, and soon re-entered, leading his
sister. She knelt at the feet of her father's mother,
and buried her face in the deep, rich folds of her
garment. The pride of the aged countess was
vanquished
by this affectionate and lamb-like
deportment
.
Tears coursed down her withered cheeks as
she laid both her hands upon her head, and whispered,
God bless thee, my poor child! God Almighty
bless thee!
Spring began to breathe upon the frosts; but she
wrought tardily, as if her heart was elsewhere, or as
if she even bore traitorous likeness to the winter she
had promised to subdue. The sigh of her fitful winds
added sadness to the parting scene in the castle of
the Earl of Lincoln. There a young bride, around
whom the spell of loveliness was wrapped as a
mantle
,
bade adieu to the objects of her earliest love.
She had taken her last look from every window on
each feature of the landscape; she had stood under
the ancestral oaks, and blessed them for the many
times they had taken her lovingly under their
canopy
;
and lingered among her flower-beds, though
only the snow-drop and the crocus came forth to bid
her farewell.
And now, the last hour had come. Inexpressibly
tender, yet calm as a seraph, was her parting from
the aged countess, and her brothers and sisters;
though the two youngest ones, in whose sports she
had mingled, while she aided in their education, clung
sobbing to her garments. A second time she threw
her arms around her eldest brother.
My noble brother, thou hast been to me as a
father
.
Heaven reward thee!
Still she paused. The most bitter drop in the cup
remained. She evidently shrank from it. Yet it
was but for a moment, and that moment was a prayer.
Then she flung herself upon the neck of her mother.
Long and tearful was that embrace. And then the
beautiful being raised her head like a lily from the
rain-storm. There was a murmured solace, each
to the other, as they parted,
In that brighter world, sweet soul, in that
brighter
world!
Ships were riding at anchor on a thronged shore.
There were tender partings, sad separations of
linked
spirits ere the sails spread, and glided gracefully
along their path of waters. Then burst forth a strain
of music, solemn, sonorous, the hymn of the pilgrims.
It grew sweeter and more faint on the distance. A
freshening gale swept its cadence from the listeners
on the strand. But the enthusiasm of the moment
died not away, among those voyagers to the far
western
world. Unblenching spirits were there, stayed
upon omnipotent strength.
In a recess of the cabin of the principal ship sat
the bride of Johnson. He knelt beside her. Her
face, veiled by its wealth of tresses, rested upon his
shoulder. As she raised it, there was the calm
expression
of a holy trust.
Think not, my love, that my heart misgave me,
because it so clung in the last embrace to her who
watched over my cradle; for, as my Redeemer
liveth
,
I had rather thus follow thee over the sea to a
home in the wilderness, than, without thee, to dwell
in the courts of princes. Where thou diest will I
die, and there will I be buried.
As she spoke, her tender tones gathered depth,
and light streamed through her eyes from the altar
of a fervent soul. The voice of him who responded
was choked with emotion.
The Lord do so to me, and more also, if aught
but death part thee and me. Yet the vow of the
Moabitess
is weak. Death shall not separate us. It
will be but the dawn of a brighter day, of an
eternal
union.
Slowly the patient vessels ploughed the deep.
The second moon was approaching its wane. Its
rays silvered the broad Atlantic. Many of the
emigrants paced the deck, gazing upon the quiet
scene.
See, said Johnson, whose arm supported the
fragile form of his wife, how every rising billow
takes a portion of brightness, and bowing its laden
crest, is seen no more.
Methinks we are long upon these waters, uttered
a deep, manly voice. Turning, they saw Winthrop,
the appointed Governor of the Massachusetts,
standing
in the strong shadow of a mast, against which he
leaned.
Were my Margaret thus by my side, Johnson, I
might moralize like you about the tossing ocean, and
still keep my happiness secure.
I see not here your son, young Henry Winthrop,
said the Lady Arabella. I thought he was to have
been of our company.
He was left behind when we sailed from the
Cowes. Doubtless, he is now upon the wide sea in
some one of the fourteen vessels that compose our
fleet. I regret the mistake that separated him from
me.
An eye that never slumbers will look with a
fatherly care upon both.
Ever ready art thou, with sweet and devout
consolations
,
my Lady Arabella. But a parent hath
many cares which the newly-wedded comprehend
not.
Truly, Henry Winthrop is a sprightly youth, and
of an amiable spirit.
From his very accomplishments, his faults do
grow. He is warm-hearted and trustful. Impatient
is he, also, and balanceth not means with ends. He
hath been some time married, and yet is he but a boy.
Had he the gravity and discretion of John, my
first-born
,
I should feel no anxiety though he were a
voyager
among strangers, or even with evil men.
Do you not often think of your babes, sporting
under the shady trees of their fair home at Groton?
5 F 2
I see them in my dreams; their little voices
come to me like the chirping of young birds. And
at midnight my prayer goes upward that He who
forgetteth not the raven's nest will keep them and
their loving, brooding mother.
See how the Talbot seems to sleep upon the
waters
,
said Dudley, joining their group. I saw the
Ambrose when the sun went down, looming up, large
and high, like a living thing. A sharp look-out do I
keep upon our three companions, pioneers as we are
in this expedition. But none cut the waves with such
dignity as the Arabella. Feels she not the honor of
the name she bears?
I have ever thought, said the Lady Arabella,
that her old name, the Eagle, was fitter for an
admiral-ship
,
because the king of birds doth bear
himself
so nobly. But look how the Jewel, our
light-bearer
,
runs before us toward yon dark-lined cloud,
like a glow-worm.
The evening air grows chill, my love, said
Johnson
.
It would be safest to be sheltered from it;
and he wrapped his cloak around her as she
descended
,
with a nursing tenderness.
I like not that circle around the waning moon,
said Winthrop to the captain.
It bodes no good, governor. God grant us soon
to see the fair New England coast.
The next morning lowering clouds skirted the
horizon. Winds muttered in the distance, and
slowly
rose, as if for vengeful deeds. The ships tossed
wildly. Night closed in with thick darkness, save
when lightnings pierced its sable canopy. Every
timber creaked and groaned. It would seem that
the ships themselves, in pain, mourned the misery of
those whom, having received to their bosom, they
were too weak to succor.
To the uninitiated, the tumult of a storm at sea is
ever appalling. Shut below, they hear the fearful
conflict of blast with billow, the moan of the smitten
vessel, the shriek of the commander's trumpet, the cry
and confusion of the people, who are at their wits'
end. The thunder of the captain's, and the
shouting
,
alarm the poor novices, and the crashing of
every
spar is to them as a death signal. Neither are
their apprehensions quieted, if, venturing to look
above, they see the sailors running hither and
thither
with their dim lights, or climbing, with spectral
aspect, among the slippery shrouds.
In the cabin of the Arabella, friends and families
were clustering together. From many an agonized
group rose the wail of grief, the weeping of
childhood
,
or the voice of prayer.
Husband, said the Lady Arabella, if our bed
is now in the deep, our spirits shall go up together,
and so be forever with the Lord. Glorious hope!
How much sweeter to me than the thought of
having
thee first taken, and living on lonely years of
bitterness
without thee.
Would to God, my dearest, in this most awful
hour, thy calmness was mine. Would that no strong
desire of life with thee, no memory of unrepented
sin, rose up to trouble the soul.
He clasped her closer to his bosom, as though he
would fain shield her from the surge, which they
expected
soon to ingulf them.
Why dost thou withdraw from me, love? It is
impossible for thee to stand, while the ship so
terribly
rolls and plunges.
She pointed him to a female who lay in the deep
sickness of fear, and whose wailing infant had fallen
from her arms. She desired to receive it in her own,
and Johnson laid it there. She pressed its little chill
cheek to hers, and lulled it with a low, whispered
melody. The poor innocent moaned for a while,
then, clinging closer to its protector, seemed ready
to pass into a peaceful dream.
Dearest, let me take the child, or restore it to its
mother. Its weight oppresses you.
Oh no, so please you, let it rest here. See, the
poor mother is almost as helpless as itself. How its
little hand clasps mine! It will be pleasanter to die
giving comfort to something, even the humblest
creature
.
How much pleasanter than worn out with
disease
,
and distressing others by groans and agony.
Is it not so, my love?
But he who was thus addressed, lingering on her
pure, heavenly smile, answered not. His heart was
absorbed in her, and in her danger. The hope of
life was not perfectly renounced, and the being who
made it most dear filled every thought.
All that night, and through the next day, the
tempest
raged. Then its violence abated, and the sob
of the sea, for many hours, was like that of a spent
maniac. The storm-driven vessels sought to draw
near each other, to consult how their rent sails,
shattered
cordage, and broken masts, might be best
repaired
.
The sun of the third day rose cloudless from the
deep. It was the Sabbath. What soothing repose,
what unutterable gratitude did it bring to hearts so
long agitated and sorrowing.
The deck of the Arabella was cleared for divine
service. Two clergymen, the Rev. Mr. John
Wilson
,
and the Rev. Mr. George Phillips, were of their
company. One led the devotions of the people in a
long and fervent prayer, the other rose to speak from
the words of the Psalmist,
He maketh a storm, a calm; so He bringeth
them to their desired haven.
After opening, and applying the beautiful passage
to their recent danger and deliverance, he
exclaimed
,
What favored orator hath such magnificent
sounding-board
as your preacher? What proud cathedral
hath such canopy as you blue, unsullied,
immeasurable
skies?
Who hath such an audience? The huge billows,
and the domineering waves that lash them, and the
monsters of the deep that play around us; the whale,
lifting up his huge bulk like an island, and the shark
with his terrible teeth, who following, would fain
devour
us, did not God stay him.
Again, I say, who hath such an audience?
Exiles
from the home of their fathers; crusaders,
without
the red cross banner, not stirred up by monkish
eloquence to fight the infidels for the tomb of Christ,
but going to tell the roving and red-browed heathen,
that Jesus died. I see before me the governor and
deputy-governor of the future colony, the
worshipful
assistants, who are to share in the cares of
government
,
the pillars of the Church, the parents of an
unborn nation, the babe born upon the waters, the
mother who is to nurse her offspring in a land
unknown
;
pilgrims, strangers, yet princely heirs of an
inheritance that fadeth not away.
With a freedom from constraint, which their
situation
justified, he spoke tenderly of their native realm,
of Charles, their monarch, then in the fifth year of
his troubled reign, and expatiated on the past, the
present, and the future, till the tears of memory and
of hope mingled on many a lifted brow. His
hearers
shrank not from the multiplied heads of his
discourse
,
nor were anxious lest its length should weary
them, but treasured up the precious word of
doctrine
as seed that was to fructify in their souls,
living
bread that could sustain them in the wilderness.
Still long days and wearisome nights were
appointed
to the voyagers. How often was the desired coast
hailed in imagination only to resolve itself into a
cloud again. Once, at the peep of dawn, a cry from
the helm of
Land ahead!
brought upon the deck a
rush of footsteps. Pale, haggard faces saw the
object
of their desire, and brightened with joy.
Soon after was a clapping of hands, and a cry of
young voices, The bird! the bird! A pigeon from
the shore folded its weary wing, and alighted among
the shrouds. The children regarded it with delight,
as, turning its head from side to side, it revealed the
changing shades of its irised neck. They crumbled
their stale bread, which the long voyage had
rendered
scanty, and strove to allure to nearer
companionship
this pretty aerial messenger from the New
World.
Oh! wife, dearest one, said Johnson, scent you
not the sweet land breeze?
It comes to me like the breath of my own
garden
,
where I sported with my little sisters. It lifts a
weight from my spirit. And she clasped her thin,
white hands in silent devotion.
They came to anchor in a narrow strait, between
islands whose green copses and thickets, seemed to
eyes which had so long gazed but upon sea and sky,
like the waving shades of Gerizzim to the Israelites.
Is not this one of the happiest days of our lives?
said Dudley, as the barque cut the waters which was
to bear them to their new home. Seventy-five days'
confinement on ship-board is long enough for a
landsman
.
How count you, Governor Dudley? asked the
Lady Arabella. I scarcely dare to question your
accuracy, but yet, from April 6th to this blessed 12th
of June, 1630, I make but sixty-seven days.
Ah! dear lady, you are thinking of your
loverlike
walks with Isaac Johnson amid the picturesque
scenery of the Isle of Wight, where you stopped to
refresh yourselves. But remember, only a few
partook
that privilege. We, poor matter-of-fact
people
,
who went not on shore since we weighed anchor
at the Coves on the 29th of March, have we not been
these seventy-five good days and nights on the salt
sea? Cupid may make his notes on a rose-leaf, or
a butterfly's wing, but deprived husbands, or still
sadder bachelors, must needs notch our records on
the dull log-book of lonely hearts.
Salem, where they landed, was pleasant, even in
its scarce-unfolded rudiments. Endicot and his
people
,
had labored there diligently, and judiciously.
Their welcome to the new-comers was warm, and
they gladly lent every aid in their power, to comfort
and accommodate them. One by one, the other
vessels
of the fleet arrived. In the course of that year,
seventeen were sent from the mother country, with
rich accessions to the colony.
A fortnight had elapsed since the arrival of the
Arabella
,
when a group were observed coming from
the water with slow, sad step. Evidently they were
bearing the dead. Suppressed murmurs rose here
and there: The poor governor! such a beautiful
young man! only yesterday arriveddrowned in
bathing! Who can bear the news to his father?
Ere they were aware, Winthrop stood among them.
There lay his son, whom but the day before he had
welcomed in the bloom of health. For a moment he
was pale as the clay over which he bent. The
bereavement
sank into his soul, and he sought his God.
He was long in solitary prayer. From that time he
spoke not of his sorrow. He gave himself day by
day to those cares for the colony which, from his
high station, devolved on him. But at night, in his
lone recess, the image of the fair youth, with his
dripping
locks, cut down in a moment, came over him,
and the cry of Oh, Henry! my son! my son!
showed how the unbending magistrate melted in the
agonized father.
Rude were the habitations that sheltered the early
colonists. In one of these, with a countenance
lighted
up by cheerfulness and love, Lady Arabella
Johnson
received her husband on his return from a short
but toilsome journey. Such comforts as she could
procure were around them; and, while she presided
at their rude table, she listened with delighted
interest
to the narrative of his expedition.
Separation from you but for one day, how
painful
,
dearest Arabella. Earnestly did I long for you
by my own side, July 30th, amid those solemn
exercises
in which we made covenant with God. It was
beneath the lofty canopy of a broad-spreading oak in
Charlestown that our pastor, John Wilson, prayed
and preached with a holy fervor. Then he, with the
Governors Winthrop, Dudley, and myself, taking
solemn
G
vows, laid the foundation of our infant Church.
It was a season to repay us for every hardship, every
toil, yea, to lift the soul gloriously above the earth.
How I regret that the laborious traveling in this
uncleared
land, prevents thy participation in scenes thou
wouldst so much enjoy.
But there existed a deeper reason why the
affectionate
wife should not accompany her husband. It
was written on her wasting brow, in the strange and
fitful brilliance of her eye. Still he, who was most
of all concerned in this change, was the last to
perceive
it. Her sweet smile, her animated manner,
whenever he was near, deceived him. He, indeed,
could not fail to observe the emaciation of her frame;
but he imputed it to the long, tedious voyage, an
effect
,
in some degree, common to them all.
Zealously
,
and with the sleepless ingenuity of love, he strove
to shelter her from every privation. It affected him
sometimes even to tears, to see her sustain the strong
contrasts between her present and former modes of
life, with a spirit as lucid and playful as the
sunbeam
.
But, as the summer verged toward its close, he
became alarmed at a debility which she could no
longer conceal. Then his apprehensions wrought
painfully with regard to the approaching winter.
I shall rear thee a bower, my love, which no blast
can penetrate. The imperishable heart of yon mighty
forest-trees shall be its walls, and I will line it with
the warmest fur of the beaver. Winter shall not
dare to look at thee, my bird, in the nest that I shall
build thee.
Be not anxious about me, dearest husband. This
rude hut is more precious to me than the proudest
castle without thee. I bless God for having brought
me to this New World.
He was troubled at the paleness of her brow, and
drew her head to rest upon his bosom, as he said,
I am ever hoping for the day when thou canst
travel with me to the beautiful tri-mountain, where
I trust to persuade the governor to establish our
principal city. As yet there is no residence upon
it save the lonely cottage of William Blackstone.
But the softness of its peninsular verdure, and its
swell above the blue waters, is picturesque beyond
description.
Raising upward, and fixing her eyes, she
murmured
,
Behold, I see a more goodly mountain. Are
not yonder the `trees of lign-aloes, which the Lord
hath planted?' Or are they the groves by my
father's
house, under whose shade I reposed, and
through whose boughs the trembling moonbeams
looked down?
Startled at her hollow tone, the fearful thought
for the first time swept over his soul, that the young
and beautiful wife was about to go home to the
country
of perfect love.
It was so. That strong pressure of her hand was
the death-clasp. There was no farewell save a moan,
in which the spirit had no part. It seemed but the
passing forth of breath from tubes where it had long
made music, or the sigh of a closed instrument,
vibrating
for a moment after melody had forsaken it.
And there sat the survivor, with the precious
burden
in his arms, the marble cheek resting against his
own. Expect us not to describe his grief, nor the
mourning of the colony over its benefactress and its
pride.
The desolated one lifted feebly his head from the
grave of his idol, to discharge the duties that
devolved
upon him. The welfare of a young country
struggling
into existence, and the relief of poverty and
sorrow, were his cares. He sustained them
faithfully
,
and in the spirit of meekness, but for pleasure on
earth he sought not.
It was on the 7th of September, 1631, that the
beautiful site of his selection received the name of
Boston. He was present at its baptism. But so
changed! It was evident to all observers that he
only endured life. For every service of liberality
or piety he girded himself, but his heart was with
the treasure that had flown.
Ere another autumnal moon had filled its horn, the
turf where he had projected a garden and a bower
for his beloved companion, was laid upon his breast.
The father of Boston gave to its
Chapel-burying-ground
the first hallowed dust.
The lives of our colonial ancestors abound not
in romantic adventure. Yet they are rich in
example
,
and in such traces as the heart cherishes with
pride. And if the name of Cecrops, through the dim
and distant wastes of time, hath come down to us,
burning like a bright, particular star, as the
founder
of Athens, let not
his
name be forgotten who
planted
in the western wild our crowning city, the Athens
of New England.
G 2
MARY RICE.
A violet by a mossy stone,
Half hidden from the eye,
Fair as a star, when only one
Is shining in the sky.
Wordsworth
.
A fair
girl was getting water at a spring. It
bubbled
up, clear as crystal, in its bed of shelving rock.
All around was in the deep solitude of nature. The
path to the fountain was imperfectly wrought out by
the track of feet, amid the tangled thicket. The
unpeopled
wild was overshadowed by dense masses of
forest-trees, which were now glowing with the rich
tints of a New England autumn, softened by the slant
rays of a declining sun.
But the being who alone gave life to this
landscape
,
bore no brow of hermit or of ascetic.
Apparently
between sixteen and seventeen, her
fully-rounded
form combined strength with the grace of
early womanhood. The beauty of health spoke
through her fine complexion and unconstrained
movement, while her hazel eye beamed with a
cheerful courage, as if, from the habit of looking on
the bright side of things, it had gathered brightness.
The light of her glad spirit seemed to flow forth
and mingle with the pure sunbeam, that was
streaming
through every nook and glade of the wilderness.
Suddenly a boy, younger than herself, made his
way through the interwoven copse-wood. Mary
Rice! sister! why did you not tell me that you
needed
water from the spring? It is not my will and
pleasure that you should be either a hewer of wood
or a drawer of water.
Regarding him with an affectionate smile as she
resigned her burden to him, they began to ascend
together a long and steep hill. Then a voice of
clear, rich music broke the silence.
Brother mine, I have thought of late that there
was sadness on your brow. Am I right?
Yes, to be sure. How can it be otherwise in
this strange, lone place. I have never been
contented
,
the whole year that we have lived here. I
wonder
why father removed from our old home in
Marlborough
.
It was far pleasanter there, where we
could see some other smoke besides our own, go
curling up into the blue sky. Here, if you take a
walk into the woodsand there is nowhere else to
walkthe deadly snake shakes its rattle at you, or
some serpent darts out a forked tongue, while the
only music is the howling of wolves, or the wild cat
purring in its lair.
Except the merry song of birds. Open your
ears just a moment now, to their melody. They
seem to be pouring out a full chorus, perhaps for our
especial benefit, perhaps their own sweet good-night
to each other.
The birds and you are particular friends, I
perceive
.
As for me, I think more of the war-whoop
of Indians. It is rather singular that father should
choose to settle on the very spot where they
murdered
6
Serjent, and carried his family away captive.
They would naturally come to the old place again
when they prowl for prey. Now you need not look
so sharp at me, Madam Rice, as though you took me
for a coward. I tell you, if the worst comes to the
worst, you'll find me as good a soldier as ever taught
the red-skins how to skulk back to their wigwams.
In the mean time, bold brother, let us try to be
happy, and to make others so. Is it not the duty of
us, who are young, to help and cheer our parents,
and not hang like mill-stones around their necks, to
sink them in deeper waters?
Many thanks for your sermon, most reverend
teacher. It is right good and wholesome doctrine.
But if Uncle Gershom Rice should remove here, as
I understand he talks of doing, and my eyes behold
another roof among yonder tall, gloomy trees, so that
we are not quite cast out from all the world beside,
it would vastly add to the force of your exhortations.
Dear brother, as long as there is love in our own
hearts for each other and our Father in heaven, let
us not displease Him by complaining. Come, cheer
up for my sake. I dare say you'll live to see this
fine country full of people. Who knows but a
future
race will number you among its very worthy
and renowned ancestors. Will not that be some
payment for fighting rattlesnakes, and running away
from bears and panthers? Come, my soldier that is
to be, bring us fresh milk from the cow, and see
what a nice supper I'll spread for you.
And the tender, earnest kiss which she pressed on
the brow of the boy, rekindled that blessed strength
which springs from the certainty of being beloved.
As he turned from her, she called playfully after
him,
Don't forget to put up our few sheep securely
for the night, from the visits of your particular friends,
the wolves. And look you, come back with a
pleasant
face. It mightily helps on the work of the
family
.
They parted at the door of a rude habitation, the
only one for miles. Its owner, Mr. Jonas Rice, a
man of singular firmness and intrepidity, resided
here with a large family of children, of whom Mary
was the eldest. He was literally the father of the
settlement; for, though an attempt to plant it had
been made nearly forty years before, the settlers
were soon dispersed through dread of the natives,
and the hardships of colonial life. After the death
of King Philip, and the cessation of the wars that he
sustained, another effort was instituted, which also
proved abortive.
A small tenement had been erected twelve years
before, near the site of the present lonely dwelling;
but it was soon destroyed by hostile Indians, and its
inmates massacred or made captive. To Mr. Rice,
therefore, belongs the honorary title of the father of
Worcester. Much would it have cheered him, amid
toil and peril, might he have caught a prophetic glance
of its present beauty, with its fair structures, its
anti-quarian
halls, its polished society, and its flourishing
schools, pulsating in full prosperity, like a busy heart
in the bosom of its rich territory.
As Mary Rice entered their humble abode, a
concord
of young voices greeted her. A flock of
children
were gathered round the fire, which the chill
of an autumnal eve rendered acceptable. One little
girl was bemoaning a finger torn by a thorn. The
good sister bound up the wound, and comforted her,
enjoining upon all to be quiet, and not disturb their
mother, who, with feeble health, had charge of a very
young infant. She herself fed, and lulled to needful
rest a child of two summers, and then, with elastic
step and skillful hand, busied herself in preparations
for the evening meal.
The table of rough boards was soon covered with
a coarse white cloth, in whose spinning and
bleaching
her industry had aided that of the mother. The
light corn-cakes and fresh butter were of her own
making. Large clusters of the native grape, now
fully ripe, were added by the care of her young
brothers. And as she arranged the simple viands,
and poured out the pure milk, her face was radiant
with that joy which gives health to the heart; a
consciousness
of making those whom it loves
comfortable
and happy.
The father came home from his work, and, raising
his hands, implored Heaven's blessing upon the
household board. By his side sat the meek and
cherished wife, pale, but convalescent; and while the
children partook, nothing loath, of the refreshment
provided, the hum of their voices, reverently lowered
in the parental presence, was like the music of a
bee-hive.
The repast finished, they drew around the blazing
fire. Young eyes turned spontaneously to Mary's
sweet, cheerful face, as buds to the sunbeam.
Tell me a story, said one, as you do, when we
have been good, about him who slew the giant with a
sling, and the smooth stones from the brook.
And about the gleaner who gathered sheaves in
the field to feed her poor mother.
And sing us some of those sweet songs that you
sing when the great wheel goes round, where you
spin the wool for our stockings, and our warm
winter
clothes.
It is time for your own evening hymn, and to go
to sleep, my little ones, said the kind sister, holding
the young babe for them all to kiss, and then placing
it tenderly in the father's arms.
There was a low, buzzing whisper among the
children
,
and close approximation of heads, as if in a
cabinet council. At length a chubby girl, who had
sometimes been called the favorite of her sire, taking
courage from that flattery, stood up close beside his
knee and said,
Father! we children want to know what you
are going to call the baby.
His name is Adonijah, was the emphatic reply.
Then, still more slowly, as if dictating for a family
H
record, he repeated,
Ad-o-ni-jah
Rice, born
November
7th, 1714, at Sagatabscot Hill, Worcester, in
the Bay State.
Whereat young eyes opened wider, and small
heads bobbed up and down, and here and there a
lisping tongue essayed the burden of the mighty
name. But the youngest framed their lips in vain to
the wonderful cognomen, and looked with new pride
on each other, and on the puny infant so unconscious
of its magnificent heritage.
That is just the grandest name I ever did hear,
said the child whose successful diplomacy had drawn
it from the paternal treasure-house.
Father must have read all the books of history
in the world, to have it ready so, the very minute he
is asked.
Sister Mary says it's in the Bible.
Yes, answered one of the older children, it is
the name of a man in Israel who was crowned king.
I wonder if our baby won't be a crowned king
when he grows up?
King, I dare say, over the rattlesnakes and
wolves of Sagatabscot Hill, murmured the
querulous
brother.
Now came the singing of their simple hymn, in
which every little one, quietly seated, and with a
countenance composed to gravity, mingled an
uplifted
voice. Then the good sister, bending over
their pillows, heard each utter the prayer in which
the devotion of childhood, half slumber and half
trust, had wrapped itself for ages. Perhaps the
scenery of their dreams was that night varied by the
image of their baby brother, with the unspeakable
name. Fancy, however, doubtless failed in
presenting
the picture that time unfoldedthe first-born son
of Worcester, in the garb, and with the dauntless
bearing of a soldier, jeoparding his life at the siege
of Louisburg; or, amid the carnage of West Point,
solacing himself, in the interval of many campaigns,
with the comforts of his home amid the Green
Mountains
of Vermont; or, after the independence of his
country was secured, passing on within the limits of
another century, and bearing on his hoary head with
honor the weight of almost ninety winters.
In the course of a few evenings, one of those
sudden
changes that mark the climate of New England
brought a tempest of snow, wildly sweeping over the
earth. The family grouped themselves around a fire
of huge logs, that imparted a strong heat and ruddy
flame. The father was busied in examining for one
of his sons some arithmetical exercises, made with
a fragment of chalk upon a slab of slate-stone. In
the long, quiet evenings, he pursued with the older
children a system of instruction, which Mary,
during
the day, as household duties permitted, modified
for the younger; a system which afterward, as
population
increased, he was induced to carry out more
efficiently, as the first preceptor of the infant
settlement
.
Such was the high regard for education
among our ancestors, that, ere it was possible to
establish
schools in the wilderness, the fireside was a
school, and themselves teachers, of the rudiments of
knowledge and the fear of God.
The little ones were gathered in a circle,
murmuring
in subdued tones, or listening to their elders.
Mary pressed the new-born infant to her bosom as
though it were her own, and the mother, who sat by
her side plying the knitting-needles, said tenderly,
Children, do you hear how the storm rages?
When the blast strikes the tall forest trees, they groan
as if in pain or fear. Shall we not love the good God
who shelters us, and spares our life and health?
She had scarcely done speaking, when one
exclaimed
,
Father! do I hear footsteps around the house?
The dog pricks up his ears as if he thought
something
was wrong.
The fine large dog, who had been carrying on his
back the youngest girl until she grew weary of sport,
and then stretched himself before the fire to sleep,
was seen occasionally to start and listen; then, as if
satisfied that his vigilance was misplaced, laid his
broad head upon the warm hearth again. Now he
sprang up growling, and rushed from corner to
corner
of the room, with his nose to the floor, as if
searching
for some crevice in the walls, and then made his
stand at the door, barking violently.
The husband, perceiving the faint color leave the
lips of his invalid wife, spoke of the hoarse echo of
the storm, and bade the dog be still.
But, father, father, I hear the moan of a human
voice. Some one is there, and in distress. Shall I
open the door?
The thoughtful colonist was not ignorant that the
Indians often counterfeited the wail of suffering, as
well as the howl of the wolf, when intent on cruelty.
Anxious not prematurely to alarm the mother, in
whose mind the tragedy once enacted on that spot
was ever vivid, he saw with satisfaction that his
gun, ready loaded, was at his hand, and that the
elder
boys came resolutely to his side, grasping such
weapons as they had been trained to wield. Mary,
with a clear, calm brow, sheltered the little ones,
who flew to her, and threw one arm around her
mother, speaking in a cheering voice, words of
comfort
.
Sister Mary knows how to load and fire as well
as any body, said a boy of five. She can take aim
too, for I've seen her practicing, and I'll help her,
and fight for her, as long as I live; breaking from
the circle of alarmed little ones.
There was a brief interval of breathless anxiety.
Separated for miles from any other habitation, who
could think of approaching their premises amid the
howling of such a pitiless storm, except some savage
horde intent on massacre? Footsteps were now
distinctly
heard, and a voice which the howling blasts
made unintelligible. Every hand except that of
infant
weakness grasped some defensive weapon, and
the feeble mother, inspired with courage, rose up
H 2
and wrapped her young babe for flight, speaking in
her heart to the God of strength.
A lull of the loud tempest made earnest words
audible.
Have pity! Oh, have pity! My father was
murdered
here. I have escaped from the Indians. I am
Thomas Serjent. Give me shelter, ere I perish.
The door flew open. A youth partially clad in
Indian costume, and half enveloped in blinding and
adhesive snows, entered with feeble steps. A
momentary
excitement lighted up his wan countenance,
and God bless you! trembled on his lips. Then he
sank exhausted and fainting to the floor. The
alarmed
family chafed his temples and rubbed his chilled
limbs, eagerly essaying every means of restoration.
When somewhat revived and comforted by the
warmth of the fire, and nutriment cautiously
administered
,
to which he seemed to have been long a
stranger, but, more than all, cheered by expressions
of human kindness, his sad heart expanded, and he
would fain have related his story, with mingled sobs
of gratitude and grief.
But they forbade, and insisted on his retiring to
that rest which he so much needed. That night the
prayers of the father, in the midst of his kneeling
dear ones, went up with unusual fervor to Him who
had graciously overruled their fears, and, instead of
the ruthless savage, brought to their humble
dwelling
the exile and the orphan, that they might do
him good.
The pale and care-worn face of their guest,
gradually
assumed the hue of health and happiness.
Invited
by the master of the habitation to remain as
one of his own children, until something better should
offer for him, his gratitude to his benefactor knew no
bounds. All labor and service were counted joy,
and an added sense of security in their lonely
situation
was derived from his presence. Portions of
his history, which from time to time he related, and
whose features of death and sorrow were but too
familiar
to the ears of our early settlers, awakened
among the fireside listeners strong emotions of
sympathy
.
It was in such a fearful storm as that from which
I found shelter under your blessed roof, that the
savages
attacked my father's habitation. He had been
warned of the peril of dwelling in so solitary a spot,
while proofs of Indian depredation and massacre
seemed to multiply in the land. But he had become
attached to the fields which he cultured, and his
nature
knew no fear. It had become mid-winter, and
the cold was intense. The darkness of a
tempestuous
night gathered around us in the wilderness, yet
the five children sat happily with their parents at the
fireside, while the wild snows fell, and the forest
shivered at the shrieking blast.
We fancied that we heard, at first, sounds as of
the prowling wolf. Then the door was cleft by the
Indian tomahawk. My father rushed forward with
his gun to defend his family, and fell, covered with
gashes, a lifeless corpse. They drove my mother
and her children out into the tempest. She folded
in her bosom the youngest, little Mary, a sickly babe,
not two years old, and began, at their command, a
toilsome march through the drifted snows. We were
about to ascend a steep hill, when, oppressed with
grief and misery, and weak from ill health, she fell
in the rear of the train. The leader of the party
paused, and, not appearing to notice her, bent his
keen eye into the depths of the forest, as if descrying
game, or apprehensive of pursuit.
Thus the whole file passed by, and when the
wearied
woman came slowly on with her deep
heartwail
,
and her head bowed down upon the face of
her little one, a single stroke from his hatchet laid
her low. The affrighted child rolled from her arms.
As if something like pity dwelt in their savage
natures
,
they took up the poor babe, who was creeping
to cling again to its dead mother, and wrapped it in
their blanket, and gave it parched corn, and told it
not to cry. I was permitted to lead by the hand my
sister Martha, a child of four summers, while my two
brothers, eight and ten years old, were forced on in
front. We were separated ere we reached the
borders
of Canada, and I saw them no more. Whether
they all fell a prey to the tomahawk, or to the
lingering
pains of Indian captivity, or whether that still
worse fate befell them, of adopting the hateful
customs
of Roman and pagan life, is known only to that
God who, through stern trials of bereavement,
famine
,
and misery, so mercifully led me to this ark of
refuge.
A burst of sorrow closed his narrative. Yet at
different
times resuming it, he depicted the hardships
of his own lot amid Canadian wildsthe strange
mixture of noble traits with degrading cruelty, that
often marks the character of the aboriginal
American
,
and the remarkable providences that favored
him in effecting his escape, during a nightly revel,
when his usually watchful masters ventured from
their northern clime to explore the interior of New
England, having been lulled to security by his
apparent
contentment during a captivity of twelve years.
Reinforced by this youth, the industrious settler,
with his two eldest boys, vigorously pursued the toils
preparatory to winter's comfort, which were facilitated
by the return of a brief interval of mild weather. In
the house was heard the clear voice of a happy child,
Mary, sister Mary, you promised us, if we would
learn our lessons well for a whole week, to take a
walk with us, and gather nuts on some fine day. Have
we not been good? See! the snow is all gone, and
the sun shines bright and warm. The squirrels have
been busy so long in carrying the nuts to their
houses
,
that we shall scarcely get our part.
So you wish to rob the poor squirrels. Your
brothers have already been beforehand with them,
and secured quite a hoard. But I surely gave you
such a promise, dear little scholars. And as you
have kept your part of the contract, I must not fail
in mine. If our mother consents, we will go early
this afternoon with our baskets, a rare party of
gleaners.
They leaped and shouted for joy. How happy is
childhood with simple pleasures, ere the tastes of
artificial
life tinge and trammel its enjoyments.
Autumn
,
which had been unusually changeable,
sometimes
fostering the misty, luxuriant loveliness of the
Indian summer, and anon breaking out in the harsh,
fitful caprices of winter, was now taking a final
farewell
.
It moved mournfully, like one bearing
adversity
,
and musing upon lost wealth. It seemed to be
contrasting the memory of golden harvests with the
penury of naked trees and frost-bound earth, while
the cold, blue streams, ready to become ice, mocked
at its broken sway and departed glory.
But no such sad reflections oppressed the merry
troop who bounded through the forest glade. Their
glad hearts made the drear landscape beautiful.
They indeed found themselves rather too late for the
autumnal spoil of nuts, yet occasionally a few were
discovered, over which they exceedingly rejoiced.
At length, the careful elder sister warned them that
it was time to return home. Just then a strange
sound in the thicket alarmed them, and through
tangled
branches they saw two large, glaring eyes of a
panther. He at first seemed in a quiescent state,
but rising leisurely, prepared to move toward them.
Mary, seizing the two youngest children by the
hand, and bidding the others not to separate from
her, fled with breathless speed. The frightful
creature
followed, not with rapid pace, but steadfastly;
his feet patting among the rustling leaves and fallen
underwood, and his cat-like breathing convinced
them that he was near. As if sure of his prey, he
glided quietly along, till, growing excited in the
pursuit
,
he gained upon them, and reaching a more open
place, seemed crouching for a spring. Mary, with
her flying group, turned a short angle to a more
closely-wooded path, illusively hoping that if the
leap were in a right line, they might thus avoid it.
At that moment was heard the sharp report of a
rifle. The huge monster sprang high in air, uttering
a shrill cry, and then, with a deep, prolonged growl,
rolled and quivered in tides of blood.
A stately Indian emerged from the forest. The
dread of captivity gave new speed to the fugitives.
A commanding yet gentle voice arrested their flight.
Stay! I will not hurt a hair of your heads.
Poor tremblers! Ye are taught to hate alike the
wild beast and the Indian. Look! Did not the
Indian
slay the fierce creature that would have
destroyed
you? Go now in peace, and when you reach
your home, say that the outcast Indian saved you.
Tears of gratitude flowed over the face of the
young girl. Yet strange awe enchained her tongue,
so that she could scarcely articulate Thanks!
thanks!
Rushing feet approached. The sound of the rifle
spread alarm, and Jonas Rice, with all the efficient
members of his family, flew in arms to the spot. A
little girl hasted to meet them.
Oh father! father!
he
saved our lives. He
killed the dreadful beast. He, the good red
Indian
.
What painter could have sketched that group on
the verge of the forest. In the center, the excited
father
,
his vengeful purpose suddenly checked,
clasping
the little daughter who had borne the embassy
of peace, like the dove with the olive leaf, over the
heaving deluge; by his side, his two sons, gazing
on the monster, still writhing in its death-gasp; and
the rescued youth shading his eyes with his hand,
as if forbidden by innate hatred to look upon an
Indian except as a foe.
Opposite was the red man, erect and lofty, his
temples sprinkled with gray. Mary stood near him,
pale as marble, yet more beautiful than ever, with
holy emotions; two fair children clung to her side,
and a little one of three summers, hid its sweet face
in her garments.
The stately chieftain, resting on his rifle, spoke as
one in sadness, yet with a firm tone.
White man, these forest lands were my fathers'.
I roam here this day, a stranger and alone, yet not
unarmed. Since thy people came among us, we
have need of such weapons. With mine have I
saved the lambs of thy flock. Take them back to
thy fold, and when ye too much hate the poor
Indian
,
remember that he slew them not.
Tears glistened in the eyes of the father. He
stretched out his hand: Come, come to my house,
that we may bless you there.
Sagamore John enters not the cabin of any white
man. The ghosts of his fathers murmur at midnight
that he is the enemy of their race. This hand hath
shed their blood; yes, the blood of fighting men.
But that of the woman and the babe hath not stained
my garments.
Sagamore John is old. His head used to tower
among the warriors, like Wachusett above the hills.
Now the snows that settle upon it melt not away
when spring returneth. The blood that used to burn
in his breast at the sight of thy fighting men is like
the brook that the frost overtaketh. What have I
to hope or to fear any more from man?
Go now, if thou wilt, to thy governor, and
denounce
me. I read hatred in the eye of one nearest
to thy side. Drag me, if thou canst, before thy courts.
At their word have my people been shot down like
dogs, with none to bury them. I, too, have been in
their prisons. I know the mercies of white men.
But my soul defieth their power. Brave, and
without
shame, shall it go to the shades of its fathers.
And he drew himself up haughtily to his full
height, while his brow enkindled with a chieftain's
pride. Mary laid her hand upon his arm, and said,
We bless you; we will pray for you to our God.
His fiery eye grew calm, and assumed its native
coldness.
7 I
Thy soul is beautiful, though thou art of that
pale race whose hearts are hollow and cold.
Knowest
thou that I have seen the teacher Eliot, that old,
good man? He hated not the poor Indian. He
came to my cabin. The best of my food I set
before
him. He slept upon my own bed of skins. I
could not have harmed him any more than the
mother
who nourished me.
I was then young, and the blood in my heart was
high; but I bowed down when he prayed. He told
us of a Great Spirit whose name was love. He said
it was written in His Book that men should do good
to their enemies. Thy God is not my God, yet I
remembered His words. They fell from the lips of
that old, meek prophet like music.
Now I go back to my woods, to be hunted like a
beast of prey. But my heart will be lighter in my
bosom when death cometh, that I have saved the
poor innocents.
He disappeared in the recesses of the forest, and
they returned to their dwelling. Henceforth their
history was unmarked save by those events that
checker the course of an advancing colony, which in
about four years numbered two hundred settlers,
and more than fifty habitations.
Mr. Gershom Rice, the brother of its bold pioneer,
was the first to plant a family by his side. He has
also the honor of being the first to open his house for
the social worship of God, and the first to call forth
from the half unbroken wild the blossoming boughs
of a fair fruit-orchard. The benefit of his labors and
example was protracted to extreme longevity. In
the words of the Swedish poet,
There flow'd behind that old man's ears
The silver of a hundred years.
The ancestor of Worcester also lived to a good
old age, until he saw the slender branch of his
planting
,
ingrafted on the stock of a broad-shadowing and
independent nation. Mary, our heroine, carried into
her own home the virtues which had rendered that
of her father so happy; for whoever is faithful in the
duties and affections of a daughter and elder sister,
has given hostages not to fail in those of a wife or
mother.
In those early days, when a man's house was
literally
his castle, and his means of defence within his
own domestic circle, the gentler sex partook of his
heroic spirit. The languor of delicate nerves then
constituted no attraction. The dangers that
surrounded
woman, awakened no morbid apprehension,
but girded her with new strength to act, to suffer, or
to solace. She vindicated her title to the name by
which she was first introduced to her partner in
Eden, a help-meet for him.
The simple life of our early settlers, though
replete
with hardship, was favorable to the growth of
domestic virtues. Like a rough and thorny sheath,
it guarded well the hidden kernel. The philosophy
of moderated desires, which in our own times is too
oft an unlearned or a despised lesson, was the
birth-right
of our ancestors. Courage was kept in
exercise
.
Industry had no time to slumber. Faith sprang
upward to a stronger life.
These habitudes wrought visibly on the nature of
woman. Lofty rooms, and luxurious carpets, and
the attendance of many servants, were not essential
to her happiness. So that her heart was right and
her hands busy, health was wont to invigorate her
frame, and her brow to be tinged with the beauty of
the affections. Wealth and fashion, which often
foster
but the weeds of our nature, had no chance to
sow for her, seeds of self-indulgence and vanity. The
temptations of artificial life were not there to lead
her away from the plain intent of her Maker, until
she became no longer a helper to her husband or a
true mother to her children.
Not by indolence or extravagance did she place
obstacles in the way of matrimony, thus driving to
disappointment or vice those to whom she might have
been as a ministering angel. Why is it not so still
in every part of our Republic? Why should she
ever choose to be as a bubble on the foam of life, or
a burden to sink her companion deeper in troubled
waters? Rather let her firmly bear with him its
storms, and redouble its sunbeams by reflecting them
from the mirror of a cloudless spirit, until, time's
brief voyage past, they enter the haven of eternal
life.
FALL OF THE PEQUOD.
We, the rightful lords of yore,
Are the rightful lords no more;
Like the silver mist we fail,
Like the red leaves in the gale,
Fail like shadows when the dawning,
Waves the bright flag of the morning.
M'Lellan
.
The
infancy of Connecticut was replete with peril.
The dangers that surrounded its cradle, seem
sufficient
to have extinguished any common germ of
colonial
existence.
The pilgrim-fathers at Plymouth possessed some
advantages over the other settlers of New England.
They held the right of primogeniture, a prescriptive
claim to the regard of posterity. They came first to
its solitary shores. They first breathed amid its
unbroken
forests the name of Jehovah. Their
footsteps
have been traced with somewhat of that
enthusiasm
which hovers like the white-wing'd sea-bird
around the voyage of Columbus, the world-finder.
There was a severe, yet simple, majesty in their
attitude
,
which history has preserved and mankind
venerated. Their privations have been recorded and
remembered. If they have not
monopolized
our
sympathies
,
they have put in a prior claim to them. They
have made the Rock of Plymouth a Mecca to the
patriot, and it is right that it should be so.
Still it is questionable whether their sufferings
surpassed
those of the little band who, in the year 1635,
took leave of their friends in the Massachusetts, and
came as pioneers to the banks of the Connecticut. A
trackless wilderness lay before them. The compass
and the stars of heaven were their guides.
Mountains
,
and thickets, and morasses, and unfordable
streams were among the obstacles of their path.
The shortening days of autumn interrupted their
progress; and for the chill and dreary nights their
shelter was the forest, and the earth their bed.
Among the sharers in this adventurous enterprise
were delicate women, inured to affluence in the soft
British clime, and young infants, who must have
perished
had it been possible for the heart of the mother
ever to grow cold. The season was inauspicious,
and marked by violent storms. So protracted had
been their journey, that, ere they could make
preparations
for safety and comfort, Winter, coming
before
his time, surprised them. Connecticut River,
so long the object of their hope, presented, on their
arrival, a broad surface of ice. It is recorded as
almost
an unparalleled circumstance, that it was that
year frozen entirely over on the 15th of November.
There was no welcome from Nature to the
toil-worn
strangers. The trees were leafless and silent.
The birds had migrated, and the provident animals
hidden themselves from the cold. The snow came
deep and drifted, and wild winds swept through their
insufficient habitations. To crown all, the vessels
which contained their provisions and articles for
household comfort, were wrecked in a tempest; so
that the sufferings of famine were added to their list
of hardships.
The red men of the forest, then numerous and
powerful, looked with pity on the pale, perishing
race. They saw them feeding upon acorns, and
brought them corn, and covered them with the skins
of the beaver from the terrible cold. They
discovered
,
and lent them aid in their perils through the
wilderness. Taking the sick and feeble in their
arms, they bare them through morasses and
rivulets
.
They did make of their bodies bridges and
boats unto our people, said a historian of the early
times.
But where now are the vestiges of that race whose
friendship preserved our ancestors? They who, to
the number of 20,000, spread themselves by the fair
streams and along the sea-coast of Connecticut,
where
are they?
Is a single one of their arbor-like
dwellings
to be found? Does a solitary canoe break the
surface of any of our streams? And who among us
remember the race who gave bread to our
perishing
fathers, or repay the deed of gratitude to their
wandering and degraded children?
The clergymen Hooker and Stone, who, with their
congregations, traversed, in 1637, the same
intervening
wilderness, to commence the settlement of
Hartford
,
wisely chose summer as the season of their
expedition
.
Hooker, to whose learning and eloquence the
noble
and the pious in his own native land had borne
high testimony, took part in every hardship with the
most cheerful courage. Sometimes bowing his
shoulder
to the litter in which his sickly wife was carried;
then raising in his arms some child of the party whose
little weary feet lingered behind; then comforting
the faint-hearted; and again, with inspiring smile,
recounting the joy of Israel, drawing near the
promised
land, until his flock fancied that in their own
path was the same guiding pillar of cloud by day,
and of fire by night.
A fortnight was spent in their journey, and, like
their predecessors, they slept without shelter. Yet
faith, continually sustained by the zeal and patience
of their guides, communicated vigor to their bodies,
and they endured without murmuring. The forests
through which they passed, and whose echoes had
hitherto replied only to the wolf, or the panther, or
the hunter's cry, became familiar with other sounds.
For, as the Christians proceeded,
They shook the depths of the forest gloom
With their hymns of lofty cheer.
Not a year had transpired since their choice of a
locality on the banks of the beautiful river which was
to give name to a state. May morning smiled on
them for the first time in their new abode. Rich
verdure quickened beneath their feet, and Nature
seemed anxious to efface the memory of winter's
unkindness. But deep care was on the brow of those
who watched over the welfare of the young colony.
The fathers of Connecticut met on that first day of
May in solemn council. A delegation from the
senior
settlements of Windsor, and Wethersfield, were
convened with the magistrates of Hartford, on affairs
of high import.
The Pequods, a fierce and powerful tribe of
natives
,
had discovered a spirit of aggression. Inroads
upon property and destruction of life were charged
against them. The expediency of a war was
immediately
decided upon, the number of soldiers
determined
,
and preparations commenced without delay.
To meet these requisitions, every family drew upon
the resources of its strength, or put in jeopardy the
springs of its existence.
It was on Wednesday, the tenth of May, that
ninety
soldiers, with military equipments, stood on the
banks of the broad river. True and faithful to their
need, their red-browed allies were ranged by their
side.
The Mohegan king, with seventy warriors, waited
the signal of his pilgrim friends.
It was an hour of stirring emotion. None spoke
or moved. It was felt that but one man could break
that silence, and that his words must be to God.
Hooker came forward. At his right hand were his
brethren, his flock, who had crossed with him a
tempestuous
ocean, exiles from the land of their fathers.
Which of these should return no more? Who should
fall in blood, and see his home no more? Mingled
with these was a more helpless group: the wife, the
mother, the sister, and the babe. They had come
down to the waters to bid farewell.
The holy man felt that he bare their griefs and
carried their sorrows, as he came forth into the
midst. His prayer was to the God of battles, the
God of the spirits of all flesh; and it lifted up the
souls of those who were to go, and of those who
remained
behind, till there seemed to them neither
danger nor sorrow in this brief world worthy to
appall
the heirs of immortality.
The voice of supplication ceased. There was a
brief pause. Then, stretching forth his arms, he
blessed the people in the name of the God of the
armies of Israel. In that high faith they parted.
Tender ones restrained the tear, lest it might
weaken
the heart of some loved protector. Children
imitated
the dignity of their parents.
The barques received their freight; the sails were
unfurled. One man lingered yet a moment behind
the rest. It was the Rev. Mr. Stone, the chaplain
of the expedition. He stayed to press the hand of
his colleague in the Church, and his friend in the
Gospel.
Go forth, said Hooker, blessed and holy
brother
,
bearing the armor of the Gospel. When the
waters
of strife abate, give heed to pluck the
first leaf
of olive
, for so it becometh a servant of the Prince of
peace.
The little fleet moved slowly and gracefully from
the shore. The fair river sparkled in the sunbeam,
and gave back the tint of the deep blue sky. The
foliage upon its banks was of surpassing beauty.
The towering oak lifted its unshorn head, and the
K
elm spread its umbrageous arms in rival majesty.
Amid the interstices of the forest, the sassafras and
dog-wood thrust forth their pale flowers, the wild
cherry hung out its feathery banner, and the fragrant
breath of the indigenous apple blossom was detected
in every breeze. Animal life, in its unresting forms
of pursuit or enjoyment, roved amid the luxuriant
vegetation. The squirrel threw itself from bough to
bough, as if ambitious to belong to the winged
tenantry
;
the fox ventured fearlessly from his covert;
and the otter, from some sloping declivity, plunged
suddenly into the deep waters, or, fearlessly
emerging
,
resumed his amphibious pastime. The thrush
poured forth from her newly-built habitation wild
strains of the richest melody; the azure plumage of
the jay gleamed in strong contrast with the garb of
the black-bird, whose keen eye was ever searching
for some planted maize-field; the partridge rose up
heavily on whirring wing; the shy quail sent forth her
clear, shrill whistle; and throngs of pigeons darkened
the bending branches.
This is truly a land, said Mason, the
commander
of the troops, for which a warrior might be
willing
to fight.
God hath given us a goodly heritage, replied
the chaplain. Would it were his will that we might
keep it for our sons, without this shedding of blood.
And there they stood together on the prow of the
leading vessel; the bold, strong man who had made
war his trade when the banner of England was borne
high in the battles of the Netherlands, and the meek,
unswerving servant of the cross, who deemed war
among the heaviest judgments of the Almighty. Not
inaptly did they personify their different professions,
like Gerizzim and Ebal, amid the mountains of
Israel
,
uttering the blessings or the penal thunders of
Jehovah.
As twilight drew her curtain, the banks between
which they glided, became more bold and steep.
Rocks reared castellated summits, till their frowning
shadows mingled on the bosom of the river, which
became compressed, and flowed on complainingly,
like an unsubdued spirit, chastened by adversity. It
seemed faintly to imitate the majesty with which the
more imposing Hudson wins the pass of the
Highlands
;
and then expanding in freedom and beauty,
embellished the romantic scenery where Middletown
was to choose her seat.
Yet the Connecticut gave but a tardy passage to
her first naval armament. On the third day of the
voyage, the Indian king demanded to be put on
board the vessel of the commander.
Chief of the white men, my warriors are not
content. They say your tall, white-winged birds
tread not the waters like their own light canoes.
They see the salmon leap up, and there is none to
take it. They see the horns of the deer glancing
through the forest, and their bows are hot in their
hands.
The waters and the winds are in the hands of
the Great Spirit, replied Mason. They obey him,
and not us. King of the red men, what shall be done
to satisfy your people?
Put our feet upon the green earth. Let these
great water-birds go on without us. We will meet
you at your fort, where the river weds the sea.
The Indians, according to their request, were set
on shore. They were seen pressing through the
closest thickets, and ascending the steepest rocks with
fleet foot and unbending form. In a few minutes
they disappeared amid the deep green of the forest.
But their shouts of wild delight were longer heard,
as they traversed their native soil, inhaling, with free
spirit, the pure, elastic atmosphere.
Five days these three vessels toiled on their tedious
voyage. Unskilled in the navigation of the river,
the mariners repeatedly ran aground, or laboriously
ploughed their way in the teeth of opposing winds.
Before their eyes was no vision of that stupendous
power which was yet to arise, binding both blasts
and billows in strange obedience. The plodding and
patient people of that age were cheered by no
pageant
of steam-propelled palace, instinct as with a
living soul, and treading down in the pride of its own
strength all elemental opposition. They would not
have believed, that on the very tide they buffeted so
wearily, an agent should come forth, resistless as the
planet in its orb, yet fashioned by the weakness of
human hands. They would have marveled at the
assertion that the mightiest effort of man, since he
became lord of this lower world, was not to rear the
wall of China, or to erect the Cathedral at Rome,
but to render the potent and tremendous power of
steam the vassal of his will, to play with him as
with a bird, and to bind him for his maidens.
The arrival of the fleet at the fort of Saybrook was
an occurrence of no slight moment. The tossing
pinnaces were moored, and the junction of the
slender
marine and land forces effected, where the
Connecticut
,
with her dower of mountain-rills and quiet
streamlets, meets her imperious lord, and loses her
sky-born tint in his fathomless wave.
The welcome of Captain Underhill, with his
garrison
of twenty men, notwithstanding the simplicity of
the times, was not wholly devoid of pomp and
circumstance
.
A broad banner floated, and a rude
flourish of martial music sounded from the shore as
the troops disembarked; and the two commanders
tendered each other the salutes which military
courtesy
prescribes.
We can spread for you no field of the cloth of
gold, said Underhill, nor even bid you to a palace,
notwithstanding we chance to be the highest
representatives
of England's sovereign majesty in this
corner of the New World.
Yet our meeting, replied Mason, involves
higher consequences than the boasted interview of
Henry VIII. and Francis I. No point of kingly
etiquette is here to be settled, but the life or death
of a nation. Here, too, are truer friends than are
8 K 2
wont to wait upon royalty, pointing to the Mohegan
allies, and cordially taking the hand of Uncas.
Indian friendship
, said the chaplain, shows
itself
by
deeds
more than
words
. It does not think
first of its own safety, or stop to calculate expediency,
when its object is in danger.
The hospitality of the fort was as ample as the
resources
which could be commanded in a primitive
state of society. The game furnished by the
Mohegan
hunters at their arrival was an important and
acceptable addition. In that stage of the colony
hospitality was not, like the careful sister of
Bethany
,
cumbered with much serving. Her aim was
not to consult variety or to indulge cost, or to
display
competition, but simply to satisfy appetite. The
climax of her ambition was to hear her guest say,
it
is enough
.
During detention by a storm, the leaders
conversed
freely on the plan of their projected
expedition
.
The instructions of the court, said Mason, are
precise, to land at Pequod harbor and proceed
directly
to their fort. But the moment our sails are
discerned
we shall be watched with Indian vigilance, and
the attempt to disembark may cost the lives of half
our men. Even should a landing be safely effected,
we may be entrapped in some ambuscade, ignorant
as we are of their country; so that it is possible for
us to fall without a battle, leaving none to bear tidings
of our fate. My advice is, therefore, to come upon
them unawares, through the Narragansett country,
and attack them by surprise.
I am averse, said Underhill, to a departure
from the injunctions of the honorable court. Neither
do I like that resort to stratagem which we blame
so much in the Indians. Our men would dread a
march through the wilderness. By detaining them
longer from their homes, the agriculture on which
their subsistence depends must be impeded. Who
can say, also, that their families, by this
protracted
absence, may not be exposed to savage
massacre
?
Delay, said Mason, is a lighter evil than
extermination
.
You will not, I trust, doubt my
courage
;
yet prudence is an essential ingredient of a
well-balanced courage. With all our devotion to
our country, we are not a match for twenty times
our number. By passing through the territory of
the king of the Narragansetts, we may obtain his
aid. Uncas, what is your counsel in this matter?
The red-browed chieftain had been a silent, but
deeply attentive listener. Now, though summoned
to give his opinion, he answered reluctantly.
Miantonimoh looks one way and rows
another
.
What does he mean? said Mason.
That the Narragansett king is double-minded,
and not to be trusted, replied Underhill.
Uncas has somewhat of the wily policy of
Ulysses
,
said Mason. He fears to commit himself.
In this case, he has probably some personal pique.
His suffrage goes for nothing.
Neither commander was disposed to recede from
his ground. Their officers were also divided in
opinion
.
In this dilemma, they agreed to submit to the
decision of the chaplain. In those days, veneration
for the sacerdotal character was exemplified by men
of the highest rank, and an essential element of
education
.
The chaplain, fully aware of the importance
of this arbitration, would, perhaps, willingly have
avoided its responsibility. But his creed taught him
not to shrink from duty. That night no slumber
visited
his eyes. In deep solitude he viewed the
contested
point in all its bearings. He weighed every
argument that had been adduced. He pondered their
probable results. He spread the cause before Him
who heareth prayer, and implored the guidance of
his wisdom.
With the early light of morning, he communicated
to the council his opinion in favor of the route
through the Narragansett country. That day the
Captains Mason and Underhill sailed with their
forces for Narragansett Bay, leaving twenty men
behind
for the defence of the colony. On Saturday,
May 20th, they landed, and marched to the
plantation
of the sachem, Canonicus. From thence they
sent an embassy to Miantonimoh, asking permission
to pass through his territory, and soliciting his aid
against the common enemy. He came to meet them
with a large body of warriors. He was tall, slightly
made, and of a less commanding presence than the
Mohegan king. The plan of thus assaulting the
Pequods
surprised him by its boldness. Still he
maintained
that unmoved manner and countenance,
beneath
which the pride of the Indian is accustomed to
conceal emotion. He received the confidence of
the colonial commanders in silence, and requested
an interview with Uncas.
Does Mohegan go with the pale faces? was his
first question.
The chain of our friendship is bright, replied
Uncas. One end of it is in the hand of the Great
Spirit, and the other in the grave of my nation.
Until
it sleeps there, the chain must not rust or be
broken
.
Sassacus can bring as many arrows as the spring
puts forth green leaves in the forest.
We shall steal upon Sassacus as the snake winds
through the sleeping grass. He shall see blood ere
he knows what hand hath drawn it.
Sassacus hath a quick ear and a long arm.
Twenty-six chiefs obey him. Whom he will, he
slayeth. He is among them as a god. And a
gleam of superstitious awe passed over the brow of
Narragansett's king at the thought of that fierce
monarch
,
who struck terror into every foe.
Miantonimoh, go with us! You are a brave
man. If we can shake the Pequods from their strong
holds, you may sit down upon the sea-coast, and be
as great as Sassacus.
This double appeal to ambition and cupidity, was
not in vain. The king of the Narragansetts paused,
as if balancing the probabilities of profit and loss.
He then suddenly exclaimed,
But what are these English
, for whom you are so
ready to raise the tomahawk? Before the Pequod
warriors, will they not be as old women?
Come and see
, was the laconic and somewhat
indignant
reply.
I will go with you, said Miantonimoh, proudly.
Five hundred bows shall accompany me.
Uncas imparted the result of his negotiation to the
commanders, who greatly rejoiced, and viewed it as
a divine interposition in their favor. Leaving their
vessels, they commenced the march through the
wilderness
.
Tangled forests, thorny thickets, and
protracted
swamps of coarse grass, which sometimes
attained
a height of three or four feet, opposed their
progress. Added to these obstructions were the
oppressive
warmth of the weather, and a scarcity of
provisions. The new corn having been but recently
planted, and that of the previous year expended, they
had scarcely a better substitute for bread than the
roots dug at random in their march. A small
quantity
of parched corn from their Indian friends, was
esteemed a luxury.
Almost exhausted with their toilsome march
through this trackless country, they arrived, at the
close of a sultry day, within two miles of Fort
Mystic
,
and made their humble encampment in a valley
between two hills. Even the rocky pillow was sweet
to our wearied ancestors. Little did they imagine
that they rested so near the spot where Groton
monument
should arise, to tell the traveler of battle
between the land of their birth and that of their
adoption. Had their slumbers been visited by visions
of such warfare, would they not have accounted it as
the strife of the brothers in Eden, and grieved like
our first parent, when it was shown him by the
archangel
?
The sentinels, who were placed considerably in
advance of the army, heard repeated echoes of wild
laughter and savage mirth, breaking upon the
stillness
of midnight. They came from the fort where
the Pequod warriors held a festival, their last on
earth; ominous as the revelry of the armies of France
on the eve of the battle of Agincourt. At length,
deep silence settled on the fortress of the red men.
The moon came up clear in the heavens. Mason
and Underhill roused their soldiers. Quickly
arraying
themselves, the chaplain, in few and solemn
words, commended them to God. They mused in
their hearts on those deep, low tones, which linked
their hopes with the name of the Highest, while
pursuing
their way without a whispered sound,
guarding
even their lightest footfall. In the heart of every
man was a picture of his home, where wife, or
children
,
or aged parents lay in the arms of sleep, and
whose helplessness he felt himself commissioned to
defend. The valor that springs from such
guardianship
is not like other valor. It imagines itself an
image of His might, who protects a slumbering
world, and believes even its severity to be holy.
They reached the hill which was crowned by the
rude, yet formidable fortress of the Pequods. As
they began to ascend, their allies, the Narragansetts,
were perceived hanging back, like a dark cloud
around its base. Mason commanded them to
advance
.
They still lingered.
Is it perfidy or terror that detains them? he
demanded
of the Mohegan king.
They fear Sassacus, he replied, calmly, more
than the Spirit of Evil. Miantonimoh's heart is now
like water at the sight of yonder fort.
Give them orders not to fly, said Mason, but
to stand still, and see how brave men fight.
He then divided the little band of seventy-seven
soldiers, between himself and Underhill, for the
attack
.
So silent were their movements, that they
stood under the very walls of the fort without
discovery
.
Just at that moment a dog barked. Like
the winged sentinel of Rome, he alarmed the
beleaguered
citadel, but might not save it.
Starting from the deep sleep which succeeded
their revel, the Indians evinced a lion-like courage.
They rushed unarmed upon drawn swords; they
grasped the bayonets in their hands; they wrested
the weapons from their foes; they grappled with
desperate strength; and yielded only when they
were cut in pieces. While blood was pouring in
torrents, Mason gave the terrible order to burn the
fort, and the village that was sleeping beneath its
wing. Columns of fire sprang up from seventy
conelike
roofs of combustible material, spreading a red
glare over the darkened heavens. The affrighted
inmates, whose dream was broken by the flames
that were to destroy them, rushed forth. Mothers
with babes in their arms, little ones shrieking in vain
for protection, flitted like shadows and vanished.
Death was ready for them. Scarce one escaped.
Some, at the sight of their enemies, fled back to
their flaming dwellings to die there, like the
miserable
Jews, preferring the burning coals of their
beloved
temple, to the mercy of the Romans.
Scarcely in the records of history, has war done
her work with greater dispatch or more entire
desolation
.
The hour opened upon a slumbering village
and a fortress quietly crowning the wooded hill-top.
It closed, and six hundred souls had taken their
flight: every dwelling was ashes, and every family
extinct. Where the tower of their strength
frowned
was a mound of blackened cinders, smoldering
in the blood of their bravest hearts.
The victorious army commenced their returning
march. They had not escaped unscathed, though
few were left among the slain. A fourth part of
their number were disabled by wounds. In this
emergency the friendship of their Mohegan allies
was invaluable. Constructing litters of the woven
branches of trees, they bore the sufferers on their
L
shoulders, and by their knowledge of the styptic and
healing virtues of plants, assuaged their sufferings.
Neither was the retreat without danger. The
uproar
of conflict had been heard afar, startling the ear
of night. Throngs of enraged Pequods hung upon
their rear, taking deadly aim from the height of
rocks or the covert of trees. Mason found
himself
called upon, like Xenophon, to the difficult task
of conducting a retreat through an enemy's country;
imitating him, also, in becoming the historian of his
own expedition. A distance of six miles was to be
achieved, with the foe in their footsteps. But for the
aid of their red brethren, they would probably have
been intercepted and cut off. They protected the
harassed army, often forming a circle, and literally
receiving the exhausted veterans in their friendly and
faithful bosoms. At length, the white sails of the
waiting vessels were seen, expanded by a favoring
breeze, the harbor attained, and the wasted and
wearied, yet triumphant band embarked on their
homeward voyage.
During the tumult of battle, the chaplain retired
to a deep-woven thicket, and lifted up his prayer to
the Father and Judge of all. He besought the
preservation
of his brethren, and that the needless
effusion
of blood might be restrained. While Faith
maintained a painful struggle with the emotions of
his gentler nature, there was a rushing toward the
thicket, as of a deer pursued by the hunters. Ere
he could rise from the humble posture of devotion, a
young girl threw herself on the earth and clasped
his feet. It was with difficulty that he disengaged
himself. Her grasp was like the rigor of death.
Fixing her wild eyes for a moment on his
countenance
,
she shrieked fearfully and long, and closed
them, as he thought, forever. There was blood on
her forehead and bosom. He believed that, in the
torture of a mortal wound, she had fled, not knowing
whither.
The Savior, of whom thou hast never heard,
have mercy upon thy poor soul, said the man of
peace. Bending over her with pity, as she lay at
his feet, like a beautiful bronze statue, he thought,
Surely my people might have spared to take the
life of the child.
She seemed at that period when childhood and
youth mingle, in doubtful yet pleasing union. At
length her respiration became distincta succession
of deep sighs. Life stirred in her deadened cheek.
The trance of fear was broken. She partially raised
herself; but when she beheld the face of a white
man, covered her eyes with a shrill, shuddering cry.
It was not her own blood that was upon her breast,
but the blood of her mother and of her little sisters,
to whom she had clung through the flame and under
the sword. The holy man laid his hand upon her
throbbing forehead, and strove to assure her spirit
by the smile and tone of kindness, that universal
language
,
intelligible to the heart of the savage, and
which even the eye of the brute deciphers.
Poor bird; God hath sent thee unto me, perhaps,
to save a soul alive; and he threw his mantle around
the shivering child. When the battle was done, and
the shouting victors sought him in their joy, he led
her through ranks of scowling soldiers and
wondering
red men.
God hath given her to me, said he, and they
were silent. He protected her through the perilous
retreat and upon the waters, and brought her home
to his wife and to his daughters; so at their family
altar, morn and even, was a petition that the soul of
the red-browed orphan might be dear to their Father
in heaven.
Gentle treatment and Christian culture were as
the dew and sunbeam, to this broken forest flower.
Her feelings expanded in gratitude, and confirmed
into the most affectionate trust. Every service
within
the measure of her power was cheerfully rendered
to her benefactors. She learned to love the God of
Christians, and early sought permission to enrol
herself
among the followers of the Redeemer.
Seven years passed away, and brought to this
gentle creature the ripeness of youth. There was
about her a flexibility of form and movement
approaching
to grace, and that peculiar sweetness of
voice which distinguishes our aboriginal females.
Her raven locks, profuse and glossy, twined in thick
braids around her head, and gave strong relief to a
complexion whose dark hue did not prevent the
eloquent
blood from revealing its frequent rush to
cheek or temple. Every physical and intellectual
development indicated exquisite sensibility, over
which pure religion diffused a serenity which made
her interesting to the most careless beholder.
I have said that seven years had elapsed since the
destruction of Fort Mystic. Connecticut had, in
that interval, rapidly gathered strength and
importance
.
Already had she stretched forth her hand to
aid the incipient efforts of her elder sister,
Massachusetts
,
in the cause of education. Her simple
offerings
,
though of only a few bushels of corn or
strings of wampum, came up with acceptance to
ancient
Harvard's mite-replenished treasury.
Hartford had also assumed an aspect of
comparative
comeliness and vigor. One of its beautiful
heights was adorned with a spacious mansion, far
exceeding in elegance the other structures of that
newly-planted colony. It was the seat of the Wyllys
family, whose founder was not less conspicuous for
wealth than for saintly piety, and adorned by a lawn
and garden, in imitation of his own fair estate in
Warwickshire. Among the ornaments of his domain
was an oak, the monarch of the forest, honored
afterward
in annal and song as the refuge, not of his
sacred majesty, but of the charter which his
sacred
majesty's brother would fain have rifled. Still
revered, and introduced to strangers as the Charter
Oak, it flourishes in green old age, though
generation
after generation have withered beneath its
shade.
L 2
At the period of which we speak, the year 1644,
a funeral train passed forth from that stately
dwelling
.
The head of that ancient house was no more.
Not slightly mourned, did he part from a colony,
which had conferred on him the highest office in its
power to bestow. Hartford and the vicinity poured
forth their inhabitants, from the child, to him of hoary
hairs, to attend those obsequies. There Hooker
lifted up his voice, and with fervid eloquence blessed
the dust of him who for righteousness' sake had
preferred a wilderness to the palaces of Mammon,
and, like the prophet borne on angels' wings from
Pisgah, esteemed the reproach of Christ greater
riches than the treasures of Egypt.
Behold, exclaimed he, in what manner Death
despoileth man. He doth not uproot the groves which
he planted or the gardens that he adorned, but he
chaineth the foot that walked there. He taketh not
away the pleasant pictures from the walls, but he
taketh light from the eye that looked upon them.
The desirable children, the loving wife are left, but
the head, and husband, is cut down with a stroke.
He burneth not the fair and goodly mansion, but he
taketh the master out of it. He doth not destroy his
honors, but he summoneth him away from them.
`
This night! this night!
' is the cry, and
immediately
he giveth up the ghost.
His eulogium upon the departed was minute, and
according to the quaint taste of the age. He spoke
of his doctrines and of his deeds; of his genealogy,
clearly traced back to the times of the fourth
Edward
in wealth and honor, and throughout the
stormy feuds of the houses of York and Lancaster,
maintaining a consistent valor. Yet his aim was not
to magnify adventitious distinction, but the grace of
God, and to show that the glory of man, at his best
estate, is altogether vanity. Impressed with these
sentiments, the weeping multitude followed in
solemn
order the corpse to its last narrow habitation.
The long procession moved slowly down the hill,
and extended itself toward the cemetery. Scarce
one remained behind, save the Indian maiden, who,
pensive and alone, wandered to the brow of the
eastern declivity, which commanded a noble view
of the valley of the Connecticut. She fixed her
eye upon its line of blue, seen in sparkling
snatches
through the foliage of embowering trees. Her
revery was broken by a muffled form springing
toward
her from a copse, just beneath the height where
she stood. She would have started away like the
bounding fawn, but the complexion, the gesture of
her own people, the murmured tones of her native
language, arrested her. With a consciousness as
rapid as the memory of the heart, she recognized the
young warrior Ontologon, of the ancient line of her
nation's royalty. Anxious to avoid discovery, and
more by gestures than words, he signified that he
had tidings of importance to communicate, and
requested
an interview in the grove that skirted her
residence. Scarcely had she assented ere he
vanished
so suddenly, as to leave on her mind the
bewildering
recollection of a phantom visitant. Twilight
had faintly taken the hue of evening when she
repaired
to the grove in which the garden of her
protector
terminated.
Orramel
, said a voice, whose deep inflections
thrilled through every nerve, and the lofty young
chieftain of her people stood before her. For a
moment
he regarded her in silence with the keen glance
of the eagle, who, balanced on the cloud, gazes into
her nest to see if aught evil hath befallen her
nurslings
in her absence, and to exult in their beauty.
Orramel, thou rememberest me. I saw it in the
flash of thy wondering eye, when on the hill-top I
stood suddenly before thee. I knew it from the
blood in thy cheek, which spoke its message ere thy
lips parted.
Ontologon, thy tones open all the cells of
memory
.
They call back the dead. I see my mother
fondling her babe. I sit by her side with my little
sisters. Again our home seems peaceful and happy,
as when thou didst bring to my childish hand birds
of bright plumage, which thy young bow had taken.
Where are that mother and those little ones,
playful
and timid as the fawns? Where is thy home, so
softly visited by the sea-breeze? Where are thy
people? Black ruins, and the grass that grows so
rankly where blood is spilt, answer thee. Thou
canst tell me of the flame and the battle when our
fortress fell. I saw them not. I was far away with
our king. Would that I had been there, that I might
have died when my people died, or cut in pieces
their oppressors.
The maiden replied only with deep sobs, and the
warrior continued.
Where are all our nation? Parceled out as
slaves, or covered in the grave.
The grave
, did I
say? That were too blessed a refuge. They cast
us out from thence. The ploughshare turneth up
the bones of our fathers for the dogs of white men.
They hunt down the Pequod like the wolf. How
long have I lurked among these hated dwellings that I
might thus look upon thee? Were it known that my
feet rested upon this earth, what, suppose ye, would
be my doom?
The tender mercies of the honorable
court
, the tomahawk of Uncas, or the
friendship
of
the Narragansetts? the torture, or the flame?
Orramel bent on him her humid eyes, through
which the soul of tender pity looked forth.
Lonely maiden! are we not the last of our race?
I have braved every peril to find and to save thee.
I seek to bear thee to the far west, where the eye of
the pale race dare not follow. I will build our cabin
where are many warriors, and thou shalt be their
queen. My voice shall control them, as the blast
the swelling waves. We will sweep down like the
mountain torrent, and destroy those accursed whites.
We will quench our thirst in their blood till not a
drop remains.
Ontologon, the desolation of my race, the
destruction
9
of my kindred, are heavy on my heart, both
when I lie down and when I rise up. Henceforth
there will be another burden there, the thought of
thy sorrows. Yet curse not the people who have
given me bread and a shelter, and taught me of
Jesus
Christ and the hope of a heavenly home.
And so thou art at peace with the white man's
God!
exclaimed the chieftain, with an eye that
flashed through the darkness like kindled flame.
They have spoken soft words to thee, till thou hast
forgotten the wrongs of thy people and thy mother's
blood.
Art thou the daughter of the red man
, and
content to crouch at the feet of his murderers? and
to take bread from hands stained with his blood, and
rusted with the chains that have eaten into his soul?
Wert thou not dearer to me than heaven's light, I
should have cleft thy brow when thou didst speak
of loving Him whom white men worship.
Ontologon, I have told thee truth.
The God of
Christians is my God
. I have sworn it at His altar.
I may not turn back from following Him. I have
said to thee that no music like thy voice hath met my
ear since I sat on my mother's knee. And I could
find it in my heart to dwell with thee in the deep
forest
,
as the dove dwelleth with her mate; but I can
not forsake the Savior, to whose keeping I have
committed
my soul.
The stately form of the chief was shaken with
violent
and contending emotions, as the oak reels in the
storm.
Meet me yet once more, Orramel, only once
more. For thy sake, I will endure to hide yet
another
day amid the haunts of those I hate. When
again the sun sleeps, and the stars begin their watch,
come to me where the rivers mingle. My boat shall
be moored there. If thou wilt go with me, we will
seek a happier clime. If thou wilt not, thou shalt be
free to return, as the forest bird to her nest.
He plunged into the thicket, and in a moment was
lost to her view. The meditations of that sleepless
night, and of the day that ensued, were trying and
tumultuous to the red-browed maiden. He who had
prepared her innocent childhood for the germ of love,
had suddenly come like the husbandman to claim the
fruits of the vineyard, when she supposed him buried
with her fellow-kindred. To her kind benefactors
she dared not resort for counsel, since a knowledge
of the proximity of her lover would endanger both
his liberty and life. Often during this period of
agitation
was she on her knees in her solitary chamber,
imploring His aid who confirmeth the doubting heart
and giveth discretion to the simple.
Evening tardily spread her curtain over the spot
appointed for their meeting. It was at the junction
of the Connecticut with a considerable tributary.
The Dutch, who exhibit the same shrewdness in the
choice of sites favorable to commerce, which the
monks of England anciently discovered in selecting
warm and sheltered nooks for their convents and
cloisters, had originally erected here a fortress, or
trading-house, which they called the Hirse of Good
Hope. Though their occupancy was transient, the
locality still retains the designation of Dutch Point,
and was long distinguished by its gentle and graceful
undulations, and the velvet richness of its shaven lawn.
The rising moon, whose full disk silvered the tree
tops, revealed the slight form of the maiden resting
against the trunk of an elm, while the stately
warrior
,
seated at her feet, bowed his head on his hand
in melancholy thought.
Orramel, I spake strong and stormy words to
thee when last we parted. My heat burned within
me, to see thee in the coil of the serpent. Thou art
as the moon to my midnight path. Without thee,
what would be my life but a rootless weed! I was
then maddened with the fear of losing thee. But
now I read other language in thy gentle eyes. I
know that thou wilt go with me. I will make thine
home in the heart of the green forest, where the
thrush and the wood-robin sing; and thou shalt be
more to me than the song of birds, or the spring to
the ice-bound stream.
The maiden replied not. There was in the tones
of his deep and tender voice something, that, even
when it ceased, made her heart a listener.
Our race have vanished away, he added,
mournfully
,
like the dew when the sun ariseth. From
these waters, and from the shores of the broad sea
where our kings held dominion, our power hath
departed
.
Our council fires are quenched. Upon the
very lands that were his at the beginning, the
Pequod
dares not set his feet. As for me, who of all
my kindred are left? Is there
one
to take Ontologon
by the hand, and call him brother? When he is
sick, has he a mother or a sister to spread the
blanket
over him? When he dies, who shall bury him
with his fathers? There is none left to remember
him, or to shed the tear over his grave.
Ontologon, I can not bear to hear thee say that
our whole race have perished. My heart is sad at
the thought that thou hast neither brother, nor sister,
nor mother.
I will go with thee
, that thou mayest no
more lament in loneliness, or be sick, and find no
comforter. For thee I will forsake those who have
been to me as parents. But thou wilt not refuse
that I should remember their God and my God, that
I should speak to Him when the light fadeth and
when the morning ariseth in the east, and that I
should keep His Sabbaths in my soul.
Orramel, I may not deceive thee. The white
man would promise thee, with the oath on his lips,
whatsoever thou desiredst. When thou wert in his
power, his vows would be lighter than the
summer
wind. He would mock thee, that thou hadst
trusted them. The red man dares not thus to sin.
He knows that the Great Spirit hath an ear which
the lightest breath of falsehood reaches. I will not
consent that thou shouldst love the Christian's God.
I could not rest if the plague-spot of our foes was
upon thy bosom.
M
Ontologon, is not my request small? Doth the
water-lily offend the flower of the sun when it
bendeth
beneath the waters? Doth the stream dishonor
its fountain when it findeth rest in the sea? Would
it wrong
thee
that my hope was in Him who made
heaven and earth? that my prayer went up for thee
while thou didst bend thy bow in the forest?
Maiden of the dark and tender eye, the path in
which we walk upon earth is short. Hoary-headed
men say it is to them as a dream. When thou
diest
,
could I see thee go to the white man's heaven?
Could I go there with thee? Could I remain in that
heaven if
his soul
dwelt there?
No, no!
Our home
after death must be the same. Could I bear to miss
thee forever in those fields of light, where our
fathers
dwell, above the roll of the thunder?
Orramel
,
it shall not be so. I will lead thy footsteps
back to the Great Spirit. He will forgive that thou
hast wandered. He knoweth that the heart of
woman
is weak. When thy hand is in mine, thou shalt
fall no more.
Ontologon, thou art more noble than the kings
from whom thou art descended. Thou hast not
hidden
the truth from me. Now could I lay down my
life for thy sake.
But I dare not lay down my faith
.
While I live, the Book of God must be my guide;
when I die, may my soul go unto the Redeemer.
Is it, then, for this, said the warrior, that I
have borne long years of darkness, whose only light
was thy childish smile, which memory held forth to
me like a feeble lamp? For this, that when life
grew hateful, and I was about to cast it away, I
walked onward with a strong step and a lifted brow
at the sound,
`Orramel liveth?'
Is it for this that
I have bowed my pride to grovel as a snake in the
thicket, that I might again breathe the same air that
thou didst breathe, and once more look upon thee?
All troubles were forgotten when the sound of thy
voice fell upon my ear. At the words, `
I will go
with thee
,' a new existence entered into my soul.
And now, have I found this treasure only to lay it
down? Have we met but to part forever? Must I
walk alone under the cloud of midnight, till I sink in
the grave, the last of all my race?
Let me be to thee, Ontologon, the light which
thou hast sought. When thou art weary and sad,
let me teach thee how to smile. We will walk
together
till that dark angel divide us who cometh but
once to all. Yet let me speak to thee of my story.
Long after my abode was with white men, I was
sorrowful and without hope. He who saved me
from destruction was as a father, and his wife as a
mother, and their children spake kind words to me.
But I found no comfort. Every night my pillow
was as a fountain of tears. Thus it was, till their
sweet religion entered into my soul. It set the seal
of peace on my eyes when I lay down to slumber,
and when I awoke it talked with me. All day long,
it put meek and happy thoughts into my heart, and
it promised to pluck for me the sting from death, and
to take the victory from the grave. Then I partook
of its holiest rite, and bound my soul by an
everlasting
covenant, and took that holy Book to my heart
which teaches of its precepts. Gladly would I read
to thee from those blessed pages of a clime without
sorrow or injustice, where none shall be forced from
his inheritance, and where all the righteous shine
forth as the `Sun in the kingdom of their Father.'
Yet, if it troubleth thee, I will not speak of my faith.
I will shut it close in my soul. Thou shalt see it
only by the smile that beams from it, and the
courage
it giveth at the gate of death.
The lofty chieftain threw himself upon the earth.
Groans burst from his laboring bosom, and his whole
form was convulsed. Let none believe that he has
seen anguish till he witnesses the agony of the strong,
proud man. He may have beheld the lightning and
the tempest, but not the earthquake rending the rock
in pieces.
At length the strife of passion yielded. He rose,
in heightened majesty. His voice was firm and
awful
,
as he extended his hand toward the maiden.
If thou wilt be mine, wholly and forever, put thy
hand into my hand, and not even death shall part us.
But if thou choosest the faith of the murderers of thy
people, and to dwell in their heaven rather than in
the heaven of our fathers, say so, and let me see thy
face no more.
The answer was distinct, though the heart's tears
gushed with it,
I may not renounce my Redeemer
.
With a rush that seemed superhuman, the
chieftain
threw himself from the high bank into his boat.
A few strokes of the oar, as from a giant's arm,
drove it from the deep shadow where it lay, out upon
the broad, bright waters. Then it seemed to drift
onward at its will. In that despairing reaction
which succeeds passionate excitement, he lay
prostrate
with a powerless arm, submitting to the
guidance
of the tide, and reckless of life or death.
Orramel stood upon the point of the promontory
where the rivers mingle. She watched the boat of
her lover, until the sinuous and projecting shore shut
it from her view. But he raised not his head, nor
waved his hand. He gave no farewell signal to
soften
that bitter parting. She listened for some echo
of his voice. Nothing was heard save the rush of
the waters, and the sigh of the gale through the
boughs of the drooping willows.
A strong burst of feeling swept over her. She
returned to the place where they had parted. She
seated herself on the earth where he had sat. She
strove to recall every word that he had spoken. She
wove every tone into the tissues of memory. It was
late ere she roused herself from her grief, and
recovered
strength to retrace her homeward way.
She still continued faithful in all her duties, full
of gratitude to her benefactors, and humble as the
weaned child. It was evident to a close observer
that some sorrow had passed over her, but a sorrow
in which remorse had no part. A pure conscience so
M 2
girded the swelling heart that it broke not. Peace
that the world can not give made her brow its tablet.
Thus she lived till youth faded, respected by the
race among whom she had found refuge. Yet the
soul of her lover was ever upon her prayers, and
when the last pale messenger came to summon her,
and her eye brightened at the welcome of that
Savior
in whom she had believed, the ear that
approached
nearest to her dying lips perceived that their faint,
parting whisper was
mercy for Ontologon
.
In reviewing the circumstances which have given
to this sketch a subject and a name, we are struck
with the prominence and discordance of some of the
features in the character of our ancestors: the
boldness
with which, in the very birth of their colonial
existence, they hazarded this formidable enterprise,
the cruelty with which it was consummated, and the
piety to which they turned for a sanction, even when
deed and motive seemed at variance. The unresting
vigilance with which they blotted out the very name
of Pequod, partitioning the last remnant of that race
in vassalage between the Mohegans, the
Narragansetts
,
and themselves, was not less arbitrary than the
dismemberment of Poland, and savored more of the
policy of heathen Rome than of Christ.
Mason, in common with the historians of that age,
bitterly blamed the Indians for stratagem in war,
but chose to adopt the creed that he had denounced,
and to prove himself an adept in the theory that he
condemned.
Still, we would contemplate with filial respect the
memory of our ancestors. We venerate their lofty
virtues, and view their errors with regret. Many
of their most prominent faults sprang from the
peculiarity
of their position. The light that visits our
advancing age had not beamed on them. Luminous
minds had not then arisen to present the war spirit
in its true aspect, or to strip it of that false glory
with which antiquity had invested it. No divine
had then eloquently pointed out that universal
ballet
by which mankind might cast from its seat of
power the bloody idol of a long-infatuated world.
The consciousness that they were the sole
guardians
of the vine planted in the wilderness, and the
dread of its extermination, forced them into conflict,
which in this instance was most stern and sanguinary,
kindling the flame over the heads of slumbering
households
,
and smiting the infant in its mother's arms.
The young student of American history, in
recording
the date of May 20th, 1637, will remember it as
the era when a once-powerful aboriginal tribe
ceased
to exist. It perished without a hand to write its
epitaph: an emblem of the fate of that vanishing
race to whom the brotherhood of the white man
hath hitherto been as the kiss of Judas.
THE YANKEE.
Strange phrase and quaint, but spirit shrewd,
And heart with pious thoughts embued.
There
is sometimes a period in the life of nations,
as well as of individuals, when the energies work in
diseased channels, and a morbid imagination pictures
destruction before them, and sorrow behind. Such
seemed the condition of the oldest colony, the
mother
of New England, when about to pass the
seventieth
year of her existence.
Within her borders she beheld a savage foe,
wronged
and inexorable, the print of whose stealthy
footstep
was red with the blood of the defenceless. The
fathers who had been her guides; the ancient priests,
whose wisdom was as the Urim and Thummim to the
multitude, were with the dead. We, in whose minds
respect for age is less deeply rooted than of old, can
but imperfectly realize the horror of great
darkness
that settled upon her soul as the last vestiges
of that patriarchal race disappeared. One by one
the stars were muffled, the beacon-lights withdrawn,
and she left to steer her lonely barque amid the
troubled
waters.
Other causes conspired to harass and depress the
people: heavy taxation; the almost utter extinction
of commerce; and a sea-coast infested by piratical
cruisers. France, irritated by a recent invasion of
Canada, menaced the colonies with her vengeance.
They were becoming, says Upham, in his
Lectures
,
the victims of political jealousies,
discontent
,
and animosities; their minds were startled
and confounded by forebodings of dark and dismal
events; and, as it were, to crown the whole, and fill
up the measure of their affliction and terror, it was
their universal and sober belief, that the Evil
Being
himself was in a special manner let loose, and
permitted to descend upon them with unexampled
fury.
It was from the midst of this discomfort and gloom,
this fearful looking-for of judgment, that the
delusion
at Salem sprang forth. Though not without
precedent in an older continent, it derived peculiar
elements of sternness and inveteracy from the
locality
and circumstances of its birth. Few of those
influences that soften and unbend the minds of men
were then in operation. Literature and science gave
but a feeble infusion of their spirit, and social
intercourse
seldom sparkled with hilarity. Seeds of
religious
dissension were vegetating, and whatever
form of bitterness or superstition seized upon the
mind, was pursued with the exclusiveness of
monomania
.
An isolated and ascetic state of feeling was
doubtless
nourished by the tardy and infrequent
communication
between the settlements. No post-roads or
periodicals diffused intelligence, and, penetrating to
the most remote solitudes, bound the extremities to
the heart in strong and warm vitality. The
adventurous
traveler encountered not only fatigue, but
peril
,
for he knew that he must pass dense and
overshadowing
forests, where the watchful Indian
prowled
.
So slow was the transmission of news, that the
awful tragedy at Salem, which commenced early in
1692, did not reach for several months a colony of
Huguenots, planted about forty miles from Boston.
Few in number, and occupied with those labors on
which existence depended, vague rumors, as of some
distorted and horrible dream, at length floated to
their hermit residence.
It was at that period when autumn fosters the
fading
beauties of summer, and yet announces the
approach
of winter by infusing a slight chill into the
evening atmosphere. The harvest of maize had
been principally gathered and deposited in a rude
tenement, which served as a public granary. Lights
were seen there to glimmer, after they had one by
one vanished from the surrounding habitations. A
few men, employed in separating the golden sheaves
from their investing sheath, still prolonged their
pleasant toil, listening to the narrations of a hardy
New England yeoman, who for the past year had
assisted these more delicate natives of France in the
ruder labors of husbandry. While in the midst of
an animated description of the festivities of what he
called a real huskin' frolic, which he had
sometimes
shared among his own people, he was
interrupted
by a heavy knock at the door, and the sudden
entrance of a wearied stranger. A word or two in
an under-tone caused an exclamation of amazement.
Why, Cousin Jehiel Wigglesworth! it can't be
you! in such torn and awful riggin'! Have the
Indians
come down upon Malden? and was you
necessitated
to fly for your life?
Indians, do ye say? What is a host of
cowardly
heathen to the terrible visitations of the spirits of
darkness? We read in the Bible of only
one
witch
of Endor, and she busied herself with calling up the
dead; but Salem town is full of witches, from one
eend to t'other, and they do nothing but torment the
living.
To the inquiry of his cousin respecting the
reasons
of his removal from Malden, their native place,
he answered,
You know I come of age last winter, and so I
told father he might as well get some work out of
brother Titus, who is a stout youngster, and I would
go and hire myself out a spell and 'arn a little
money
.
I had heard of a minister in Salem, one Mr.
Parris, who wanted help, and I reckoned 'twould be
a good notion to live with a minister, because, their
portion not being in this world, they would not be
likely to insist on so much hard slaving. But I was
rather discomfited at our first meeting. He obsarved
that he was particular in inquiring the character of
sarvants
, because he chose to have only those of good
report. `
Sarvants!
' said I; `I never was any body's
10 N
sarvant
, and I never mean to be.' So I turned to
go off, thinking he was too mighty topping for me.
But he said over a text or two of Scripture, which
made me as quiet as a lamb, how that we all had a
Master in heaven, and that he only wanted me to be
his
help
. Then I felt ashamed that I had been so
mad and hasty, and made an agreement with him,
and lived quiet and peaceable, till I was carried to
Salem jail.
To the jail! to the jail! You don't say so!
None of our relations ever come to such disgrace
before! No wonder you look so exceedin'
dumpish
.
Tell me all that you did, without any
prevarication
.
Cousin Jehoshaphat Jones, have a little patience.
Every thing in its right place. I guess you had
better
hear first consarning my dealings at the
minister's
.
My business was to dig in the gardin, and to
chop wood, and to take care of the dumb critturs,
which consisted of an old horse, quite lean in flesh,
and a cow with balls at her horns, 'cause she routed
down fences when she could get a chance, and a
flock of hens, which it was a power of trouble to
watch and scare out of the neighbor's corn;
moreover
,
to mind the minister's wife in all she directed.
And was it really a great sight easier to live with
a minister than to be on the good old farm at home?
Did you get enough to eat?
I liked all well enough except the Sabba-day
dinners; for then they never got any victuals. They
are no upholders of fasting in Boston; they
understood
good eating and drinking there right well.
But Salem folks seemed to me more for skinching
and saving. However, there was really nothing
worth complaining on, till them great and grievous
trials come down like a clap of thunder. The
minister's
darter and his niece, who lived with them,
both smart, sprightly gals of eleven or twelve years
old, were brought all of a sudden under the power
of the Evil One, and tormented just like the children
of Mr. John Goodwin at North Boston, a few years
before. Cousin Jehoshaphat, did not you read that
marvelous account published by a godly and larned
minister?
Yes, I did; but it seemed to me a deal more
like their own ugliness than any other sort of
witchcraft
.
Jehoshaphat Jones, just in that same way other
bold ones blasphemed and made their mocks, but
some of them got hung upon the gallows like proud
Haman, a spectacle to heaven and airth. It is true
that them two gals was the most tormentedest critters
that eyes ever beheld. Sometimes we'd find them
a standing in brooks of water, saying that the
Wicked
One wanted to drown 'em; then they'd be a
clinging to the tops of high trees, where they'd no
way in natur' of getting, crying out that he
commanded
'em to throw themselves down from thence.
Jehiel, wasn't there apples or some sort of fruit on
them trees? I guess I've seen children climb pretty
decent high arter green apples, without no
supernatural
help.
Well, what should they run upon the ridge-pole
of the barn, and bemoan themselves there for? You
don't s'pose any green apples grew there, do ye?
And when the poor souls set down to comfort
themselves
with a meal of victuals, who do you calculate
drew their tongues out of their mouths, and laid
them all along upon their chins, so that they were
not able to eat a single mou'ful?
I don't know. I guess they did not see any
thing they liked on the table, and thought they'd
make a push to get something more to their taste.
Who do you reckon run pins into 'em, and left
the marks of great pinches and bites on their
innocent
flesh? And what made 'em, when they was
told only to do the least little chore, fall into fits like
one about to die?
Why, Jehiel, I have made believe to be sick
myself
,
when I was a small boy, and told to hoe corn
or weed the gardin; but I was always mighty well
if any play was going on. And I have seen bigger
folks sarve their master in that way time and again.
Who pinched and bit those gals, I don't undertake
to say; but I rather guess, if the minister had given
them a smart box on the ear, as father used to me,
they'd gone to work and felt better.
It is very likely, to be sure, that with your poor
edecation you should know more of their case than
all the wise and rich gentlemen who come to see
and pity 'em, and the host of ministers too, who used
to pray and exhort over 'em. And when them that
was the most gifted, and could hold out the longest,
were a putting up petitions, it was awful to see the
sufferings of them children. Every inch of their
flesh would tremble, as if the Evil Spirit was about
to come out of 'em, but it was only because he was
mad and tired to hear the precious saints
communing
so long with the Lord. Then the poor babes
might not enjoy the comfort of saying the Lord's
Prayer themselves; for they'd always be forced to
leave out some part of it. And when Mr. Parris
would say, `Begin again, and say it right,' they'd be
speechless. Neither was they permitted to read a
single godly book, whereby their souls might 'a been
comforted under their body's tribulation. The
wicked
sarpent would allow them to read silly stories and
jeest books, to be sure, and if they was particular
unchristian and bad, they'd giggle and shout till even
the neighbors heard the racket. But when the
Assembly
of Divines' Catechize was put into their
hands, oh! such whooping and hollowing; and if it
was not taken directly out of their sight, they'd have
the terriblest fits, and scare the minister's wife nigh
upon to death.
Law, Cousin Jehiel, as for that monstrous long
catechize, I'd have screamed as bad as they, and had
as many fits, if I could only frightened mother out
of the notion of making me larn it.
Jehoshaphat Jones, I feel bound to say unto you
N 2
what holy Mr. Baxter saith in his preface to the book
about John Goodwin's afflicted offspring: `He that
disbelieveth, must needs be a most obstinate
Sadducee
.'
I s'pose it will be of no use to certify you that
there
was
a witch in our house; yea, a black wench,
from a far-distant country, where, I'm told, they have
daily dealings with Satan, as man with man, in
buying
,
and selling, and trucking of goods. The
afflicted
girls, when in their sorest torments, would cry out
upon Tituba; and there would be the cruel jade,
looking as much amazed as if she had never done
any evil in her life. But she had manifested her
ugly temper toward 'em before this calamity, by
divers
times discovering 'em in a closet where jellies
and such like sweet trade was kept, of which it was
very natural that they should be just tasting a little,
you know. They could not so much as hook a lump
of sugar, or a spunful of molasses, but they'd hear
her muttering, `I'll tell mistress, for by-and-by
sugar-pot
and 'lasses-jug be empty, and she'll say,
Tituba
stealTituba tief.' So, don't all these doings
plainly prove that she was moved of old, by the
Father
of malice against these poor children? Well,
after things had gone on so for a long, lengthy time,
they come to a detarmination to hold a court upon
these dealings of Satan, and try if the authority of the
town could not cast him out, since the godly ministers
was not able. Oh! I never shall forget that
dreadful
day. Heads was as thick in the Salem
court-house
as green pease in a pod, but no more noise nor
shuffling of feet than if all had been dead bodies.
There, on a high seat, sot Governor Danforth,
looking
exceeding solemn, and Governor Stoughton, with
eyes as sharp as a needle; and there was the
Reverend
Mr. Samuel Parris, with a pen to write down
every word that should be said. I could not help
thinking of the day of judgment. And when the
crowd was so great that we could hardly breathe,
the distressed children was brought in. Close behind
them came Tituba, rolling up the whites of her eyes.
Then they fell into the worst torments that I ever did
see. It seemed as if the Wicked One put forth the
whole of his power and spite in the presence of the
honorable court. `Who hurts you?' said his worship,
the judge. `Tituba! Tituba!' they both screamed at
once; `she afflicts us! She is going to ride on a
broomstick now, and will stick pins in us.' Then
they fell into such awful fits that the honorable court
injoined the black witch to make confession of her
wickedness. And she did confess, so far as this; that,
when she was a slave among the Spanish, she larnt
how to find out a witch
. And was not that just the
same as to be one herself? Their honors agreed it
was next akin to it, and ordered her straightway to
prison. After she got there, such a hardened
sinner
was she, that she denied having ever made a
league with Satan, and said she would not have told
the court what she did, only her master had
[1]
[1]
See page 56 of Lectures on Witchcraft, by the Reverend C.
W. Upham, published at Boston in 1831, and evincing much
historical
research.
most
grievously beaten her to make her confess, and,
catching
his eye in the court, she was afeard of the
same punishment again, which was surely no worse
than she desarved. And what a maracle it was, that,
as soon as she was taken away, the poor, afflicted gals
sot up, and looked pleasant and satisfied. But just
as the crowd was beginning to clear out, the
minister's
darter betook herself to swooning again, and
foamed at the mouth like a barrel of hop beer a
working
.
And, Cousin Jehoshaphat, can you imagine my
situation when I heard her exclaim, `
Jehiel
Wigglesworth
!
Jehiel Wigglesworth! he afflicts me!
' Oh!
I screamed as loud as she, and took to my heels to
run right out of the court-house, thinking I'd get home
like a streak of lightning to father's. But they seized
hold of me, and dragged me before the judges.
Things swum round me, and I was afeard the floor
would cleave asunder, and let me into the suller. So
I held fast on to the sheriffs, and they grabbed just
as tight hold of me; so I was like a crutter shut
up in a vice. But when the chief judge axed me, in
a terrible voice, `How do you afflict this young maid?'
I found marvelous strength to reply, `Please your
honor, I never did offend her, in thought, word, or
deed, saving once, when, about six weeks ago, I s'pose
I did occasion her some sort of worriment by telling
her mother, who axed me the question, that I did see
her take apples from a cart that brought some to the
door to sell. But then she would not a took 'em if
we had only a bought 'em for her to eat; and, as she
declared she never touch'd one on 'em, I do s'pose
she forgot it. So, 'cause my memory happened to
be rather better than hers, she was huffy to me for
two or three weeks, which was no more than
natural
,
your honor; and then she seemed to get over
her hard thoughts. Most sartingly, this is the only
time in which I ever crossed her since I have abode
under her father's ruff.'
Then the court ordered me to walk straight up
to her, and look her in the face; whereat she
shrieked
so, and vowed that I tore her vitals, that my heart
misgive me, and I begun to wonder whether I had
not, somehow or other, made a league and covenant
with the Old One, and known nothing about it.
Howsoever
,
I would not confess, though they took vast
pains to make me. Whereupon they said I was
obstinate
,
and commanded me to jail. Then she come
immediately
out of her fits, and was as chirk and cheery
as a bird out of the snare of the fowler. Oh! the
wearisome days and nights that passed over me in
that house of bondage! But plenty of good
company
came there afore midsummer. We was like a
bee-hive at swarming time. From the dens around
I'd hear the poor prisoners bemoaning themselves,
and saying, `Oh! that we'd never told such a
falsehood
as to confess that we was witches, and so
wronged
our own souls.' And then the crying of children
would ring in my ears, for there was some shut up
there not over eight or ten years old. Father and
mother got a seat in neighbor Lynch's wagon, and
come down to Salem jail to see me. We was all
cast down bad enough, to meet in such a dolesome
hole. `Oh, Jehiel,' said the old lady, `confess! do,
pray, confess! for they tell me all that confess they
are witches get set at liberty, and all the rest are
hanged without marcy, for a stiff-necked and
hard-hearted
generation.' `Mother,' says I, `would ye have
me confess dealings with the Wicked Sarpent when
'taint true?' `Oh! I don't know,' says she; `but do
be sure and save your life; there ain't nothing so bad
as death.' `Why now, mother,' says I, `I remember
you broke me of telling lies when I was a small
youngster; I don't think I shall begin again at this
time of day. And I guess there
is
something as bad
as death, and worse too, namely, the lake that burns
with fire and brimstone.' `There,' said father, `did
not I tell you 'twould be so? Jehiel was always a
good boy to larn the New Testament by heart; and
now ye see he's got it in his heart. So give over
tempting him, mammy.'
I should have thought, said Jones, that Aunt
Jemima might have given you better advice. A
professor
o' religion as she is, too! She must have been
worse blinded and bewitched than even you was.
I felt desp'ate heavy, continued the narrator,
when our folks left me, and went and curled down
in the corner upon my heap of straw. But I found
some comfort in a bit of cold gammon, and bread
and cheese they brought me, which was enough
better than the jail victuals. The latter part of
August
,
five of the prisoners was taken out and
hanged
.
One of them was a grand minister, Mr. George
Burroughs, whom they condemned because he had
e'enamost the strength of a giant, which he must
have got from the powers of darkness, for he was
real slim and slender made. But never shall I
forget
the awful 22d of September. Then we was all
summoned to look out and see eight of our
miserable
comrades marched to the gallows. First walked
Martha Corcy, paler than ashes, whose husband had
been pressed to death with heavy weights, because
he refused to plead when he was indicted before the
honorable court. The next was Mary Esty, who
writ the most beautiful letter to the judges and
ministers
,
declaring her innocence. When she took the
last leave of her husband, and children, and friends,
she was said to look just as calm and holy as an
angel
.
Close behind come Goody Parker, with her
hood partly drawn over her face, and her lips
moving
in prayer, and Ann Pudeator, with the large
tears like hail-stones rolling down her face, and
Margaret Scott, with the ruddy bloom still upon her
cheeks, whom all the young men had so admired
for her beauty. There was Wilmot Read, too, with
whom I had played at school, and Goodman
Ward-well
,
who was accused by his own wife and
daughter
,
and a broken-hearted man was he, with his head
hanging down upon his breast. Last of all, with a
fresh, goodly countenance, walked Molly Parker,
stepping as light, as if she knew she was about to
rise above her enemies to a heavenly home. She it
was that spake so bold to the Reverend Mr. Noyes
when he bid her confess the sin of witchcraft. `I
am no more a witch than you are a wizard; and
if you take away my life, God will give you blood
to drink.' Oh! how my heart sunk within me, and
cold chills run through all my veins, to see them
walking along with the bright sun, and the clear,
blue sky over their heads, which they was never
more to behold. And I said to myself, Make haste,
Jehiel Wigglesworth, and get out of this strong hold,
or you will be dealt with in like manner. In the
arter part of that memorable day, there came a pious
good minister to preach to the poor prisoners, and
exhort them to sarch into the plague of their own
hearts, while yet it was a time of hope. We, in the
upper story, flocked together into the largest cell to
hear him. He spoke exceeding well, and had a
wonderful smooth delivery, but he'd only got as far
as sixteenthly, when down fell Molly Lacey in a fit,
a curious talking creature, who had charged both
her mother and grand-mother with witchcraft, and
got them both into Salem jail with her. Down she
fell, calling out the name of Mr. Willard, a grand
Boston minister, and the names of some of the
highest
powers of the state, saying they had a
commission
from the Prince of Darkness to afflict her, and
to burn her flesh from her bones with fire. Great
was the stir indeed, and when I see the jailer was
as busy as the rest on 'em, I watched my chance,
and glided down stairs like a sperrit. But when I
reached the second story, the door was locked so
tight that the Old Dragon himself could not start it.
I made for the window through which we had
looked
at the poor, condemned people in the morning,
and lo! it was left a leetle open, to admit a morsel
of air. `Jehiel Wigglesworth!' said I, `cast
yourself
down from thence. Ain't it as well to grind your
bones to powder, as to have your neck stretched by
these Philistines?' So I snatched up the minister's
broad-brimmed hat, which had been left on the
stairway
,
and thrust it on my head, thinking I would not
go into etarnity with a broken skull, if I could help
it. But what do you think appeared just at that
critical
minute? A huge load of hay passing directly
under, and nobody in sight. As quick as thought,
I plumped down upon it, and kivered myself up in
the cutest manner. The boy who driv was
wandering
along in front, and gazing around, but
hearing
a strange sound as I plunged down, gave his
cattle a stroke or two, and said, `Gee up, Dimond.
Haw! old crooked-horn! what d'ye start for? D'ye
see any o' the Salem witches?' So whistling, he
went on with his load, while the sweet smell of the
new-mown hay, and the fresh air that I had not
breathed so long, and the thought that I had got out
of that dismal den of lamentation, though but for
one half hour, even if they clawed me back the next,
made both my heart and head so lightish, that I
could scarcely keep from outright singing and
shouting
.
O
But I took good care to hold the minister's
hat well under the hay, lest some of his parishioners
might know it and hunt me out. I obsarved the
boy arter a while to be looking round, and calling
`Jehu, Jehu.' Thinks I to myself, Jehu and
Jehiel
are pretty much alike. So when we'd got past
the house where I used to live, I takes courage, and
says, `What d'ye want? Don't ye see that I'm up
here on the hay?' `On the hay,' said he. `How
on airth did ye get there, and I not know it?'
`Why forty people might 'a got up and down, and
stole half the hay too, while you have been lazing
and gazing at every thing and every body.' `You
hain't done all your arrants, have ye?' `Yes,
indeed
,
long ago.' `Well, then, get down and drive
the team. Don't you know master said, Tim, you
must drive till you get through the thickest of Salem
town, and when Jehu has done my business there,
he shall see to the cattle. So make haste and come
down, for I'm as tired as a dog.' `And don't you
think I'm tired too, trotting through all the lanes
like a camel, while you've been a loungin' along,
more asleep than awake?' `I declare you shall get
down
now
, Jehu,' said the lad, beginning to climb
up the load. `I'll tell you what it is, Tim,' said I,
`the great pitchfork is here, and if you come up
before
I give you leave, I'll catch you on it. But if
you'll only drive fast and good till we get out of
sight of them housen yonder, I've got a clever
clingstone
peach here that I'll give you, and you shall
ride all the rest of the way.' `Oh yes, to be sure,
out of sight of them housen! Why, that ain't a
quarter of a mile from the place where the man
lives that's bought the rowin. You're a real
cross-grained
dog, to make me do more than master says.'
So he walked along, muttering. When we'd got
about through the thick-settled part, I called out
suddenly, `Oh! what a beast I am to forget. Run,
Tim, run, as fast as ever you can, to Squire Larkin's
store, at the second corner, and bring a small bottle
of sperrit I left standing on the horse-block. I'm
awful afeard somebody has drinked it up afore now.
Come, gallop, that's a good fellow, and if you
happen
to take a small swig out on't, I won't tell
master
.'
Off he set like a catamount; and no sooner
was he out of sight than I was down, and a running
faster than he, for I was dumb afeard that he'd meet
the real Jehu, and both together take arter me, like
Jehu of old pursuing the false prophets. I struck
into the woods and hid till dark, and then took
the road and traveled right manfully all night. It
made me down-hearted to think I could not go to
father's, for I know'd well that was the fust place
they'd naturally sarch in for me, and I seemed to be
in a worse fix than the returning prodigal. While
I was doubting where to shape my course, I
remembered
that Cousin Jehoshaphat Jones, who had
always
been a true frind, had hired himself out to
some Huguenot bodies, who lived in an
out-of-the-way
sort of a hole, and thought if I could once get
there, I might stand a good chance to be hid, in such
an outlandish region. So I turned my steps
hitherward
.
But oh! the torment of hunger that I've
endured
.
Sometimes I have thought I could e'enamost
gnaw a sheep's head off, and eat it with all the wool
on. But I have not been altogether easy in my mind,
for fear the bears should eat me, when I dropped
asleep in the woods, or some ugly rattlesnake give
me a mortal bite, or the beastly Indians start out
from behind some bush and scalp me. Yet have I
been led through the wilderness in safety, through
help from above. I hope the precious minister that
I left preaching in the Salem jail will forgive me for
hooking his hat. Its broad brim has been of vast
use to me to dip up water from brooks, and fend off
the rain and musquetoes. How real thankful I was,
at last, to see a light glimmering here, and, looking
through the cracks of the corn-house, to be sure that
it was indeed Cousin Jehoshaphat, by the side of a
great pile of ripe ears. I doubt whether the poor
critturs who was a drowning in the flood-time could
have been much joyfuller to have set their feet in
Noah's ark, than I to behold my own blood-relation,
and stretch my weary limbs on this floor.
When the narrator closed his recital, all his
auditors
expressed sympathy for his troubles, and
gladness
at his deliverance, and hastened to provide him
with fitting refreshment, and a place of repose. It
was afterward decided to offer him refuge among
them, with such compensation for his services as
should be deemed satisfactory, until the indignation
might be overpast. For some time after this
miserable
delusion had subsided, he remained among
the Huguenot colonists, grateful for their kindness,
and pleased with their gentle manners and
reasonable
requisitions.
Afterward, returning to his native village, he
settled
for life in those peaceful agricultural
employments
to which his ancestors had been inured. He
dwelt in rural comfort and happiness, and enjoyed
the respect of his neighbors and friends. Some
lingering
of superstition continued through life to
mingle
with that shrewdness and simplicity which so
often
mark the Yankee character; and when, in long
winter evenings, beside a blazing fire, he
recounted
to his astonished children the evils to which he
had been exposed, and from which he was so
remarkably
rescued, he never failed to bespeak their
gratitude that they had never been tempted to the
sore sin of witchcraft, or brought under the visible
and fearful dominion of the great Wicked One.
11
A
LEGEND OF PENNSYLVANIA.
On the rushing tide of life,
Ever full, yet ever shifting,
Blinded with the smoke of strife,
We, like battle-ships, are drifting;
While the startling thunders boom,
And wreck'd barques go down forever,
In the far horizon loom
Hopes that urge to new endeavors.
Longfellow
.
Please
, tell me a tale of the olden time, said
a fair-haired girl, seating herself at her mother's feet,
and playfully seizing the knitting-needles so as to
suspend their operations.
Perceiving how fond was the glance that rested
upon her, she added, Dear mother, you seldom
mention
brother Edmund. I do so wish to hear more
about him. Pray speak of him now, in this sweet,
summer twilight, an hour so fit for all tender and
holy thought.
Do you not remember your brother, Malvina?
you were five years old when he was taken from us.
I remember him, mother, as we recall a vision,
beautiful and indistinct. Albert and myself used to
play all day long among the wild flowers, forcing
the smooth brook to fall noisily over the pebbles that
we placed in its channel. When he came to us,
there was a smile on his brow, like what we
supposed
might be the smile of an angel; but he never
laughed with us. He drew us to his knee, and told
us that God was in every flower, and in the voice of
the tuneful brooks, and that he painted the wing of
the butterfly. We loved to hear his sweet tones, so
like a flute, but we wished that he would laugh as
we did. He seemed so perfect, that something like
awe mingled with our love. We almost feared him,
for his unlikeness to ourselves. But when it
thundered
,
and I quaked with dread, I drew closer to
him, and took hold of the skirts of his coat, for I
believed
that no evil could touch one so good, and that
through his virtues I should be saved.
Once I loved him better than ever. It was when
he took me under those tall elms, in a clear and quiet
evening, and pointed out the stars. He told me some
of their names, and that they were full of inhabitants,
over whom God ruled in his goodness. Then I
clasped his neck close, and wept violently, through
my very love and apprehension that he would die,
and go to those bright orbs, and I, for my faults, be
left behind, and never be found worthy to meet him
there. And I well remember a strange agony at
being
told he was dead, and weeping at his funeral till
there were no more tears.
The mother paused, as if to gather strength for a
narrative of pain.
It is proper, my daughter, that our domestic
history
should be fully known to you. Upon some of
its events I have forborne to dwell, lest they might
sadden your young heart. Perhaps I have been too
reluctant to open the sources of grief; I have kept
them sacred to Him who can alone heal the heart's
troubled fountains. Those bitter waters have so long
subsided, that I may yet pour from their once turbid
dregs a pure draught into your crystal cup.
You know, dearest, that the birth-place of your
parents was in New England. Ten years have not
yet elapsed since our removal to Pennsylvania.
Then, with two hundred emigrants from
Connecticut
,
we became inhabitants of this fair Vale of
Wyoming
.
Never shall I forget its beauty as we first
approached
it. Weary with the toils of our journey,
it burst upon our eyes from the brow of yonder
mountain, as the promised land stood forth in its robe
of brightness to greet the tribes long wandering in
the desert. Early spring had just tinted the green
hills, and the slumbering dells lay in silent beauty.
The Susquehanna rolled on in pride, as if claiming
admiration for its glorious domain. The young trees,
and the sweet birds, and the incense of early flowers
welcomed us to our goodly land. We blessed God
that we were not dommed, like the prophet from
Nebo, only to behold it with our eyes, but not to pass
over and take possession.
You, Malvina, had numbered your fifth birth-day,
and your brother Albert was seven years old. At
the first view from the mountain-top, you both
clapped
your hands, and shouted with a pleasure whose
rich elements you could not fully comprehend. There
was a gentle being near us who gazed deeply on the
scene of enchantment, but spoke notyour sister
Ellen. She pressed close and closer to my side, her
breathing became a quick sob, and tears of rapture
coursed down her cheeks. The sentiment of beauty
lay deep in her soul, and this Eden landscape thrilled
it as a lyre, till the harmony overcame her. Twelve
winters only had passed over her, but her mind
partook
of the maturity of womanhood. She drooped
when we first left the banks of our own Connecticut.
Her affections were strongly clasped around her
young schoolmates, and the pleasant halls where she
had gathered knowledge in their company. In
untwining
them, some of the tendrils were broken; but
we thought they would soon embrace other props.
We understood not that our frail flower could not
bear to be transplanted, that it was to bloom only in
heaven. We were deceived by the brightness daily
glowing upon her cheek; we could not believe that
it was the flattering hectic planting there its funeral
rose.
Mother, mother, were there no physicians in the
valley for my sweet sister?
They, like us, were lulled into false security.
One of them did, indeed, say that it was the `
emigrant's
consumption that she pined with, a
consumption
of the heart.' But she uttered no complaint;
she seemed to have no pain. She sighed continually
for her schoolfor her dear companionsfor her
first homefor the Church of God. Her father
constructed
for her a rude arbor, where the vines
clustered
and made a thick shade. There she loved to
retire on a summer's day with her books, and around
it she planted the flower-seeds that she brought from
her own little garden. Especially she delighted there
to spend her Sabbath hours, and I could see that she
was best pleased to meditate without interruption.
One cloudless Sunday morning she, as usual,
resorted
thither. At parting, I recollected she threw back
her bright golden hair, and smiling, said, `
Mother
,
I am going to my home, to Connecticut,' for so
she called that favorite recess. But to her little
brother
,
whom she met and kissed, her words were more
ominous: `Albert, be a good boy; our dear Savior
says I may come home to-day.' I observed that she
walked slowly, but I was not aware of her
increasing
weakness. Soon after I heard her sing sweetly
and clearly the hymn that she best loved. It was in
my heart to go and sing with her, but household
occupations
hindered me. When I afterward went,
she was reclining against a turf bank, as if in
slumber
.
On the page of her open book lay a few violets.
I called, `Ellen, love;' she made no reply: I touched
her slightly-clasped hands; they were as marble. She
had found her home, and there was no returning.
Dear, blessed sister! when I have visited her
grave, I have ever wished that some memorial might
mark the spot. Let us raise there a simple stone,
with the inscription, `
He calleth me home;
' or that
line from your favorite poet, `Her spirit was exhaled
and went to Heaven.'
Still gird your heart, my dearest; other woes
remain to be told. As I thus point them out to you,
I seem once more to move among them, and to bear
their impress. You know that this Valley of
Wyoming
has been emphatically debatable ground. The
Pennsylvanians and the Connecticut colonists,
authorized
by their respective state governments,
maintained
opposing claims. Contention soon took the form
of border warfare. Your father bore a conspicuous
part in those times of danger. He was one of those
forty dauntless men from Connecticut who entered
this valley in the winter of 1769, and made
preparations
for the present colony. With them, his family
removed the succeeding spring. Those settlers were
known by the name of the Susquehanna Company,
and came under the auspices of a council convened
at Hartford, and of the excellent Governor Trumbull,
who surely would have sanctioned nothing illegal
or unjust. But the permanent establishment which
we contemplated, was doomed to lay its earliest
foundation
in blood. My anxiety for the safety of your
father it is impossible to describe. The activity and
fearlessness of his character made him indifferent to
peril, and obnoxious to his foes. Civil dissensions
are ever more relentless and tenacious than foreign
war, as diseases of the heart are more obstinate and
difficult of medication than those of the extremities.
The history of those days of discord is but too
familiar to me, dear mother. Will it please you,
rather, to tell me of my brother Edmund?
He was my first-born and my idol. The loss of
an infant son, three years younger than himself, bound
him still more closely to my heart. I made him my
constant companion, and early and continually
infused
into him that knowledge which softens and
beautifies
P
the spirit. His love of learning was too
obvious
and overpowering to be counteracted, and we
left him in the collegiate institution of his native State.
His first visit was in the long autumn vacation, and
he moved among us like a spirit of light and peace.
He found me too deeply nursing the seeds of grief,
and ever, when we were alone, he spoke to me with
such a benignant smile of his beautiful sister and her
happy home, that I was comforted. He said that
Christians erred who invested death with gloom;
that they were thus untrue to their faith, which was
able to disrobe it of terror, and to their Savior, who
had vanquished it for them. He said, would they
but lay, without repining, their friends in the grave,
and go thither peacefully themselves, as to a pillow
of repose, worldlings might thus be won to seek that
strength which the world is unable to give. He
wondered how we could ungratefully withhold from
Him, who for our sakes was `contented to be
crucified
,'
a suffrage which, more than all others, would
establish, in the opinions of men, the excellence of
His Gospel. And when he thus reasoned, in a low,
flute-like tone, and smiled on me as a seraph, who
had felt no stain of earth, I blessed God for the
piety
which, in his soul, had so grown and flourished,
that mine, as a dwarf plant, gladly drank the dewy
superflux that was shaken from its branches. His
morning and nightly supplication was, that peace
might again dwell in our valley, and his father no
longer be a man of war. There came an interval of
quietness, and then our happiness seemed too
exquisite
for earth.
One evening I sat where we now sit, waiting the
return of my adored one from his accustomed walk.
I was finishing for him the same kind of stocking
which I am now knitting for Albert, and which you
just now beguiled from my hand, that I might spread
out to you this `scroll of mourning and wo.' I thought
with exultation of him for whose comfort my hands
were employed. His bright picture, expanded by
maternal love, seemed to enwrap and fold over my
whole soul.
Suddenly, upon our grounds, was the report of
fire-arms. I hastened to the brow of the hillock.
There he lay, stretched at its base. His eyes were
fixed. The last convulsion had passed. Blood
poured from his mouth and breast, and covered the
book on which, but a moment before, he had
meditated
a
silent student; how soon to be made a
seraphic
one! I was spared the sight of the
death-struggle
;
but a horrible distortion of features marked this
violent rupture of flesh from spirit.
The assassin had fled. The deed could never be
traced to its actor. I knew that the doings of war
were fiend-like, but had never imagined a crime like
this.
Your father bore to this very bed the lifeless
remains
of what had been his trust and glory, perhaps
even more than God. A strife of phrensied anger
first shook him, and then that fearful anguish which
the strong man feels when his pride is extinguished
forever. Woman can scarcely fathom a grief like
that. The willow may bow, and become prostrate
as a wreck before the blast, yet be raised up again.
It may live for years with a pierced heart, and even
put forth green branches; but what can it know of
the desolation of the scathed oak, lifting up naught
but a blackened beacon to the traveler, till it
moulders
into dust?
From the stupor that succeeded this paroxysm it
was impossible to arouse him. The powerful mind
which had ruled others, became incapable to rule
itself
.
Thenceforth, he walked as the dead among the
living. Reason dissolved fellowship with memory,
and thought with speech. He scarcely uttered a word
during the dreadful years that were appointed him,
save the name of his murdered first-born.
Mother, I remember him well, and always with
fear, for my playmates told me he was a madman, and
that madmen devoured children. His large black
eyes often fastened strangely upon me, and I sought
to hide myself from him. But you bade me carry him
food, and gather flowers for him, and call him
dear
father
, and it seemed to soothe him. Sometimes I
hoped he would speak to me; but then I heard him
repeating to himself, hoarsely and horribly, `
Edmund's
bloodyes, Edmund's blood!
' and that low
tone,
blood, blood!
haunted me both when I lay down
and when I rose up. I heard it in the sullen winds
that betoken storms, and when I stopped my ears it
was louder still. But in his last sickness, when he
became weak as a child, and you used to lead him
out into the sunbeam, or under the sweet shade of the
flowering trees, the voice was tender and plaintive
with which he so often moaned, `
Edmund, dear
Edmund
!
'
Tears gushed from the mother's eyes, as,
embracing
her daughter, she said, It was this affliction that
humbled me. My other sorrows wounded and
shocked, without subduing my spirit. I strove to
bow to the All-wise, but I wondered why I, more than
others, should be thus bereaved. I believed myself
to be a Christian, yet I thought to nourish my sorrow,
like the anger of the prophet for his gourd, even unto
death. But the humiliation of the mind, in whose
strength I had garnered up my own, taught me true
submission. The tear with which I first
acknowledged
that it was good for me to have been afflicted,
marked an era in my soul's history never to be
forgotten
.
Years of reflection have since confirmed the
precept, that `whatever God wills, we may be sure
is best for us; we can not be sure of what we will for
ourselves.'
Ah! was it thus you gained that meek
expression
of countenance which I so love? and which,
more plainly than words, says, `
Thy will be done
.'
I have sometimes watched you in your slumbers,
and even then, those placid features are a
comment
on our Redeemer's petition, `
Not my will, but
Thine
.'
P 2
Malvina, where can your brother Albert be?
He is not wont thus to linger at the village.
The time occupied in sad narration had, indeed,
fled unconsciously away. The rising moon, silvering
the tree-tops, gave silent witness of the midnight hour.
They waited still longer in anxiety, and then
reluctantly
retired to rest.
But the mother slept not. She ruminated painfully
on her absent son. He was ardent in his
temperament
.
She feared that he might have been beguiled
by unstable companions; and the prayer that only
widowed mothers breathe for an endangered child,
rose up, earnest and tremulous, that he might be
kept from temptation and delivered from evil.
Malvina, in her sleep, was beautiful. Her high,
polished forehead was partially veiled by curls of soft
brown hair, and under the slightly flushed cheek lay
a delicate hand, as in the helpless innocence of
childhood
.
As the maternal eye gazed on her with
delight
,
her repose became disturbed and broken. The
ruby lips quivered, and tears oozed forth from under
her long lashes. Such hold had grief on her spirit
even in dreams.
Morning had not far advanced when a female was
seen approaching. She was recognized as one of the
inhabitants of the village, whose time was principally
devoted to the transmission of news. More
distinguished
for volubility than benevolence, it was
observed
that her activity in imparting the intelligence
which she collected, bore proportion to its bitter
ingredients. On the present occasion her speed
was eminently accelerated. Her feet, if they made
not haste to do evil, were at least swift to
convey
it. To the question respecting the absent one,
the reply of Miss Polly Pierce was rapidly
rendered
.
Your Albert?
Why, where should he be, but
with the sogers that marched out of Wilkesbarre
before the dawn of day to `Forty Fort' to fight the
British and Indians. Have you not heard how they
have come down from Niagara, more than a thousand
strong, and took Wintermoot Fort just as easy as
you'd smash an egg-shell? I believe you never
would hear the leastest news in the world, if I did
not take the pains to find your queer out-of-the-way
place, and tell you.
Observing the mute expression of anguish with
which the mother clasped her hands and raised her
eyes to heaven, she exclaimed,
Why, the land's sake! Miss Dorrance, your
children
are no better flesh and blood than other folks, I
suppose. I am sure Albert, being sixteen, is fully
able-bodied enough to do military duty. You did
not live in our valley when Ogden's block-house was
besieged and taken. The firing, and all the doings
there, was as grand as any we read about in history
books; and I dare say it will be grander to-day,
for at the head of the Wyoming people are
Colonel
Butler, and Colonel Denison, both as bold as
lions.
Do you know any thing of the plan of the
expedition
?
inquired the mother, faintly.
Don't be so afeard, Miss Dorrance. I guess
Colonel Zebulon Butler knows what he is about.
There is no wiser nor better man than he. But the
expedition, as you call it, was got up something in a
hurry, I do expect. It was not worth while to wait to
mince matters, when Brandt, the fierce chief who
tomahawks
every body, had floated down the
Susquehanna
with a power of painted Indians. What way
was there but to go out and meet them, and kill them,
before they could get a chance to kill us? Why, I
am something of a soger myself. I remember as far
back as the old '63 war with the Yankees. I was
right glad when they were driven off, and their
women
,
so mighty delicate, who held their heads up so
much higher than the Pennsylvany people, had to
wade through swamps, and travel sixty miles through
an awful wilderness. I never liked them
Connecticut
settlers; they felt so wonderful grand with their
larning, and made such a fuss about teaching the
children to read and write. But I beg pardon, I
forgot
that you belonged to that class of bodies
yourself
.
Well, I hope your boy will get back again safe
and sound. Why, you are turning as white as a
sheet! Now what's the use of making yourself sick,
Miss Dorrance? Here, Malvey! Malvine! what's
your name? run for some water, and throw it in your
mother's face. I must get away, farther up into
the woods, to Goody Follet's, whose husband and two
sons have gone to the battle, and who, I suppose,
knows no more about the news than you did, till I
took the pains to come and tell you.
Hereupon Miss Polly Pierce prepared to take her
departure; yet, pausing on the threshold, added a
few words:
You know to-morrow is the 4th of July, the
second
anniversary of what they call their Declaration
of Independence. I always thought it was a wicked
thing. I do not believe it will come to any good.
Who can say but the coming of these British and
Indians
is a judgment upon that very account? I
approve
of wars, to be sure, but then the fighting ought
to be between equals, and not against them that the
Lord has anointed and set over us. Brandt would
be a terrible scourge to us if they should get the
victory
.
He knows every cross-path and lurking-hole
in the land. He calls himself the son of Sir William
Johnson, notwithstanding he is an Indian. They say
he has a great cave just on the edge of Canada line,
hung thick round with scalps, all fresh and green,
that he peeled off with his own hands from the heads
of young men and women.
The lonely mother and daughter strove to comfort
each other, and to stay their minds upon God. It
was not appointed that they should long endure the
agony of suspense. That day, the massacre and
conflagration
of Wyoming darkened the annals of our
land. The flight of the villagers from their burning
12
dwellings; their temporary concealment in the
mountains
;
their toilsome way through pathless deserts and
morasses to the distant Delaware, are on the page of
history. Many sick and feeble ones perished. The
wilderness of their disastrous pilgrimage received,
and still retains, the appropriate appellation of the
Shades of Death. The timid Malvina clung to
her mother, and alternately lending and receiving
support, they at length reached a refuge among
pitying
friends.
The tide of war continued to sweep with fierce
fluctuations through the Valley of Wyoming. In its
protracted struggles, it approximated to that state of
society where the right of the strongest reigns, and
the idea of justice, if it comes at all, comes only to
be trodden under foot by passion. The
Connecticut
colonists evinced their national courage and
tenacity
in defence of their homes, and what they
deemed their legal possessions. The
Pennsylvanians
were equally inflexible in what they considered
their antecedent rights. The Aborigines contended
for their favorite dominion with a lion-like despair.
Each party, alternately dispossessed or triumphant,
kept in exercise those energies to which war supplies
so abundant an aliment. Every spot of that rich vale
required and brought its full price in blood. While
Nature there lavished her sweetest charms, man
darkly contrasted them with his own demoniac
passions
.
At length an interval of peace came, like soft blue
through the rent thunder-cloud. The powerful army
of General Sullivan, deputed in 1779 to proceed to
that devoted spot, awed the Indians, and restored
a period of tranquillity. The fugitive colonists
began
to return and rebuild the ruins of
Wilkesbarre
.
But other years elapsed ere the widowed
mother and daughter, with whose fortunes our tale
began, were induced to re-inhabit their
long-deserted
abode.
From its retired situation, it had eluded the eye of
the victors in the massacre, and thus escaped
conflagration
.
It was not till the midsummer of 1782 that
its little casements were observed to be raised, and
the white curtains that formerly shaded them, again
fluttering in the breeze.
But within its walls there was a change. A lady,
on whom disease and sorrow seemed to have done
prematurely and pitiably the work of age, sat in the
arm-chair where of old she had reclined. Around
her mouth was that unvaried, perpetual smile of
fatuity
,
which more than any frown of anger, harrows
the heart of love. She seldom raised her eyes, or
replied directly to any question. There she sat,
bowed over in partial unconsciousness, ever
knitting
,
knitting
. The invincible industry and the
causeless
smile were alike sad to the beholder.
At her side, ministering to her every want, was a
gentle being, whose exceeding beauty, early taking
the cast of pensive thought, was rendered more
touching
,
more sublimated. She hoped, in the warmth of
her filial love, that the influence of long-remembered
scenes might open some of those cells where the
mind was bound as in a prison-house. But the
uncomplaining
invalid, whom severe sickness had
deprived
of energy, drew no prompting from the most
powerful associations.
Dear mother, here are some of the flowers you
were so fond of cultivating. They are in the very
same spot where they were wont to grow. Please
to see how fragrant they are.
Yes, yes, Edmund likes them. Save them for
Edmund.
Will you lean on my arm and take a walk in our
little garden? It is green and beautiful.
I'll wait for Albert. He will come soon. Your
arm is not strong enough. You are but a baby,
Malvina
.
There was still a lingering, though feeble hope,
that the conversation of friends might touch some
chord of the slumbering intellect. But the
broken-minded
one, welcomed each visitor with the same
kind phrase, greeted them with the same unmeaning
smile, and at their departure begged them to wait a
little, till her two sons returned.
It was therefore with less of shuddering than could
have rationally been expected, that Malvina saw
Miss Polly Pierce enter their abode. Who knows,
thought she, but a rough hand may best prevail to
loose the seals of that gentle sufferer's soul?
Good morninggood morning, neighbor
Dorrance
;
welcome to Wyoming again. How
pleasant
you look! You love to see kind old friends, no
doubt. But how mighty thin and crooked you're
growin', and shrunk up short, like a little child.
Have you seen my son Albert?
Albert! Your son! The Lord bless you, my
good woman! Why, nobody could be sure of his
corpse after the battle, it was so dreadfully hacked
and hewed. But one of our old neighbors picked
up a dead hand, and he said it was shaped so
exactly
like yours, Miss Dorrance, that he felt sure it must
have belonged to your child. And only think, it
was clutching a gun, notwithstanding it was cut off.
Malvina convulsively caught hold of the speaker,
as one who anticipates a painful operation
sometimes
grasps the arm of the surgeon.
Why, what is the matter with you, Malvina?
Belike
,
they might have been mistaken in saying that
dead hand was Albert's. There was another story
about his being one of them who was killed at
Bloody Rock. The old squaw sachem had her son
shot by some of the white people, a year or two
before
.
So, after the battle, she was promised twenty
prisoners to pay the debt with, and she had her pick
and choice out of the finest-looking men of
Wyoming
.
The savage creature took the youngest and
handsomest she could find, and put them to death
with the most awfullest tortures. She made all the
blood in their bodies run out upon Bloody Rock, and
its dark, iron-colored stains are plain to be seen
Q
there now. But I never believed Albert was
murdered
there. Considering how spunky he was, I
don't think he outlived the battle.
Well, it was hard for you to lose one that you
sot so much by, I dare say. But your loss is
nothing
to be compared to old Miss Whittlesey's. You
surely can't feel so bad as she. Her two sons were
full out as good-looking as Albert, and older too.
On the massaker-day, as they call it, the youngest
one, Will Whittlesey that washe with the great
blue eyes, and fair, curly hairseeing that the battle
was likely to go hard with us, threw himself into the
water, and swum like a duck to Monockenoch
Island
.
But close behind, pursuing him, was a white
man and an Indian, ready to kill him as soon as they
were able to seize him. When poor Will reached
the island, his breath was e'enajust gone, and he had
scarce strength to hide among the bushes. The men
passed by again and again, searching for him. Then
he knew by the voice that the white man was his
brother Tom, who had joined the British, and his
heart beat freer, for he felt secure. He did not know
that a Tory brother was worse than an Indian foe.
So Tom found Will, and dragged him from his
hiding-place
.
The poor young man, alarmed at his
threatening and fiery face, knelt down, and cried, `Oh!
brother, save me! save me!' `There is no
brotherhood
between us,' said the proud Tory. Then poor
William reminded him how they had played
together
,
and loved each other from their infant years; and
he promised to serve and obey him, and work for
him without wages, if he would only spare his life.
Seeing that his brother looked still furiously at him,
he clasped about his knees, and begged for his life
for their mother's sake. But just as he was crying
`
for our poor mother's sake
,' the cruel dragon shot
him through the breast, and his blood gushed out
over his brother's feet as he fell dead upon them.
A black boy, who had hidden in a thicket near by,
and was not discovered, told the story, and directed
poor Willy's friends where to find his body. There
it lay, with its gaping, deadly wound, while Cain, as
I call him, Cain Whittlesey, fled away, and made his
home with the British in Canada.
Perceiving how fast Malvina's tears flowed, the
narrator exclaimed,
Now don't take on so. What I say is for your
good, that is, for your mother's benefit. I think it is
fitting
she be made to comprehend that her two sons are
dead, seeing she professes to be a Christian woman.
Then, advancing her chair, and raising her tone as
if to one hopelessly deaf, she vociferated,
Good woman! can't you remember about
Tedeuscund
,
the great six-foot Indian, that had his
throat cut and his wigwam burned by the Tuscaroras
in '58, because he favored the whites?
Edmund remembers
.
Edmund don't! for I take it he was not born;
at any rate, you had not moved to Wyoming. Why,
young woman, your mother will get to be a perfect
heathen. She does not appear to know the living
from the dead. Who are you so busy a knitting
stockings for, ma'am?
For my two sons. Malvina must have a pair
when they are provided for. Poor baby! she must
not be forgot when the boys' are ready.
If that don't beat all natur'! Knitting stockings
for men that are dead and gone, and can have no use
for them! It is truly awful! Look here, Miss
Dorrance
!
can't you be made to understand that Albert
was cut as fine as mince-meat by the British, and
that Edmund was shot through the heart by nobody
knows who?
Malvina was sensibly relieved when the entrance
of other visitants put a stop to this harrowing
narration
,
though her mother had listened to it with that
fixed, inexpressive smile of the features in which the
soul has no part. Gradually and gently there was a
failing of strength, and a visible tending downward
to the tomb.
One night she was more than usually restless and
troubled. Toward the morning watch she called out
suddenly, though faintly,
Daughter, daughter! my two sons have come for
me. Lay aside my work, and help me to get ready,
that I may go with them.
And then, as if death for a moment lifted up the
crushed organs of thought, and poured a flood of light
into all the curtained recesses where the mind had
languished, she exclaimed, in ecstasy,
Oh! the depth of the riches, both of the wisdom
and goodness of God! How unsearchable are his
judgments, and his ways past finding out! One more
kiss, dear Malvina. Angels wait for me. The
Savior
will be thy comforter, and thou shalt come to us.
Beloved, it is but a little while
Her embrace relaxed, but the white lips still
murmured
,
Yet a little while, and thou shalt come
A deep sigh wrought itself into the sound
beloved
.
It was the last, and the clay rested in peace.
Dawn came on with a chill shudder, like the grief
that paralyzed the daughter's heart. Sole mourner
as she stood by the side of the dead, she was not able
at once to receive the full sense of her afflictions.
Almost, it would seem as if the young spirit had
taken
flight with the mother it had so long watched, so
pallid was the countenance, so immovable the eye.
But from the stupor of grief she was roused by the
pressure of duties that devolved upon her.
After the funeral obsequies, while the sympathy of
friends was earnest in proposing a change of
residence
and proffering the requisite protection, it was
perceived that her plans were already formed.
During
her exile from Wyoming she had become
acquainted
with the sect of Moravians, and their simple
and soothing spirit of piety had conciliated her
confidence
and regard. It had become her deliberate
decision to take refuge among them, when Heaven
should complete the bereavement for which it had
Q 2
vouchsafed her so long a season of preparation. She
had visited their settlement of converted Indians at
Wyalusing, and witnessed the simple and solemn
worship in their chapel, and saw with delight how
the tenets of Zinzendorff might soften and elevate
even the rude red men of the forest.
After disposing of the small estate left in her
possession
,
she retired to Nazareth, a beautiful Moravian
village in Pennsylvania, and became a resident in the
house of the single sisters. The kiss of welcome
from that vestal train soothed her spirit to peace, as
the dove folded her ruffled pinions at the casement
of the ark, from a world of troubled waters.
The consistent, contemplative piety which
breathed
its serene atmosphere around, soothed her
affliction
.
Unencumbered by any vow of celibacy, which,
in the institutions of the United Brethren, is neither
proposed nor permitted to be taken, she found the
spot which she had chosen, most congenial to her
brotherless and sisterless heart. The culture of
flowers was a favorite solace, and those which her
mother had peculiarly loved she taught to blossom,
or to curtain her window with their fair leaves and
clasping tendrils.
The education of children gave early prominence
to the Moravian establishments of Bethlehem and
Nazareth. One, by its system of instruction for girls,
and the other for boys, acquired deserved celebrity.
From different and distant parts of these states, then
newly united after the War of Revolution, parents
sent thither the young scions of their pride and hope.
They felt it wisdom to intrust their nurture to those
who made religion,
without controversy
, the root of
all their teachings; appealed to it in sorrow as their
consolation; derived from it the rudiments of a
self-denying
benevolence; mingled it, as a heightening
principle, with every joy; and wore its semblance
on their brow in the smile that childhood loves.
Nazareth, by its seclusion from temptation and evil
example, revealed peculiar facilities for a nursery
of the young mind. It has been mentioned that it
was distinguished by its excellent school for boys.
The female children of the village, and a few others,
were also favored in being placed under the
immediate
charge of the single sisters. In this employment
Malvina found delightful scope for her active virtues
and her ever-growing benevolence. To the lonely
and chastened spirit, no vocation is more salutary
than that of instructing the young. Association with
the unbowed and healthful heart, imparts elasticity to
that which has painfully realized either the world's
emptiness or its own infirmity. To feel the
consciousness
of doing good, to unfold the page of knowledge
to the enraptured mind, to gather those grateful
affections
whose root is in that rapture, are unspeakable
privileges.
Malvina, by the gracefulness of true goodness,
taught her pupils the happiness that it inspires. She
walked before them as a good angel, willing a while
to leave heaven's bright heritage for their sakes. The
precepts by which she allured them to piety were
the holy smile that she wore, and the trusting prayer
that she taught them to breathe, both in sorrow and
in joy.
Thus years passed over her, leaving her still
beautiful
.
Time seemed to cast on her neither spot nor
wrinkle, nor any such thing. His commission
respecting
her was to modify, not to extinguish or to
take away; for he has nothing to do with that beauty
which rests not on a set of features or complexion,
but on the tincture of the soul. In the trials and
causes of irritation which sometimes befell her (for
what earthly lot excludes them?), the subdued
expression
of her calm countenance seemed to be,
I
am silent; I offer myself in sacrifice;
while the
brightness
ever beaming from her eye, replied, as if in
rebuke
,
No, not sacrifice, glad incensea hymn of
praise
. Gathering around her the little group that
she so loved to guide, she sometimes said,
My office reminds me of a dream that I once had
in my childhood. Methought I was feeding a white
lamb from a cup of milk. While it took the food, it
looked lovingly up to me as to its mother. Then a
voice, as of the harp, spake from the high clouds,
`Bring the lamb unto me;' and I said, `I will, Lord,'
for I thought it was the voice of the Lamb that was
slain for us.
I awoke, and gave that sweet dream to Memory,
that she might keep it among her honey blossoms.
Now, when she brings it freshly back, it seems that
you, my docile and loving flock, are like that white
lamb. Then I pour out for you the `pure milk of
the Word,' and the spirit of my vision forms itself
into a prayer; and to the charge of my Savior, `Bring
them every one to me,' I answer, perhaps too
fondly
,
`
I will, Lord
.' Help me, blessed ones, that my
promise be not in vain.
It was once, near the close of a long and cloudless
summer Sabbath, that the sun, drawing toward his
rest, cast upon the peaceful roofs and quiet shades of
Nazareth a flood of unwonted brilliance. A train
was seen slowly pursuing a path over the brow of a
verdant hill in the center of the village. Passing
without a glance the beautiful public garden, with
its deep recesses and glowing plants, and arbors, and
fountains, they approached the cemetery, whose gate
was near that of this ornamented domain, as if to
teach the reflecting mind that the exit and entrance of
life are scarcely divided, and that man every where,
as well as in ancient Judea, may find in his garden
a sepulcher.
They paused at the gate of the City of the Dead.
Music from wind-instruments, mingling with
deeptoned
voices, swelled out on the soft breeze
touching
the fountain of tender tears. At first it was
plaintive, as if bidding farewell to beloved scenes in
the name of the sleeper upon the bier. Then,
thrilling
more wildly, it seemed to implore of the genius
of that hallowed spot room for a new habitant, a
narrow
chamber where he might be troubled no more.
They entered the place of tombs. Neither weed,
nor bramble, nor shadow of gloom defaced it. Over
every grave flowers and aromatic shrubs clustered,
and were so thickly interwoven, that the horizontal
stone, bearing the name of the tenant below, was
partially hidden from view.
At an open grave the procession stayed. The
solemn
service in the deep German intonations, from the
lips of the venerable pastor, drew deeper power from
the surrounding scenery. But when the expectant
tomb was about to take its treasure, there was such
a burst of melody, of Him who conquered death,
and brought life and immortality to light through the
Gospel, that the consignment of earth to earth was
not in tears, but in joyous hope.
Surely Music should consecrate the tomb when it
takes the Christian to its bosom. She hath a right to
stand wherever Faith plants an anchor. She
announced
to the shepherds the coming of Him who is
our salvation; let her lift up her voice when the soul
returneth to His arms. It is fitting that the
shrouded
form, which at the last day shall come forth in
glory, should go to its turf-pillow with a sacred song.
What right have despair and weeping to watch over
the body, while the spirit, rejoicing in its
exceeding
great reward, tastes a bliss beyond earth's
imagining
?
The requiem ceased. Little children robed in
white pressed to the very verge of the grave. They
looked steadily into it, with calm, untroubled faces.
It would seem that even they had learned how death
might be deprived of fear.
A group of beautiful girls stood near. They were
of that age when the blossom bursts the green
envelop
of childhood, taking the first perfect rose-tint of
youth. Their heads declined toward each other, like
the bells of the lily of the vale, drooping and
surcharged
with rain. They were long silent. Then
a low, tuneful tone breathed out,
We will not sorrow as without hope. She was
an angel in our path. Will she not still be our
guardian spirit, watchful, though unseen? Other
voices, tremulous and sweet, replied,
It would best please her not to be remembered
by tears, but by the life of goodness she taught us.
Of whom did they speak? Of Malvina, the
beloved
and sainted one, who, by the meekly-endured
sorrows of earth, had been fitted for an abode in
heaven.
THE
LADY OF MOUNT VERNON.
I would not have my land like Rome,
So lofty, and so cold,
Be hers a lowlier majesty,
In yet a nobler mould.
Grenville Mellen
.
13 R
The
state of society in Virginia, a century since,
was unique and imposing. The Ancient
Dominion
retained stronger features of resemblance to
the father-land than any of its sisters. The
manners
of the nobility of England had been
transplanted
,
with little external change, to the territory of
Powhatan. A kind of feudal magnificence, a high
and quick sense of honor, a generous and lordly
hospitality
,
early characterized a State which has given
to this western empire so many of its mightiest and
noblest names.
Traces of these lineaments still exist in that
sunny
clime. Yet our severance from the parent
country
,
while it marred her likeness among all the
colonies
,
obscured it less palpably in the countenance of
her eldest-born. One of the first innovations was
the breaking down of that courtly and almost solemn
etiquette, which had marked the intercourse of the
higher classes. I know your age by the edition of
your manners, said a lady of discernment to a
gentleman
distinguished for politeness. I am certain
that you were educated before the Revolution.
But the republicanism, which may have swept with
too full a tide over our national manners, had, at the
period of which we speak, no existence in Virginia.
The levees of her royal governors, though stripped
of monarchical pomp, displayed a remnant of those
stately steppings of chivalry with which the titled
and the valiant of a former age were accustomed, in
European courts, to pay homage to rank and beauty.
In the winter of 1748, the levees of Governor
Gooch opened with unwonted splendor at
Williamsburg
.
Many of the members of the Assembly took
with them the
lite
of their families, and this session
was graced by the presence of several young and
high-born maidens, who had never before been
presented
at court. One among them was evidently the
theme of general admiration. Some of the statelier
matrons criticised her as deficient in height. But,
though somewhat beneath the middle stature, she
possessed that rounded and exquisite symmetry
which the early historians have ascribed to the
fascinating
Ann Boleyn, while her pure complexion and
clear eye were finely contrasted with dark, glossy,
and redundant hair. Still it was found difficult, by
common observers, to analyze her beauty; for it
rested
not on any predominant gift, but on the consent
of the whole person in loveliness. Grace of
movement
and melody of voice were among its more
apparent
elements. The slight rose-leaf tinge upon
her cheek was heightened when she spoke, or, if the
subject imbodied feeling, deepened to a flush of
carmine
,
disappearing as rapidly as it came. But what
chiefly won old and young, was a bland cheerfulness,
the silent history of the soul's happiness, and an
expressive
smile, inspiring every beholder with
confidence
,
like a beam from the temple of Truth. Though
she had scarcely numbered twice eight summers,
there was about her a womanly dignity which
chastened
the most forward admiration into respect.
Among those who paid their devoirs to this lovely
young creature was Colonel Custis, one of the most
accomplished cavaliers of his time. His tall and
elegant form was adapted to athletic exercises, to
the control of the spirited charger, or the show of
military evolution. Still he appeared to uncommon
advantage in the minuet, which was then executed
among the higher circles in the Ancient
Dominion
with all the precision and grace by which it
was characterized at the court of Louis Fourteenth.
Yet it was observed that this favorite dance, when
shared with the lady whom he admired, was far less
prized than the conversations that followed; when,
with eyes intensely fixed, as if to read the soul, he
recorded each fragment of a word, or the slightest
suffusion of countenance in his heart of hearts.
The Honorable John Custis, of Arlington, held at
that period the office of king's counselor, and was
a man of wealth and distinction. His attendance at
Williamsburg during the present session had been
somewhat interrupted by ill health; and, while there,
the grave and absorbing duties of the statesman had
left him ignorant what reigning beauties had
produced
sensation at court. Not long after the
suspension
of the levees, and the return of the
burgesses
to their homes, the counselor requested an
interview
in his private cabinet with his son, Colonel
Daniel Park Custis. There was a singular mixture
of gravity and condescension in his manner as he
desired
him to be seated, and thus opened the discourse.
I have for some time wished to see you on an
interesting subject. Though still young, I consider
you to have arrived at years of discretion. The
colonel bowed.
You know Colonel Byrd, of Westover, to be my
very particular friend. His daughter is one of the
most beautiful and accomplished ladies in Virginia.
It is my desire that you form with her a matrimonial
alliance.
My dear sir, I have not the vanity of supposing
that I could render myself acceptable to Miss Byrd.
No objection on that head. Her father and
myself
have settled it. Indeed, I may as well tell you
that we have had numberless conversations on this
business, and that you have both been as good as
betrothed from the cradle. Think, my son, of the
advantages of such a connection, the contiguity of
estates, the amount of wealth and power that will
thus ultimately pass into your hands.
Affection, sir, seems to me the only bond that
can hallow so intimate a union. Not even my
reverence
for the best of fathers, could induce me to
enter it from mercenary motives.
Mercenary, sir! mercenary! Who ever before
R 2
dared to couple that word with my name? And
the counselor raised himself to his full height, and
fixed a kindling eye upon his son. Then, pacing the
apartment a few turns, he resumed his theme. You
speak of the affection that should precede marriage.
Have the goodness to understand that the misplacing
of yours may materially affect your patrimonial
inheritance
.
He waited for a reply, but in vain.
May I inquire if you have thought fit thus early
to decide seriously on the preference of any young
lady as a companion for life?
I have, sir.
May I be favored with a knowledge of her
name?
Miss Martha Dandridge.
The high-spirited gentlemen parted in mutual
resentment
.
But the reflection of a night restored
both to better feelings. The father began to excuse
the son by recalling the warmth of his own early
attachment
;
while the son referred the testiness of the
father to the sudden disappointment of a
long-cherished
plan, and the querulousness of feeble health.
Still, as it usually happens with proud men, neither
would make the first advance to open his heart to
the other; and a slight, though clearly perceptible
shade of coldness gathered over their intercourse.
So this interview served as a stimulant to the
progress
of matrimony. The temporary reserve of the
father, throwing something like gloom over the
paternal
mansion, heightened the frequency and fervor
of the visits of the lover. The gentle object of his
preference imagined no barrier to an alliance where
no obvious inequality was supposed to exist; and he
forbore to communicate what would only occasion
perplexity, and what, he trusted, would soon vanish
like the baseless fabric of a vision. According
to his happy prescience, the dignified counselor
gave his consent to the nuptials, and the flower of
the court of Williamsburg became a bride in the
blush of her seventeenth summer.
The residence of the new pair was a retired and
romantic
mansion on the banks of the Pamumkey. It
reared its snowy walls amid a profusion of vines and
flowering trees. Broad plantations, and the wealth of
Virginian forests, variegated the scenery. Rural
occupations
,
and the delight of each other's society,
spread for them what they deemed a paradise. In
visits to their favored dwelling, the counselor learned
to appreciate the treasure of his new daughter. Her
excellence, in the responsible sphere to which she
was introduced, won his regard; and, with the
ingenuousness
of an honorable mind, when convinced
of error, he sought every opportunity of
distinguishing
that merit to which he had once done injustice.
When he saw the grace and courtesy with which
she maintained a generous hospitality; the
judgment
,
far beyond her years, displayed in the
management
of her servants; the energy, the early
rising
,
the cheerful alacrity that regulated and
beautified
the internal mechanism of her family; the
disinterestedness with which she forgot herself and
sought the good of others; but, above all, her
untiring
devotion to her husband, and to the little ones
who sprang up around her, he gloried in the
sentiment
of his son, that strong personal affection should
form the basis of matrimonial happiness.
But this scene of exquisite felicity was not long to
last. The death of the two oldest children prepared
the way for the deeper loss of the adored husband
and father. Yet in the trying situation of a young,
beautiful, and wealthy widow, she continued to evince
unvarying discretion, and faithfully to discharge
every
important duty.
It was in the spring of 1758 that two gentlemen,
on horseback, attended by a servant, wound their
way slowly through the luxuriant scenery that
diversifies
the county of New Kent. The
conspicuous
personage of the group was tall, graceful, and
commanding, in a rich military undress, and
apparently
about twenty-five years of age. He would
have been a model for the sculptor when Rome was
in her best days. His companion was an elderly
man in a plain garb, who, by the familiarity with
which he pointed out surrounding objects, would
seem to be taking his daily round upon his own
estate. As they approached the avenue to an
antique
mansion, he placed his hand upon the rein of
his companion:
Nay, Colonel Washington, let it never be said
that you passed the house of your father's friend
without dismounting. I must insist on the honor of
detaining you as my guest.
Thanks to you, my dear sir; but I ride in haste,
the bearer of dispatches to our governor in
Williamsburg
,
which may not brook delay.
Is this the noble steed which was given you by
the dying Braddock on the fatal field of
Monongahela
?
and this the servant he bequeathed you at the
same time?
Washington answered in the affirmative.
Then, my dear colonel, thus mounted and
attended
,
you may well dine with me, and by
borrowing
somewhat of this fine moonlight, reach
Williamsburg
ere his excellency shall have shaken off his
morning slumbers.
Do I understand that I may be excused
immediately
after dinner?
Immediately, with all the promptness of military
discipline.
Then, sir, I accept your hospitality, and
gracefully
throwing himself from his spirited charger, he
resigned him to his English servant, giving, at the
same time, strict orders for the hour of departure on
their urgent journey.
I am rejoiced, Colonel Washington, said the
hospitable old gentleman, thus fortunately to have
met you on my morning ride; and the more so, as I
have some guests who may make the repast pass
pleasantly, and will not fail to appreciate a young
and gallant soldier.
Washington bowed his thanks, and was introduced
to the company. Virginia's far-famed hospitality was
well set forth in that spacious baronial hall. The
social feast was closed precisely at the time the host
had predicted. The servant also was punctual. He
knew the habits of his master. At the appointed
moment he stood with the horses caparisoned at the
gate. Yet long did the proud steed champ his bit,
and curve his arching neck, and paw the broken turf.
And much did the menial marvel, as, listening to
every footstep that paced down the avenue, he saw
the sun sink in the west, and yet no master appear.
When was he ever before known to fail in
punctuality
?
The evening air breathed cool and damp,
and soothed the impatience of the chafing courser.
At length orders came that the horses should be put
up for the night. Wonder upon wonder! when his
business with the governor was so urgent! The sun
rode high in the heavens the next day ere
Washington
mounted for his journey. No explanation was
given. But it was rumored that among the guests
was a beautiful and youthful widow, to whose charms
the hero had responded. This was farther
confirmed
by his tarrying but a brief space at Williamsburg,
and retracing his route with unusual celerity, and
becoming a frequent visitor at the house of the late
Colonel Custis in that vicinity, where, the following
year, his nuptials were celebrated. And rare and
high, says G. W. P. Custis, Esq., the descendant
and biographer of the lady, rare and high was the
revelry at that palmy period of Virginia's festal age;
for many were gathered to that marriage of the good,
the great, the gifted, and the gay; while Virginia,
with joyful acclamations, hailed in the prosperous
and happy bridegroom her favorite chief.
Henceforth the life of the Lady of Mount Vernon
is a part of the history of her country. In that
hallowed
retreat she was found entering into the plans
of Washington, sharing his confidence, and making
his household happy. There her only daughter,
Martha Custis, died in the bloom of youth; and a
few years after, when the troubles of the country
drew her husband to the post of commander-in-chief
of her armies, she accompanied him to Boston, and
witnessed its siege and evacuation. For eight years
he returned no more to enjoy his beloved residence
on the banks of the Potomac. During his absence
she made the most strenuous efforts to sustain her
added responsibilities, and to endure, with
changeless
trust in Heaven, continual anxiety for the safety
of her husband and the fate of the country. At the
close of each campaign she repaired, in compliance
with his wishes, to headquarters, where the ladies of
the general officers joined her in forming such a
society
as diffused a cheering influence over even the
gloom of such winters as those at Valley Forge and
Morristown. The opening of every campaign was
the signal of the return of Lady Washington (as she
was called in the army) to her domestic cares at
Mount Vernon. I heard, said she, the first and
the last cannon of the Revolutionary war. The
rejoicings
which attended the surrender of Cornwallis
in the autumn of 1781 marked for her a season of
the deepest private sorrow. Her only remaining
child, Colonel John Custis, the aid-de-camp of
Washington, became, during his arduous duties at
the siege of Yorktown, the victim of an epidemic
fever, and died at the age of twenty-seven. He
was but a boy of live years at the time of her second
marriage, and had drawn forth strongly the affection
and regard of her illustrious husband, who shared her
affliction for his loss, and by the tenderest sympathy
sought its alleviation.
After the close of the war a few years were
devoted
to the enjoyment and embellishment of their
beloved Mount Vernon. Returning peace and
prosperity
to the land of their birth gave pure and bright
ingredients to their cup of happiness. Their
mansion
was thronged with guests of distinction, all of
whom remarked with admiration the energy of the
Lady of Mount Vernon in the complicated duties of
a Virginian housekeeper, and the elegance and grace
with which she presided at her noble board.
The voice of a free nation, conferring on General
Washington the highest honor in its power to
bestow
,
was not obeyed without a sacrifice of feeling.
It was in the spring of 1789 that, with his lady, he
bade adieu to his tranquil abode, to assume the cares
of the first presidency. In his domestic
establishment
,
as in his political course, he mingled the
simplicity
of a Republic with that true dignity which he felt
necessary to secure the respect of older governments.
The furniture of his house, the livery of his servants,
the entertainment of his guests, displayed elegance,
while they rejected ostentation. In all these
arrangements
his beloved consort was a second self. Her
Friday evening levees, at which he was always
present
,
exhibited that perfect etiquette which should
mark the intercourse of the dignified and high-bred.
Commencing at seven, and closing at ten, they lent
no more sanction to late hours than to levity. The
first lady of the nation still preserved the habits of
early life. Indulging in no indolence, she left her
pillow at dawn, and after breakfast retired to her
chamber an hour for the study of the Scriptures and
devotion. This practice, it is said, during the period
of half a century, she never omitted. The duties of
the Sabbath were dear to her. The president and
herself attended public worship with regularity, and
in the evening he read to her in her chamber the
Scriptures and a sermon.
The spring of 1797 opened for them with the most
pleasing anticipations. The burdens of high office
were resigned, and they were about to retire for the
remainder of their days to the delightful shades of
Mount Vernon. The new turf, springing into
greenness
wherever they trod, the vernal blossoms
unfolding
to greet them, the warbled welcome of the birds
were never more dear, as they returned to their
rural
retreat, hallowed by the recollections of earlier
S
years, and of duties well performed. Alas! in two
years Washington was no more. The shock of his
death, after an illness of only twenty-four hours, fell
like a thunderbolt upon the beloved and bereaved
woman. That piety which had so long been her
strength, continued its support, but her heart
drooped
.
Cheerfulness did not utterly forsake her, yet
she discharged the habitual round of duties as one
who felt that the glory had departed.
How beautiful and characteristic was her reply
to the solicitations of the highest authority of the
nation, that the remains of her illustrious husband
might be removed to the seat of government, and a
monument erected to mark the spot of their repose.
Taught by the great example which I have had
so long before me, never to oppose my private
wishes
to the will of my country, I consent to the request
made by Congress; and, in doing this, I need not, I
can not say what a sacrifice of individual feeling I
make to a sense of public duty.
The intention of the Congress of 1799 has not
been executed, nor the proposed monument erected.
The enthusiasm of the time passed away, and the
many and conflicting cares of a great nation turned
its thoughts from thus perpetuating
his
memory,
whose image, it trusted, would be embalmed by an
imperishable gratitude.
Scarcely were two years of her lonely widowhood
accomplished ere the Lady of Mount Vernon felt
the approach of death. Gathering her family around
her, she impressed on them the value of that religion
which from youth she had trusted, and loved onward
to hoary hairs; then calmly resigning her soul into
the hands of Him who gave it, full of years and full
of honors, she was laid in the tomb of Washington.
In this outline of the lineaments of the Lady of
Mount Vernon, we perceive that it was neither the
beauty with which she was endowed, nor the high
station which she attained, that gave enduring lustre
to her character, but her Christian fidelity in those
duties which devolve upon her sex. These fitted
her to irradiate the home, to lighten the cares, to
cheer the anxieties, to sublimate the enjoyments of
him who, in the expressive language of Chief-justice
Marshall, was so favored of Heaven as to depart
without exhibiting the weakness of humanity.
Though this slight sketch can boast no element of
attraction for the lover of romance, yet the symmetry
of her character whom it aims to portray, and her
identification with him whom all delight to honor,
should claim a place in the lasting remembrance and
love of the American people.
A TALE OF POLAND.
Oh! moments to others, but ages to me,
I have sate with the brow of the dead on my knee;
In the purple of eve, at the flashing of morn,
I have bent o'er the cherish'd, that left me forlorn,
And I gazed on the dimness that froze in the eye,
So bright in its burning, its glances so high,
And I watch'd the Consumer, as ever he crept,
And feasted where beauty and glory had slept.
Ransom
.
14 S 2
Among
the pleasant abodes which, during the
happier
days of Poland, diversified the suburbs of
Warsaw
,
was one which always attracted the attention of
the traveler. It was less distinguished by splendor
than by that combination of elegance with simplicity
not common in a country where the palace and the
hut, standing side by side, contrasted the extremes
of opulence and poverty. Situated on a gentle
eminence
,
overshadowed by trees, and imbosomed in
shrubbery, it seemed modestly seeking to hide its
own elevation. A dark forest in the background
strongly defined the outline of its white turrets, while
the sighing sound of the wind through the branches
mingled with the murmurs of the neighboring Vistula
like melancholy music.
This sweetly rural retreat was the residence of
John Radzivil, a descendant from the ancient
nobility
of Poland. Nurtured in the loftiness of liberty,
there was ever upon his brow a painful
consciousness
of the subjugation of his country. Burying
himself
in retirement, he turned his attention to such
pursuits as might not rouse the jealousy of despotism,
though the temper of his mind was rather to court
the storm than to cower beneath it. The
dismemberment
of his native realm, her loss of a seat among
the nations, and the oppressive dynasty of Russia,
darkened his meditations and imbittered his solitude.
But in his own home was a spirit of peace,
suggesting
endurance, or striving to awaken hope.
Ulrica
,
the gentle and beautiful one, with whom a union
of ten years had left his love unimpaired, employed
the whole force of her influence to win him from
melancholy themes. Deep acquaintance with
historic
lore, and warm native sympathies, led her
feelingly
to deplore the immolation of her country; but
the spirit of piety which had taken possession of her
soul taught her to deprecate every vengeful and
hostile
purpose, and to view the voluntary shedding of
blood, not only as an evil to be dreaded, but a
sin to be shunned. Capable of appreciating the
higher and bolder energies, her happiness was
imbosomed
in domestic duties and affections, and she
sought to inspire all her household with that love
of peace which preserves the fountains of bliss
untroubled
.
It was her delight to lull her infant with
such low, quiet music, that sleep would hang long
suspended upon the half-closed lids, itself a listener.
Even the little trusting sparrow, that in pursuit of
crumbs had ventured to pass the threshold, would
seem to linger at the sound of those exquisite
melodies
,
standing long upon one foot, and turning its
head rapidly from side to side, as if longing to bear
to the children of its own nest those soothing and
tuneful strains. She loved to instruct her daughter
in those accomplishments that render home
delightful
,
and by the influence of a sweet, subduing smile
to recall her if her young spirit wandered or was
weary. But most of all, she loved to cheer his
despondence
whose heart reposed its confidence on hers;
and when it encountered those thorns and brambles
with which the curse of Adam hath sown the earth,
to restore in its own sanctuary some image of
cloudless
Eden. Yet their bower of bliss was not free
from the intrusion of care. Ulrica felt deep anxiety
for her little son, in whom she could not but perceive
the incipient tastes of a warrior. The piercing eye
and raven locks, which he inherited from his father,
gave to the exceeding beauty of his childhood a lofty
expression, which no beholder could witness without
repeating the gaze of admiration. His mother,
discerning
the structure of his mind in infancy, labored
continually to stamp upon its waxen tablet the
impress
of peace. Even then the ground seemed
preoccupied
.
Every leaf of olive that she cherished
was plucked as if by an invisible hand. Often, when
she flattered herself that the warbled melody of some
sacred lay had reached and won his soul, he would
suddenly raise his head from her bosom, and say,
Sing me the battle song of Sobieski, when he
rushed upon the Turk; it is far finer music.
Sometimes, when she narrated from the Blessed
Volume the lives of the men of peace, of the
apostles
,
who went forth bearing the precious Gospel, and
of heaven's hymn, sung by angels to the watching
shepherds when the Redeemer of sinners was born,
he would exclaim,
Tell me now of him who slew the Egyptian when
he saw him mocking his people, and of the stripling
who beheaded the giant, and of that glorious
warrior
who bade the sun and the moon to stand still in
their courses, that he might have light, and a long
day to destroy his enemies.
The oppressive government of the Grand-duke
Constantine became every day more intolerable. It
assumed the worst forms of wanton cruelty.
Surrounded
by his Russian minions, he took delight in
humbling the nobility of Poland, subjecting them to
causeless penalties and offensive vassalage. In
addition
to these brutal abuses of power, a system of
espionage was established in Warsaw, so strict that
home was no sanctuary. It extended even to the
schools. He was not ashamed to employ emissaries
and reporters among infants. He desired to crush
in the bud every indication of the love of liberty.
Even the enthusiasm that lingered around the fallen
glory of Poland was visited as a crime; and
trembling
History hid her annal from the eye of
Despotism
.
A boy had inscribed on his seat in school the date
of some event distinguished in the record of his
country
.
This circumstance was deemed of sufficient
importance
to be transmitted to Constantine, who
sentenced
him to be torn from his parents and placed
for life in the lowest ranks of the army, yet held
incapable
of advancement. The unhappy mother sought
long and vainly for an audience. Once, when
leaving
his palace for an excursion of pleasure, she threw
herself at his feet, imploring, in the most piercing
accents, mitigation of the doom of her miserable child.
Provoked at her perseverance, he spurned her with
his foot, and deigning no reply, ascended his
carriage
.
It is not surprising that such arbitrary deeds
should affect with peculiar sympathy the mother of
young Radzivil. She knew the unconquerable
boldness
of the boy, and her nights were sleepless with
dread lest he, too, should be marked as a victim for
the tyrant. She communicated her fears to her
husband
.
Ulrica, he replied, gravely, the current of the
boy's soul is deep beyond his years. The soaring
eaglet may not be restrained by the plaintive
murmur
of the dove.
But Ulrica daily counseled her son. She strove to
press into his soul the precepts of that religion which
forbids retaliation. She selected from history the
examples
of those princes and statesmen whose pacific
policy promoted the prosperity of their realm, and
the happiness of their people. She simplified for
him the most exquisite passages of those ancient
philosophers, who extol the excellence of patient
virtue
and serene contemplation. She exerted all of
woman's eloquence, and of a mother's love, to make
his young soul a listener and a convert.
Mother, when I was at Cracow with my father, I
visited in the Cathedral the tombs of our ancient
heroes
.
I found where Sobieski lies. I stood long
at the tomb of Kosciusko. The light faded, and
darkness began to settle upon the lofty and solemn
arches while I stood there. Methought a voice came
forth from these ashes and talked with me of his glory,
of his sufferings, and of the Russian prisons where
he so long pined. And then it seemed as if he
himself
stood before me, that brave old man, covered
with scars, and with the tears of Poland; and ere I
was aware, I said, I will love Kosciusko, and hate
Russia forever.
Ulrica gazed silently upon the boy. She had
never
seen any thing so beautiful as that lofty and pure
brow, inspired with emotions defying utterance. His
full eye cast forth a flood of living lustre, and his
graceful form rose higher as he ceased to speak. Not
Hannibal, when, in the presence of Hamilcar, he
uttered the vow of eternal hatred to Rome, could
have evinced more strongly how the soul may lift up
the features of childhood into a commanding and
terrible
beauty. The mother wondered at the strange
awe that stole over her. She almost trembled to
enter
the sanctuary of that mind, lest she might
displace
imagery that Heaven had consecrated, or lay
her hand unwittingly upon the very ark of God.
For a moment she thought, what if this being, so
mighty even in his simple elements, should be the
decreed deliverer of his oppressed country!
It was but a moment that this enthusiasm
prevailed
.
The boy saw the tears glittering in her eye,
and hastened to throw himself upon her neck.
Mother, I will no longer sing the songs of
Sobieski
,
nor speak to my companions of Pulaski or
Kosciusko, since it gives you pain. But when I see
the proud Russian soldiers parading in the squares
at Warsaw, and Constantine lording it over our
people
,
can I help my heart from rising up, and the
blood from feeling hot in my forehead?
The features of the Russian dynasty continued to
gather harshness and asperity. The grand-duke
became
daily more odious to the people he ruled.
Conscious
of unpopularity, and partaking of that distrust
which ever haunts tyranny, he retired from the royal
palace to one in the vicinity of Warsaw, where he
might be under the immediate protection of his own
troops. It was no satisfaction to the Radzivil family
that the new abode of Constantine was in their own
immediate neighborhood. Still trusting to find safety
in seclusion, they devoted themselves to the nurture
of their children, and to the varieties of rural
existence
.
Autumn was now deepening to its close. The
voice of the Vistula, swollen by rains, became more
audible, hoarsely chafing against its banks. Nature,
at the approach of her dreariest season, disrobes of
their gayety even her inanimate offspring, and pours
heaviness into the hearts of the animal creation. The
elk, roaming with his branching horns through the
forest, bore upon his aspect an expression of deep
melancholy. The titmouse, whose pendulous nest
studded the branches, forgetting its irascible temper,
and disappointed in its supply of aquatic insects,
gathered with drooping wing around the peasant's
cottages in quest of other food. The bobac prepared
a soft lining for its subterranean cell, and gathered
its gregarious community for the long sequestration
of winter. But where shall the human race find
refuge
from strife and oppression? Earth hath no
recess
where man's inhumanity to man may not
penetrate
.
It was near the close of one of the shortening and
gloomy days that Ulrica became alarmed at the
absence
of her son. He had prolonged his usual walk
with his little sister about his father's grounds, and
she had returned without him. As this was of
frequent
occurrence, it would scarcely have excited
observation
,
but for the heightened state of maternal
solicitude. The bold bearing of the boy, and his
denunciations of tyranny, had signalized him among
his companions, and induced his parents to withdraw
him from the public school. They had also deemed
it prudent, since the royal residence had been placed
in their vicinity, to interdict his leaving their own
domain without an attendant.
Now twilight darkened, and he returned not. The
earnest search of the whole household was in vain.
Little Ulrica watched and listened for his footsteps
till the curtains were drawn and the lamps lighted,
T
and then retired to her bed to weep. All the
machinery
that agonized affection could command was
put in requisition. But the most persevering efforts
could obtain no tidings, save that a child had been
seen hurried toward the palace by two Russian
soldiers
,
and apparently resisting their purpose. The
whole influence of an ancient and noble family was
made to bear upon the recovery of this beloved
representative
,
only to reveal its utter inefficacy.
Inquiry
,
reward, and menace were alike powerless.
The system of the despot was a sealed book. I
will myself go to the duke, said Ulrica to her
husband
.
God has given him a human heart. Who
can say but it may in some point be vulnerable to
compassion?
John Radzivil felt that such an appeal was
hopeless
.
Yet, as a drowning man rejects not the straw
floating on the element that destroys him, he
forbore
to dissuade her from the enterprise.
The next morning the suffering mother sought the
palace of Constantine. She went under the
protection
of Count Turno, a Polish nobleman, who had
for years maintained a degree of ascendency over
the mind of the duke, and was sometimes able to
soften the violence of his measures. By a singular
combination of talent, and an accurate knowledge of
the hidden springs of action, he had succeeded in
gaining the confidence of the tyrant, without the
sacrifice
of either integrity or honor. But consummate
prudence was requisite to maintain a post so
hazardous
.
On the present occasion he dared venture only
to introduce the suppliant, and to repeat the
injunction
that her words should be few. Open
interference
on his part would, he knew, be fatal to the
cause in which both his patriotism and his early
friendship for the Radzivil family deeply participated.
When Ulrica entered the chamber of audience,
the grand-duke turned away, as if determined to
avoid her. Then his blue eye settled for a moment
on her, cold as Russian snows. Arrested by her
beauty and dignified deportment, aided in their
effect
by the rich and becoming costume of the Polish
nobility, he reluctantly, though not ungracefully, gave
attention.
Great prince, you see before you the wife of
John Radzivil. She seeks your presence a
wretched
suppliant for her lost son. These three days and
nights our search for him has been unremitting, but
in vain. He was last seen in charge of two of the
soldiers of your guard. Let me supplicate your
clemency to give orders for his restoration.
Madam, the commission under which I act, takes
no cognizance of wandering babes. I supposed that
the mothers of Poland better understood both my
duties and their own.
Sire, our lost one was but a child. He had not
numbered ten winters. If he was guilty of folly or
rashness, I beseech you to restore him to his parents,
that they may carefully instruct him not again to
offend
.
The haughty lip of Constantine curled as he spoke.
You were in truth nourishing a viper. If his
venom has chanced to fall upon yourselves, look to
it. Fill not my ears with your complaints. He was
a rebel, and a ripe one, though so young in years.
Ulrica fell on her knees, and, raising her clasped
hands, exclaimed.
Spare the life of the child! A broken-hearted
mother implores your pity for her only son. So
shall the Judge and Father of us all, be merciful to
you in your time of adversity.
Take away this mad woman, said Constantine
to his attendants. Turno, is there never to be an
end of these Polish maniacs?
Ulrica rose and returned to her home. She
uttered
no complaint. There was a strength in her
sorrow that refused the channel of words. Radzivil
saw in the fixed glance of her eye that hope had
departed
.
Ulrica, seek to bind me no longer at the footstool
of peace. As the Lord liveth, it shall no more be
peace, but a sword. There is a point beyond which
endurance is sin. Poland stands upon that verge.
The tyrant shall fall. Faithful and proud hearts
have sworn it. I will no longer withhold myself
from their covenant. My soul has lain still, and
smothered its hatred for your sake. Your sighs of
peace have stolen over it like the breath of flowers,
weakening its purpose. My counsel of submission
has been my reproach among patriots. They have
called it my watchword. Their brows grew dark
when I uttered it. It was your spirit breathing
through my lips. I deemed it the spirit of Heaven,
and bade the wrath of the warrior that boiled in my
breast bow down before it. Henceforth I cast away
its chains. I wear no longer the yoke of a craven
policy. I will resist unto bloodunto death. And
may God so deal with me as I do valiantly for
Poland
.
The discontent, which had been but ill-suppressed
in the bosoms of a free people, burst forth. Plans
long fostered in their nightly conclaves came
suddenly
to maturity. On the evening of November
29th, 1830, the beacon light sprang up on the banks
of the Vistula. The concerted signal had been the
burning of a house, on the borders of that river, at
the hour of seven. The clocks of Warsaw struck
seven. How many hearts struggled with
unutterable
emotion at that sound!
The expected flame threw out its red banner.
The shout of To arms! came with that flash, as
thunder follows the lightning. Throngs of patriots
were at their appointed posts. Officers rode through
the streets inspiring the people. Students, and boys
from the schools in warlike array, marched to the
headquarters of the enemy. The rush was
tremendous
.
Two thousand Russian cavalry, panic-struck,
dispersed. The grand-duke threw himself from the
window of his palace, and, aided by darkness and
disguise, escaped. The gates of the city were in
T 2
possession of the patriots. The prisons were stormed.
Multitudes of pale, emaciated victims came forth,
astonished
,
from their dungeons, as the dead once
mingled
with the living, when strange darkness hung
over Calvary.
At midnight, Poland paused amid the miracle of
her Revolution, and, kneeling, gave thanks to
Jehovah
.
It was a moment of sublimity, when that
immense
multitude, rendered visible by the red
torchlight
,
humbled themselves to earth, and, amid the
most impassioned joy, swelled the response of
Praise to Godto God the deliverer!
The next morning brought Ulrica a note from her
husband.
Warsaw is ours! no Russian foot pollutes it.
Poland breathes once more in freedom the air of her
own capital. Every spot overflows with rejoicing
people. Old hoary-headed men give us their
blessing
,
and children brandish their weapons with the
shrill cry of liberty. As for me, I am searching
every
dungeon, every fastness, every den, where it is
possible for despotism to have incarcerated our brave,
our beautiful one. I will return no more to my house
until I restore him to your arms, or whisper in your
ear those words, less appalling than our suspense, he
is no more.
All day long, while acclamations rent the air, and
the peasantry by thousands were flocking into the
city to hail the men who had delivered their country,
Ulrica sat still in the house. One deep, measureless,
inexpressible emotion absorbed all lesser sympathies.
At every footstep, at the echo of every voice, her
heart, like the mimosa, shrank, trembled, folded
itself
.
The hours seemed interminable.
At length twilight approached, evening darkened.
Even her chastened spirit revolted at the prospect of
passing another night of unmitigated suspense. Her
children slumbered. There was no sound save of
their quiet breathing. She looked out upon the
solemn
stars, and strove to rise above them in
communion
with their Maker. Suddenly there was a
trampling
of horses in the court-yard. The power of
motion
deserted her. The next moment, Radzivil was
in her apartment. He laid on the bed something
wrapped in a cloak, and for a moment restrained her
in his arms as she was rushing toward it.
My son! my son! speak, Radzivil. Tell me that
he lives!
He lives, Ulrica; but the life of life is fled. It
were a lighter thing to have seen him in the sleep of
death.
Perceiving that she would no longer be withheld,
he uncovered the face. All the fortitude that she had
invoked from above was needful for that moment.
Emaciated, haggard, his beautiful hair shorn close to
his head, his eye devoid of lustre or intelligence, and
every feature apparently transmuted to portray the
dull, dreaming, hideous contortions of idiocy.
Yet he still breathed; and with that consciousness
hope, the comforter, came into the heart of the
mother
.
The
heart of the mother!
that only heart whose
love falters not under the cloud or through the sea,
till death smites down its idol. Even then it resigns
hope only to call forth a memory which, tender as
love itself, gathers, like the winged chemist of the
air, honeyed essence from thorn-clad and unsightly
plants.
Ulrica perceived that to her embraces there was
no response, to her words no answer. Food the
famished boy received voraciously, and with a
wolf-like
appetite, yet regarded not the hand that gave it.
All the accustomed avenues to the soul seemed
irrevocably
closed.
By what excesses of diabolical cruelty, said the
father, could they thus have completed the wreck
of one of the most noble and beautiful beings ever
born of woman? None could tell me aught of his
history. The keepers of his dungeon were what they
ought to becorpses. While crowds of liberated
and ghastly wretches were thronging forth to the
light of heaven, I descended to the vaults they had
left. I explored them until I became almost
hopeless
.
At last in a cold, solitary cell, I discovered
this ruin of humanity. Nothing but parental instinct
could have guided me to that hidden recess, or
convinced
me that this was indeed my own son. To
my caresses, to the maddened anguish with which I
repeated his name, he spoke nothing. He moved
not. But when I raised him in my arms he
struggled
and contended. Then I perceived that his
exhaustion
was not physical. I still trusted that the
disease which had changed him might be healed.
But when we brought him forth to the sunbeam,
gazing into his eyes, I saw that the mind had fled
forever.
A deep vow of implacable vengeance closed the
agonized recital.
Radzivil, beloved, look not so wildly. I pray
you, speak not thus rashly. Our son may yet
recover
to bless us.
On these holy promptings of love and hope the
mother acted. Night and day she nursed the
miserable
boy. With consummate prudence she
administered
that nourishment which his exhausted state
rendered
both necessary and hazardous. She rocked
him in her arms, as in his infancy, holding his head
for hours on her bosom, sometimes murmuring
softly
and tunefully in his ear, as if she would breathe
into him her own soul. Occasionally she fancied that
there was a quickening of the mind, and then poured
forth that inspiring music which harmonized with its
native structure, and was wont to heighten the
gladness
of his childhood to ecstasy. The songs of
Sobieski
rang as exultingly through his chamber, as if
they rose not from a breaking heart. It was in vain.
The chords of melody might be touched no more.
Still the tender eye that had scanned acutely the
elements
of his nature, would not believe that its deep
and strong affections had become extinct. Her fair
infant had formerly been his last thought at night,
15
his first in the morning. To lull it himself to sleep,
and to elicit its gay shout of mirth at waking, were
among the objects of his childish ambition. The
mother laid it upon his lap, and it smiled on him;
but he extended no arm to receive it: he writhed,
as if to free himself from a burden. He evinced
neither desire nor dislike, but that fearful inanity,
that deadness to all emotion, that groveling and
growing
likeness to material things which are among the
most appalling indications of lapsed intellect.
His little sister, whom from her birth he had loved
as himself, was ever by his side. She twined her
arms about his neck, but he was uneasy at their
pressure
.
She laid her hand gently upon his head, and
wept at the absence of those clustering curls that
were once her admiration and pride. She gazed
long and earnestly in his eyes with tears standing in
her own, like big rain-drops in the violet's heart.
She spoke long, in her sweetly modulated tones, of
their sports, of their walks together, of the wild
flowers
they had found in their own secret places, and of
the stories he had told her of the daring of Pulaski
and Kosciusko.
Shall we not pursue each other again, dear
brother
,
through the garden walks? and will you launch
your boat on the little stream that runs so swiftly
toward
the Vistula? And shall the baby clap its little
hands when you brandish your mimic sword? And
will we say our nightly prayers again with one voice,
kneeling down by our mother?
Every effort of the ardent child ended in
disappointment
:
not a single glance of attention rewarded
her. It was evident that the links between thought
and speech were broken. Even those faint and
casual
glimmerings of emotion which, though causeless,
had served feebly to unite him to humanity and to
hope, gradually disappeared. There had been
sometimes
an inarticulate murmuring, like sullen
discontent
,
or a distortion of the brow, as if from transient
terror. Even these were precious to the parents who
hung over his couch, as the dawn, though heavy and
ominous with clouds, is hailed by those who watch
for the morning. But these sad signals faded, and
nothing remained but the action of the lungs, the
sluggish current in the veins, the aimless movement
of the muscles, as if without volition, and the animal
appetites of idiocy. The beauty, which he had once
possessed in so remarkable a degree as to have been
pronounced perfect, vanished with the emanations of
mind; even the proportions and chiseling of the clay
lost their symmetry.
At length death came, the messenger of mercy.
There was a pitiful and unearthly cry from that
collapsed
heart when the ice entered into it; but no
accent
,
no pressure of the hand, for affection to linger
over and embalm. One ray of exceeding brightness
kindled in the eye: it was the spirit passing forth in
gladness from its deep eclipse. Only for a moment
was that lustre seen. Then there were bitter gaspings
and strugglings, as of the swimmer when he buffets
the fatal wave. So that even love besought in
agony
the release of what it had worshiped. And that
release came.
John Radzivil returned from the obsequies of his
first-born, in that state of feeling which shuns alike
society and consolation. Solitude and moody silence
were his choice. Grief seemed, in his case, to lay
aside her features of tenderness, and to nerve and
harden the soul for some gloomy, unspoken purpose.
Ulrica perceived that his mind was brooding over
plans of vengeance, and exerted all her influence to
soothe and disinthrall it. She suffered not her own
sorrow to sadden her deportment, that her devotion
to his comfort might be the more exclusive. She
gradually incorporated the softened tones of her voice,
like the sigh of the sweet south, with his
meditations
,
hoping to infuse a healing principle into the
current of his diseased, tumultuous thought. She
pointed out the sources of happiness that still
remained
to them, and endeavored to excite the healthful
emotions of gratitude to an Almighty Friend. She
spoke fervently of the peace and independence of
their country, and pressed him, by the love he bore
to her and their surviving children, to withhold
himself
from any future scene of dissension, and yield
his sorrows to the solace of domestic retirement and
felicity. She dwelt eloquently on the tendencies of
war to extinguish the finer sensibilities, to destroy the
capacities of rational happiness, to stimulate evil
passions
,
to uproot the precepts and spirit of the Gospel;
but she shuddered to hear him repeat, with
unwonted
sternness, his determined vow of revenge.
You say that Poland is relieved from despotism;
that patriotism no longer requires of me a warrior's
service. You say, `our son is dead: can we bring
him back again?' Your reasoning is from the
weakness
of woman's nature; as if there were no stronger
impulse in the breast of man than love of country
or hope of selfish gain. Is it possible that you can
stand upon the tomb of that beautiful, martyred being,
and hear no deeper language than the perpetual
whisper of peace, peace! Till his murder is fully
avenged in the best blood of Russia, speak no more
to me of repose. I have sworn that my sword shall
never be sheathed while Constantine cumbers the
earth.
Ulrica could no longer conceal from herself that
the desire of revenge was consuming the energies of
his existence with the eagerness of its smothered
flame; and there was soon room to spend itself in
the way of blood that it chose. The Emperor of
Russia
,
indignant at the revolt of Poland and the
expulsion
of his brother, sent thither an army of two
hundred
thousand soldiers to enforce subjection.
Scarcely
had two months transpired since the lightning
gleam of revolution ere this reverse came. Every
resource was opened, every nerve in tension, to resist
domination. Peasants left the labors of husbandry,
and, if too poor to purchase weapons, armed
themselves
with the implements of agriculture.
Inverting
U
the language of inspiration, they turned their
ploughshares into swords, and their pruning-hooks
into spears. Boys fled from the schools, and, forming
themselves into platoons and phalanxes, demanded
enrollment among the soldiery. Women, forgetting
their household occupations, and the privileges of
their sex, pressed to share personally in the perils of
war. It was on the 25th of January, 1831, that the
Polish troops began to leave Warsaw, to encounter
the immense force with which Russia was inundating
their land. Delicate and beautiful females attended
them on their route to Praga, inspiriting them by their
eloquence and enthusiasm. Then there were tender
partings, and high, patriotic hopes, and agonizing
aspirations
of piety, that submit not to the revealment
of words. Ulrica saw that it was her destiny to
follow
the fortunes of a warrior; and, as a soul in
alliance
with heaven may compass things accounted
impossible on earth, she determined to do it in the
spirit of peace. She left her delightful abode, and,
with her children and a single servant, went forth to
adapt her movements to the marches of the army,
that she might be a comforter to her husband in his
toilsome and terrible carrer. But with what discord
did the din of battle grate upon her ear, who
considered
even the accent of unkindness a dereliction of
the Christian's creed. During the time of contest,
she retired with her little daughter to the most remote
recess, and, clasping her infant in her arms, besought
Divine protection for the endangered husband and
father. When the tumult of conflict subsided, and
she was convinced that no injury had befallen him,
her care awoke for the wounded and dying.
Forgetful
of the rank and affluence in which she had been
educated, and grateful if she might but mitigate one
pang, she moved like a ministering spirit among
every
form and modification of misery.
Spring advanced in her path of beauty; but she
could not win man from war, or soften him to love
his brother. The pure breath of Spring is not in
unison
with the heart that cherishes evil passions. The
innocent gladness of renovated nature is a reproof to
it, and her hymn of sunbeams a mockery.
Radzivil found it impracticable to insure the
comfortable
accommodation of his family during the
changes and chances of warfare. Sometimes their
lodging was in a frail tent, at others in some
dilapidated
building, always liable to be broken up and
transferred in a moment. After the commencement
of summer, they were for a considerable period
tenants
of a ruined fortress, open to the winds of heaven.
One evening he was seated with them there, after
a day of exposure and hardship. Leaning his head
on his hand, he contemplated with intense and
melancholy
interest a group so dear to him. Ulrica, in
a costume as humble as her station required,
tenderly
conversed with her daughter, clinging closely to
her side, while the infant lay in a slumber so
profound
that every golden curl and relaxed muscle
seemed spell-bound.
The lofty chieftain gazed long upon his wife. He
recalled her toils, her privations, her perils, the strong
contrast between the present and the past; he
wondered
at her gentleness, her moral courage, the
fullness
of her compassion for others. He saw even the
beauty of her countenance scarcely changed, and
fancied
that her love-beaming smile, and her clear, blue,
transparent eye imaged forth the repose of heaven.
He remembered the inward tempests that had
furrowed
his own brow, the fires that had seared his
soul and dried up its fountains, making him old
before
his time.
We dwell together, thought he, like the angel of
peace, and the demon of war. The comparison is
against me.
Then there passed over his mind such a saddening
consciousness of the evils of strife, the unsatisfying
nature of military glory, the fearful cost of victory,
and the tendency of a vindictive spirit to recoil upon
itself, that, for the first time, the wish that he had
never been a man of blood rushed to his lips.
Suddenly, as at an earthquake, the disjointed stones
of their habitation trembled and fell in masses.
Poland's
cry To arms! rose above the tumult.
The Russian artillery! exclaimed the warrior,
as he rushed to rally his soldiers. These were to be
his last words in the sanctuary where his heart had
found refuge.
The conflict was protracted and dreadful. I wish
not to describe it. The thunder of the captains,
and the shouting, are not my province. Is not death
sufficiently terrible when sanctioned by nature, and
softened by religion? but when urged on by
misguided
man, and bade to do his work in violence and
wrath, the sickening heart may be permitted to turn
away.
At length the trampling and uproar of battle ceased.
But over the field of carnage was the unceasing groan
of mangled menthat horrible cadence of war. The
uprooted grass, and the surface of the earth trodden
into dust, were indented with curdling pools of blood.
The combatants slowly drew off in broken
battalions
,
and eager and mournful forms were
searching
amid heaps of slain, each for his own dead.
Ulrica was already there, grasping a lifeless hand
between her own. Bathing with floods of tears the
immovable countenance of that friend whom she had
loved more than life, she felt the force of that grief
to which the shepherd-king gave voice in the
exclamation
,
Would to God I had died for thee!
Bearing to their desolated mansion the remains of
her husband, he was laid in the tomb of his
ancestors
with such brief honors as his country, in her hour
of trial, was able to pay a chief who had periled all
for her. Scarcely had Ulrica bowed herself to the
first sorrows of widowhood, ere she was summoned
to lay her beautiful babe by its father's side. One of
those unannounced diseases incidental to infancy,
which, like swift-winged and noxious birds, are ever
hovering about the unopened buds of being, swept
U 2
over it, and it was gone. In the morning it
flourished
,
and came forth as a flower; in the evening it was
cut down and withered.
Let none account the mourning for a lost infant
light, or soon forgotten. Sorrow for the departed is
not always graduated by the value that the
community
may have affixed to their lives. The heart has
other gold than that which men weigh in a balance.
He who marks in the cemetery a mound of a span's
length, and, carelessly passing on, says, It was but a
babe! hath never been a parent.
The fortunes of Poland grew darker every day.
Contest after contest was lost. The battle of Praga
struck her down from her throne among the nations.
Despotism returned with a twofold purpose, to do
the deeds which her own nature prompted, and to
punish rebellion. She was not slack in either task.
Confiscation, imprisonment, banishment, death, were
the instruments by which she wrought.
Among the list of exiles to the wilds of Siberia
were the Radzivil family. Sole representatives of
one of its branches, Ulrica and her young daughter
joined that melancholy train. Yet the bereaved and
afflicted woman went not forth despairing. She
girded
herself to bear her appointed lot. Life seemed
to her as a short journey to the land of peace. Ever
keeping this in view, she had a cheering word for
those whose hearts sank as a stone beneath the dark
waters.
There is sometimes found in woman an
uncomplaining
fortitude, which shrinks not when the pride
of man, her stronger companion, gives way; a power
of endurance bestowed by her Creator, to supply the
deficiency of mightier energies. But here there was
something morethe panoply with which Heaven
condescends to invest the heart, which, sacrificing
its selfishness and resigning its own will, henceforth
becomes a partner in the strength of omnipotence.
It obtains no exemption from trial or misfortune, no
passport to command away a single thorn that
obstructs
its pilgrimage. Its power is in the talisman,
engraven on its inmost tablet,
Thy will be done
.
The fatigues and sufferings of banishment fell
most heavily on the young and tender. Ere they
entered the gloomy pine-forests of Russia, the
sorrowing
exiles found their number fearfully
diminished
:
The cold snows wove their winding sheet,
And many a turf beneath their feet
Was made an infant's sepulchre.
Little Ulrica faltered, and indicated in every feature
that her path led to a returnless bourne. Her
mother
saw the destination, and strove to prepare her for
it. She spoke to her of that clime where blossoms
never fade, where there is no war, no severing of
hearts that love, of the compassion of Jesus the
Mediator, and of God the judge of all, who hath
mercy on the penitent and the trustful. She told her
of the unresting harps of angels, who wait, and stretch
forth their wings, and call the parting soul to join
their company. She rested not night or day, and her
pious labor was requited. The young summoned
spirit, went forth meekly and willingly from its house
of clay.
For the lonely mourner there was henceforth no
joy on earth, save the echo of the seraphic hymn,
which from the pure realm of peace visited her
nightly.
To the children of her people who had no
mothers
,
she drew near, and wiped their tears, and
gathered
them into her bosom, and taught them of Jesus.
To the hoary-headed she bowed herself down as a
daughter, and comforted them till they gazed upon
her as an angel of light. To the broken-hearted she
spoke sisterly words, urging them to walk
steadfastly
toward that country where is no bereavement;
and, in listening to her sweet tones, they lost for a
season the bitter memories of exile.
Thus she moved in that ministry of benevolence
and resignation which he who perfectly attains hath
accomplished the discipline of probation, and is ready
for a higher grade of being, and for the recompense
of reward.
The humble and pure spirit which she hid within
would have inspired contentment even amid that
realm of frost, where vegetation, except in its hardier
forms, is extinct, and the solid earth cleaves asunder.
It would have devised deeds of kindness for the
miserable
boor, whose superiority to the wild beasts that
surrounded him was chiefly evinced in the skill with
which he entrapped them, or divested them of their
skins, for the better clothing of himself and his little
barbarians.
But the wrath of a Siberian winter swept not over
the widowed consort of John Radzivil. Ere it bound
the earth in its terrible fetters, she had fled to a clime
without tempest or cloud.
Such was the annihilation of a family, once noble,
honored, and happy. Yet is its record of suffering
scarcely a drop in the dark tide that saturated the soil
of Poland. The dauntless self-devotion of her sons
availed nothing against the despotism that
overwhelmed
her. Those whom she nurtured in her high
places
now languish in prisons and in mines: they
perish in the stern, frozen heart of Siberia, or are
homeless wanderers in far, foreign lands. And as
among the family of nations, there has long been
admiration
of her high, chivalrous character, so there
should be sympathy for her fall, and in the sorrows
of her children.
THE ALMS-HOUSE.
Oh! fairest almoners of Heaven's sweet grace,
Shun not the haunts of hapless poverty.
The
Retreat, which public charity had appropriated
to the homeless poor in one of the thriving villages
of New England, had a rural aspect, and occupied a
sheltered situation. The building was of one story,
yet comprised sufficient space for the
accommodation
of its not numerous tenants. It was under the
charge of a farmer and his wife, who owned a few
acres of land contiguous to it, and were induced to
assume the care of these unfortunates as a mode of
income, which, though not peculiarly desirable, was,
as they sagely observed, better than no income at
all.
Mrs. Tuttle was a stirring, but kind-hearted
matron
.
She went on the principle that industry being
a cardinal virtue, it was her duty to give work to all
within the premises who were capable of
employment
.
She evinced great tact in proportioning tasks
to capacities, and in discovering latent ability for
exertion
,
however rusted by indolence, or buried
under
imaginary disease. Those who were lame, and
could not stand at the great wheel, she was sure
might contrive to spin a little flax. Hands which
were too rheumatic to manage the wool-cards could
turn the quill-wheel, and wind spools for the loom,
where she herself busily wrought out various useful
fabrics. Old Mrs. Jones, who was fond of being
complimented with having seen better days, was
willing to do the lady-like work of the needle; and
Polly Larkin, an eratic genius, who had at times
been deranged, liked to be considered as having
power in the culinary sphere. Mrs. Lester, whose
system was universally enfeebled by chronic
diseases
,
gathered around her the few children of the little
community, who were there maintained until old
enough to go to service, and taught them the
rudiments
of necessary knowledge, and the simple
precepts
of the religion that she loved. When any were
sick, she was at their bedside with her nursing
offices
,
or repeating hymns of comfort. She is our
missionary, said they; and her smile of meekness
and love confirmed their designation.
Mingled with these, were some less impressible
natures. But the matron, who took care always to
deserve their respect, little heeded their ill humor.
Sometimes she was rewarded by gratitude, though
it is seldom to be expected in such a situation from
those whose reverses are aggravated by age,
suffering
,
and the imagined contempt of the world. With
true benevolence, she endeavored to interweave their
wayward and broken natures with the household
charities, and make them feel the comfort and
interest
of the family as their own; and since misfortune,
and not crime, had made most of them her inmates,
the task was not difficult. But regular industry, and
16 X
the spirit of piety, were the remedies on which she
mainly depended. Under the influence of the first
even decaying health sometimes revived, and her
consistent example of the latter won confidence from
those who did not aspire to imitation. In her
intercourse
with them, she strove to keep ever in mind
the sweet precept, God is love; and when seated
with them around the simple board, or collected for
stated devotion, she remembered that every soul was
precious in His sight.
The same principles regulated the conduct of her
husband; but there was about him more distance
and reserve of manner, easily roused to sternness
when evil conduct required the exercise of authority.
Thus the sway of his partner, which might otherwise
have been too mild, or liable to be abused by
refractory
natures, was happily and judiciously fortified.
Among the inmates of his dwelling were only two
of his own sex; one disabled by age, and the other
by casualty, from earning a subsistence by labor, yet
capable of occasionally aiding him in his vegetable
garden, or other light employments for the general
good. On the whole, this small community was like
a bee-hive; and industry has seldom evinced its
power
more fully than by thus neutralizing the bitter
draught of poverty and scorn.
But the good farmer became suddenly the victim
of a violent fever. Long he lay on the verge of the
grave. He was indeed saved, but partial paralysis
ensued, and it was evident that life must be
languished
out in decrepitude. It was therefore deemed
expedient for him and his wife to accept the
invitation
of a married daughter, who resided in a
neighboring
town, to pass the remainder of their days
under
her filial supervision. The poor people regretted
this change, and looked forward with apprehension;
for the overseer of the parish, finding that the house
they occupied needed many repairs, decided that it
would be cheapest to place them at board wherever
the best bargain could be obtained.
On the very day of the departure of good Mr. and
Mrs. Tuttle, a singular scene was exhibited in the
largest apartment of their mansion; an auction,
where not the highest, but the lowest bidder had
precedence.
Ranged on one side were the officers of the
parish
;
on the other, farmers, imbrowned by exposure,
whose features seemed to sharpen with desire of
gain. In the background were perceived flitting
sections of haggard faces, thrust through a half-open
door, or eyes wandering here and there, dilated with
a painful curiosity. The business proceeded. The
chief speaker addressed one of the applicants.
For what price will you engage to take these
paupers per week?
Seventy cents a head.
Too much; too much, sir, altogether. We must
economize in these hard times. Mr. Jotham Tuttle
and his wife were good people. The only trouble
was, they were too good. They allowed the poor to
cost the town, in and out, rising of fifty-nine cents
and a quarter, for every head of them. Now this
will never do. It is only offering encouragement
for idlers to come and throw themselves on us to
be maintained. Mr. Jed Tarbox, what will you take
the whole lot on 'em for?
Thirty cents for them that's able to help a little
around, and seventy cents for them that don't do
nothing
but eat.
Lump them all together, Mr. Tarbox, lump them
all together; we can't spend time to go into such
fractional niceties.
I suspect there is a cripple or two among them,
and three or four others not much better. Them,
too, that they call working folks, don't do but a
precious little matter of labor. Supposing I take
them on trial a month or two, and allow the town
accordingly?
No, sir, no; we can't make no such conditions.
The town must understand what it binds itself to pay.
Will you take them for fifty cents in and out? you'll
make a good bargain.
Winter is a coming on, said Mr. Tarbox, and
bids fair to be a pretty tight one. Meat and grain
don't grow on every bush. It costs a sight of money
to maintain even my own small family.
You will get along with the whole of them
cheaper
than any other man; your wife is a smart creature
for business. As the negotiation seemed drawing
toward a close, the faces of the sorrowing poor were
turned in extreme anxiety to the speakers. Pale,
furrowed brows were seen in the dim distance
peering
one above the other, anon flitting, receding, and
returning in scowling, breathless alarm. At length,
after much close and sharp higgling, the bargain was
concluded at fifty-one cents and three quarters per
week.
Murmuring could no longer be suppressed. Miss
Polly Larkin, a meager and fearless spinster,
coming
forward, accosted the town officers in a shrill
tone.
Will you please to have it put into the bargain
that Mr. Tarbox shall hire a doctor for us by the year,
as old Mr. Tuttle always did?
Oh! here, that ought to have been thought of.
Here, Mr. Tarbox, will you set it down in the
contract
that a doctor shall be hired?
The purchaser of the poor, disconcerted, did not
readily answer. He twirled round the hat which he
held in his hand, and twice dropped his riding-whip
ere he spoke. The doctor that Mr. Jotham Tuttle
hired is a dreadful dear man. There is one nigh
to my house that I can get, and pay him visit by
visit, instead of letting it run on to the eend of the
year.
He's a steam doctor! screamed old Mrs. Jones;
we shall all be killed with emetics and pepper pills.
And far out in the distance was heard a hoarse echo
of Steam doctor! we shall all be killed!
I do hope, rejoined Mrs. Jones, we shall have
X 2
a minister when we come to die, and not be buried
in old chists, to save coffins.
Mr. Tarbox will undoubtedly see that all is
right, said the men in power, buttoning themselves
to the throat for their homeward ride.
Jed Tarbox is a skinflint, said Polly Larkin, in
a spasmodic whisper, and his wife is an old dragon.
The future landlord of the poor, consented to
receive
them immediately, and promised to send his
ox-team for such as were not able to walk three miles.
Our scene now changes to a pleasant dwelling in
the heart of the village.
Maria, said the sweet-voiced Ellen Mason to
her friend, with whom she was spending the evening,
when were you last at the alms-house?
I am ashamed to say only once since your
absence
on your visit. I missed your sweet company
on the long walk so sadly that I had no heart to go
again without you; besides, my school has been so
large as to allow me less leisure than formerly.
Can you go next Saturday afternoon?
Oh, yes; I have been wishing for some time to
carry a cap I have made for old Mrs. Lester, and
then will have ready sundry other little comforts for
our pensioners.
With their work - baskets containing such
articles
as are ever acceptable to the poor, were it only
as a proof that they are remembered by the more
fortunate
,
the young friends commenced their walk.
The keen air of closing autumn rendered brisk
exercise
pleasant, and they found, as they had often
done before, how distance is beguiled by friendship,
and friendship heightened by benevolence. The
brilliance of the forest had passed away: the maple
gleaned not forth in crimson, as if its wounded heart
was gushing in life-blood through every leaf.
Orange
and umbered brown no longer clothed the lofty
chestnut or the drooping elm. The gnarled oaks
stretched their scorbutic arms; the frozen earth
returned
a grating echo to the traveler's wheel; and
Nature, expecting the tyranny of Winter, bowed
down to receive his fetters.
But in the heart of the young friends there was no
winter, and their cheeks brightened with new bloom
as they reached the house where they had so often
dispensed happiness. What was their surprise to
find it tenantless! like the struck tent of the Arab,
all around was desolation.
A casual passer-by informed them where those
whom they sought might be found; but the distance
was too formidable for a pedestrian excursion, and
they were compelled to defer their visit. When it
was next in their power to go, every trace of
vegetation
had faded from the landscape, and hill and
valley were heavily robed in snow. The sleigh in
which they rode, furnished a convenient mode of
transporting a greater variety of articles for their
needy friends.
Their driver stopped opposite a tall, narrow,
cold-looking
house, with a thin volume of blue smoke
straggling out of a single chimney. The cheerful
peal of the sleigh-bells attracted attention, and Mrs.
Tarbox, a stout woman, was seen to fly about in
various
directions ere she met the young ladies at the
door.
I suppose you want to see old Mrs. Jones, said
she. She is a great deal worse to-day. Indeed,
she is e'en a just gone, and it will do no good to see
her at all.
Not heeding this unwelcome reception, they
entered
,
remarking that they desired to see all the poor
people, and were not aware of the illness of good
Mrs. Jones. Considerable confusion was evident;
and among those who were running hither and
thither
appeared a boy, with a basket of small sticks and
shavings, hurried by Mrs. Tarbox, to make a fire
immediately
in the sick-chamber. Following him, they
entered a room where most of the poor people had
clustered round a bed.
The poor creature has been a-dying the biggest
part of three days, said Mrs. Tarbox. She can't
swallow at all.
I could swallow well enough, murmured the
weak, pettish voice of the sufferer, if I had any thing
fit to swallow.
This was tried and proved. She evinced joy at the
sight of her young friends; but it was a fluttering
and faint sensation, as if a stranger to her benumbed
breast. They inquired if she had seen a physician,
to which the lady of the house replied, Her husband
had been after one, time and again, and he was now
expected every minute.
What is that? exclaimed the aged woman, as
the unwonted blaze, which the boy had suddenly
kindled, went roaring up the chimney. What is
that? fire! fixing her startled eyes, and spreading
out her emaciated hands, with an unearthly scream
of delight. Still opening and shutting her fingers
with a convulsive movement, she uttered, in a hollow
tone, Stand away, Tom Tarbox; let me see the
fire!
Alas! it was a deeper eclipse than any
intervention
of flesh and blood; for while one moment she
exulted
in the unwonted warmth, the next she moaned,
stretched out her feet, and was no more.
The following day, in that cheerless habitation,
were the humble funeral obsequies. The principal
room was hastily put in order, and she who, in her
life, was scarcely allowed to tread on its carpeted
floor, now stretched herself there in the fearless
majesty of death. The cap which Maria's needle
had so neatly finished, with the hope that it would
gain a smile from her humble friend, was plaited
around that stiffened brow, which had taken its last
change from the adversities of earth.
Mrs. Tarbox had directed the poor people to be
dressed in their best clothes, and even spoke kindly
to them, for she knew that the two young ladies were
to be there, and bring their own minister from the
village to perform the last services for the dead.
When he spoke with the meekness of his Master to
those unfortunate ones, they gathered near him,
treasuring up every word; and while from his
prayer
the balm of the Gospel distilled, and they were
reminded of those mansions of rest with the dear
Redeemer, when repentance had done its work, and
life's discipline was over, and when they saw a tear
on the bright cheeks of their benefactresses, they
wept audibly and long.
On returning from the church-yard, the good
clergyman
addressed to each of the inmates some kind
inquiry or religious counsel. Cheered by his
attentions
,
they listened earnestly, and were surprised to
see the fierce eye of their hostess quail and cower
before his gentle regard.
She was informed by Ellen Mason that two of the
poor children were to be taken to the village in her
sleigh, as she had obtained eligible places for them to
reside, where their young services would be useful.
Inquiry was made for the hat of the little boy. He
never had one worth speaking of, said Mrs. Tarbox.
Yes, but I had, answered the child, gathering
courage at the prospect of escape. I had one, till
your boy, Tom Tarbox, struck me with it and threw
it into the fire. The little girl, who was about to
depart, put her arms affectionately round old Mrs.
Lester, who had tried to instruct her, and said in a
whisper, as she took leave,
I am sorry I ever called you Goody Minister.
And I, said the boy, should not have called
you Old Granny Bible-story, only Tom Tarbox told
me to.
My dear children, was her reply, I shall
always
love you. Remember to say your prayers, and
read your Bible, and to obey those who have the rule
over you. How much I shall miss you! Half of
my little school will now be gone. God be with you,
and bless you.
Her voice grew tremulous at parting; and the
little
ones, though elated with the prospect of a change
of abode, wept at parting with the only being who
had ever labored for their improvement. Her
kindness
to these not very promising pupils interested
the two young ladies, who, being themselves engaged
in the work of education, knew how true and sweet
is the affection which springs up between a teacher
and those committed to her charge.
The meek image of that pious, uncomplaining
woman dwelt with them, and they were grieved to
see how pale and thin she had grown since her change
of habitation. On investigating her history, they
discovered
that her origin and education were
respectable
,
and that her constitution had been broken by
devotion to two sickly children, who died young, and
to the long helplessness of an intemperate husband,
who had left her in deep poverty. All that they heard
of her blameless life, of her spirit, resigned, and even
thankful under privation, served to heighten their
sympathy, and their desire to obtain for her a more
fitting refuge. After consulting their older friends,
they devised a plan for her removal. Having become
jointly interested in a school for young ladies, they
felt that the income from their employment would
authorize them in assuming this work of benevolence.
They therefore decided to place her as a boarder
with a widow lady and her daughter, who occupied
a small, neat cottage in the neighborhood.
The gratitude of poor Mrs. Lester at this
unexpected
change was unbounded; yet she could by no
means consent to be idle. Kind treatment and
unwonted
comfort had a favorable effect on her health,
and she begged to be permitted to take charge of a
few pupils, to assist in defraying the expense of her
situation. She was found entirely competent to
impart
the rudiments of knowledge, and also to impress
those habits of industry, good order, and kind
affection
which enrich the unfolding elements of
character
with a better wealth than the proud precocity of
intellect.
One fine afternoon in spring, Ellen and Maria called
at the cottage. It was a sweet, though humble abode.
A few beds of thyme and other aromatic herbs were
near the door, and among them the nestling bees
wrought, busy and musical. Near the window grew
an aged tree, clasped by a vine, whose peeping
flowerets
gave out a fresh odor. It seemed an emblem
of the ancient teacher, surrounded by her happy
pupils
.
Their young, bright eyes were reverently fixed
on her, as, seated in her arm-chair, with a large Bible
before her, she read to them a few sentences,
preparatory
to their parting for the day. Her knitting-bag
hung beside her, their work-baskets and books were
laid neatly in their respective places, every little
being
was quiet and attentive, for scrupulous order and
discipline were features of her system; and whoever
acquires these in childhood hath a goodly heritage
for riper days. Her simple garb was thoroughly neat
and appropriate, and her intonation tender, as she
uttered the inspired words, Little children, love one
another. At the sight of her young benefactresses
the light of grateful joy beamed from her placid
features
,
as she exclaimed, What am I, or what was
my father's house, that thou hast brought me
hitherto
?
Every interview heightened their good opinion of
this venerable woman, and their satisfaction at
having
been able to rescue her from neglect, and render
her declining days comfortable. Such deeds of
benevolence
give a charm to youth beyond the
fascinations
of beauty; and a heartfelt delight, that vanity,
amid its proudest triumphs, never attains.
The sufferings of the homeless poor are but little
understood by those whose hearth-stones are always
bright with domestic comfort. Especially the custom
which has prevailed in some of our villages, of placing
them where they can be maintained at the least
expense
,
or farming them out to the lowest bidder, adds
unmingled bitterness to their cup of misery.
Self-interest
,
too often leagued with inhumanity, deprives
them of those comforts which infirmity and age
require
;
while the feeling of being always unwelcome,
and the open consciousness that their scanty support
is deemed a burden, help to dry up the springs of
existence. Too much scope is thus allowed to
tyranny
and cold calculation; and to the sick, the no
very delicate measuring how long they have to live,
adds to the force of depression and disease.
Even in our best-conducted alms-houses, there must
be many privations and trials to those whose earlier
days were marked by better fortunes, and more
cheering
hopes. Among the keenest, is the absence of
human sympathy. The gentler sex, with whom is the
wealth of sympathy, and the most frequent
opportunities
to exercise it, should not be forgetful of these
forgotten ones. A visit, and a few kind words, are
cordials of power, spots of greenness amid the dark
mountains, where their feet stumble onward to the
grave. Let the young and fortunate, amid their walks
of benevolence, not overlook the inmates of our
alms-houses
,
remembering that the consolation which they
there impart, is in conformity to His blessed
example
who despised not the lowest, when He came to
save the lost.
1
THE PLOUGH AND THE SWORD.
Though blinded warriors seek renown in arms,
Pant after fame, and rush to war's alarms,
Mine be the pleasures of a rural life,
From noise remote, and ignorant of strife.
Livingston
.
17
In
one of the quiet villages that beautify the
valley
of the Connecticut, sleeping like nests among the
green drapery, was a pleasant and somewhat antique
farm-house. It stood retired from the public road,
overshadowed by a lofty elm, with broad, drooping
branches. A silver brooklet came bubbling from the
hillock in its background; then flowing into a nook
amid the roots of some old trees, and growing
deeper
and more subdued, was content to refresh the
steed of the passing traveler, or the herds who drank
and ruminated in its waters, as though it were to
them a Helicon.
The smaller tenements and appendages of the
farm-house evinced neatness and good husbandry.
A dense hop-vine clustered over its long piazza, and
a row of bee-hives sent forth their busy people among
the thyme and balm-beds. The sound of the
matron's
wheel, mingling with her song, was heard from
the open casement in summer, while the rich
products
of the churn and cheese-press attested her skill
in the dairy.
In the labors of the farmer, his two young sons
were constant and active participants. They
assisted
to draw the furrow in early spring, and to
scatter
the seeds from whence their bread was to grow.
In summer they followed the scythe with their
lighter
implements, preparing the fragrant food for their
domestic animals. In autumn they aided to gather
into the garner the varied bounty that God, through
their mother-earth, sent, as a reward for faithful toil.
In winter they sought with equal diligence, at the
district school, those mental stores which were to
enrich the whole of life.
One cold evening, they were seated with their
books beside a bright fire fed by the trees of their own
forest, while their lamp cast a cheerful ray over the
snow-covered landscape. The younger, a boy of
thirteen, threw aside his lessons, and said,
I intend to be a soldier. I have read of
Alexander
the Great, and of Bonaparte. There is
nothing
in this world so glorious as the fame of the
warrior
.
His brother raised a thoughtful brow, and regarded
him with a steady glance for a few moments, ere he
replied,
To destroy life, and bring mourning into
families
,
and misery into the world, seems to me cruel,
instead of glorious.
Oh! but the rich dress, and the fine music, and
the glittering arms, think of them! And then, the
honor and the praise! To have hosts of soldiers
under your command, and all the people talking of
your courage, and distant nations applauding your
victories: how can you be blind to such greatness as
that?
Did not our minister say last Sunday from the
pulpit, that the `end of life was the test of its
greatness
?'
Now Alexander of Macedon, whom you call
the Great, fell in a fit of drunkenness, and Bonaparte
died on a desolate island, like a chained wild beast.
I am sorry to see you are so easily prejudiced.
Indeed, I must say that you have a very narrow
mind. I doubt whether you are capable of admiring
heroes. You had better, by all means, be a farmer.
Your highest ambition, I suppose, is to break a pair
of steers, or ride a dull cart-horse to market.
The voice of the father was heard from an
adjoining
apartment,
Boys, go to bed.
Thus ended, for that night, their conversation on
martial glory, the only subject on which they
strongly
disagreed.
A few lustrums swiftly and silently pass by. How
quiet is the lapse of time in an agricultural village.
Masses of men are not there to level the hillocks, or
rear the red brick where the forest waved, or toss
the slumbering waters into the caldron of the
steam-spirit
,
or give the green lanes to the tramp of its iron
horse. Seed-time and harvest alternate; the
beautiful
seasons complete their annual round. The child
comes forth from the arms of his mother and guides
the plough; a little more silver is sprinkled on the
heads that have passed their prime; the old man
leans more heavily upon his staff; a few more green
mounds are visible in the church-yard.
The features of the rural scenery which we have
already described, were but slightly changed. The
elm had thrown its groined branches somewhat
higher
,
and marked out a broader circumference of shade.
The brook still told an unfinished tale to listening
summer, and in winter incrusted with frost-work
and diamonds its root-wreathed basin. On the roof
of the farm-house more moss had gathered, and its
rough fence of brown bars, was replaced by a white
paling.
Within, was the same cheerful fire that blazed
when we last visited it. By its hearth-stone stood
the same arm-chairs, but its former occupants had
become tenants of that lowly bed which no rising
sun awakens. In their place sat the eldest son, and
by his side a woman of mature age and pleasing
countenance, on whose knee was a fair infant. On
a pallet, in a shaded nook of the apartment, two
little
ones quietly breathed in the sleep of innocence,
and at a small table two boys with thoughtful brows
pondered their lessons. A wintry storm was raging,
and as the blast shook the casements, the farmer
said to his wife,
In such cold, bad nights, I can not help thinking
of my poor brother. But so many years have passed
since we heard aught of him, and his way of life was
so full of danger, that it is most probable he no longer
needs our sympathy.
Husband, just as you began to speak I thought
I heard some one knock; or was it the winds
striking
the old elm-tree?
On opening the door, a motionless form was found
extended near the threshold. A staff was still feebly
grasped in his hand, and a crutch, that supplied the
place of a lost limb, had fallen at his side. With
difficulty he was borne in, and pillowed in a large
chair near the fire. After the application of
restoratives
,
he opened his eyes, and seemed to gaze on
every surrounding objectclock, and oaken table,
and large, old Bibleas on some recollected friend.
Then there was a faint sound of Brother!
That tone touched the tender memories of
earliest
years. Their welcome to the poor wanderer
with the broken frame, and tattered garment was
heart-felt. Yet their tears freshly flowed at his
pathetic
tones,
See, I have come home to die!
They hastened to spread the refreshing repast,
and to press him to partake. Afterward they
induced
him to retire to rest, without taxing his
exhausted
strength by conversation. The next
morning
he was unable to rise. They sat by his couch,
solacing his worn spirit with kindness, and with
narratives
of the changes that had befallen them and
other friends in the peaceful spot of his birth. At
intervals he mingled his own sad recital.
I have had many troubles. But that which hath
most bowed me down inwardly was my disobedience
in leaving home, against the wishes, and without the
knowledge of my parents, to be a soldier. I have felt
the pain of wounds, but the sting of conscience is
keener. Hunger and thirst have I known, and the
prisons of a foreign land. When I lay sick and
neglected
,
it would sometimes seem, in the fever-dream,
that my mother bent kindly over me, as she would if
I had only the headache; or that my father came with
the great Bible in his hand, to read, as he used to do,
before our prayers morning and evening. Then I
cried out, in my agony, `I am no more worthy to be
called thy son.'
He paused, overcome with emotion, and his
brother
hastened to assure him of their perfect forgiveness,
and of the fervor with which he was brought ever
before their family altar as the son erring, yet
beloved
.
Ah, those prayers! They followed me like
angel
wings. But for them, I might have been a
reprobate
both to God and man.
By little and little, as his feebleness admitted, he
told the story of his wanderings. He had been in
warfare both by sea and land. He had heard the
deep ocean resound to battle thunders, and seen
earth saturated with the red shower from the bosom
of her sons. He had served in the armies of Europe,
and pursued the hunted Indian in his own native
clime. He had plunged recklessly amid the thickest
dangers, seeking every where the glory that dazzled
his boyhood, but in vain. He found the soldier's lot
was hardship, privation, and death, that others might
reap the fame. He saw what wounds and
mutilations
,
what anguish, mourning, and death were
implicated
in a single victory. He felt how far the
renown of the greatest conqueror falls short of the
good that he forfeits; how it fades away before the
misery that he inflicts.
For a few moments, he said, on the verge of
battle, I felt a shuddering, inexpressible horror at
the thought of destroying my fellow-creatures; but
in the heat of conflict all human sympathies
vanished
.
Desperate madness took possession of me,
and I cared neither for this world nor the next. I
have been left helpless on the field beneath
trampling
horses, my open gashes stiffening in the chill
night air, while no man cared for my soul. Yet why
should I pain you by such descriptions? You have
ever dwelt within the sweet influences of mercy, and
shrank to distress even a soulless animal! You can
not realize the hardness of heart that comes with such
a life as I have led. The soldier is enforced to be
familiar with suffering and violence. His moral and
religious sensibilities are in continual peril.
Profanity
and contempt of sacred things mingle with
the elements of his trade. The softening, hallowing
privileges of the Sabbath are not for him. The
precepts
of the Gospel that were instilled into his
childhood
are in danger of being swept away. Still my
heart ceased not to reproach me in seasons of
reflection
,
though I would fain have silenced and made it
callous. Oh! that it might be purified by penitence,
ere I am called to answer for deeds of blood, and for
a lost life.
His sympathizing brother and sister still cherished
the hope, that by medical skill and careful nursing,
his health might be restored. They placed much
reliance on the bland influences of his native air, and
on the salutary trains of feeling which the kindness
of early friends awakened.
Yet his constant assertion was, My vital
energies
are wasted. They can be rekindled no more.
Death standeth at my right hand. When I came to
the borders of this valley, my poor, swollen limb
tottered
,
and my whole frame began to fail. Then I
besought Him whom I had so often forgotten, `Oh!
give me heart and hope, and hold me up but a little
while, that I may die in the house where I was born,
and be buried at the feet of my father and my
mother
.'
The suffering and humbled man sought earnestly
for the hope of salvation. Feeling that a great
change was necessary ere he could be fitted for a
realm of purity and peace, he studied the Scriptures
with prayer, and listened to the counsels of pious
men.
Brother, dear brother, you have followed the
example
of our parents. In the peaceful pursuits of
agriculture, your life has flowed on like an unruffled
stream. I chose to toss among whirlpools, and made
shipwreck of all. You have kept the law of love
Z
even with inferior creatures. You have shorn the
fleece, but not wantonly destroyed the lamb. You
have taken the honey, and spared the laboring bee;
but I have destroyed both the hive and the honey,
the fleece and the flock, man and his habitation. I
have cruelly defaced the image of God, and
crushed
out that breath which I can never restore.
Bitter
is the warfare of my soul with the prince of the
power of the air, who ruleth the children of
disobedience
.
As the last hour approached, he laid his cold hands
on the head of his brother's two little sons, saying,
with solemn emphasis,
Choose the plough, and not the sword!
Tender gratitude lighted up the glazing eye as he
faintly uttered,
Sister, brother, you have been angels of mercy
to me. Peace be in your hearts, and upon your
household.
The venerable pastor, who had been the teacher
of his childhood, and the comforter of his sickness,
stood by his side as he went down into the dark
valley
of the shadow of death.
My son, look unto the Lamb of God.
Yes, father. He taketh away the sin of the
world.
The white-haired man lifted up a fervent
supplication
for the departing soul.
When he ceased, the eyes of the dying were
closed. There was no more heaving of the breast
or gasping. And they spoke of him as having gone
where no sin or sorrow can have place.
Yet again the eyelids trembled, and one long,
struggling sigh burst from the marble lips.
Bending
down, the mournful brother caught the last sounds
faint, yet tuneful, Land of peace! and Savior of
sinners!
THE REVERSE.
To be resigned when ills betide,
Patient when favors are denied,
And pleased with favors given
Most surely this is Wisdom's part:
This is that incense of the heart
Whose fragrance pleases Heaven.
Cotton
.
Z 2
Have
you heard the news, that Mr. Thomas
Talmage has failed? said Miss Cutts, entering a
neighbor's house with a shawl hastily thrown over
her head.
You don't say so!
Yes, yes. Every thing is gone. They are just
as poor as any body now.
I always said it would be so. Now he will be
for taking the benefit of the Bankrupt Act, and
living
just as grand as ever, and his poor creditors may
go whistle for their pay. No matter about them.
But they say he has sold his horse, and given up
all the goods in his great store, and boasts that he'll
pay every cent that he owes, and this afternoon he
is going to sell all his wife's furniture at auction.
Why, she must be real angry, I declare. Was
he necessitated to do it, do you suppose?
I can't exactly say as to that. Likely he'd be
glad of a little money to put in his pocket after his
debts are paid, and so he sells his wife's things to
get it.
That's it, I've no doubt. But come, let's go to
this auction. Money, to be sure, is pretty scarce
these hard times; but I guess I'll raise a little, for I
do so want to see the inside of that smart house.
Well, I'll call for you just at two o'clock. Be
sure to be ready, for there'll be a crowd, I expect.
I can't say but I should like to see how these
grandees
look, when they come down to be as poor as
other folks.
With these benevolent intentions, the two ladies
proceeded, at the first ringing of the small auction
bell, to the dwelling in question. Quite a throng
soon collected there; some desirous to inspect a
mansion to which they had never before been able
to gain admittance, others resolved to purchase,
provided
they could get articles far below their real
worth. In various recesses and corners of the
ample
house there was much gossiping.
Now, do tell if that
is
Miss Tom Tammage?
Why, her gingham gown is not a bit better than
mine, and her hair is just as plain as a pike-staff.
I railly supposed nothing but the silks and the
satins would answer her purpose. Well, she has
had her day. I always knew that top-knots must
come down.
I wonder how she'll relish trudging in the mud
like my darters. They are full as good as she, I
reckon, though they have not been brought up to
have a gay horse, and gig, and driver too, at their
beck.
In the mean time, the fair young creature, who
was the subject of this discussion, with her calm
brow, and more graceful in her plain, neat dress,
than in the costliest array, was ready to render her
aid, or reply to any interrogation that might
facilitate
the sale of their effects. Possibly she was not
prepared for all the rude remarks of selfish dealers,
or to see so minutely illustrated the graphic
description
of the King of Israel: It is naught, it is naught,
saith the buyer; but when he goeth his way, then he
boasteth.
I take it that bed is under the usual weight, Mr.
Auctioneer!
Fifty-two pounds.
And the bolster and pillows?
Nine and a half.
I guess they are nothing but old feathers put
into new ticks, said a waddling old lady, who was,
however, eager in bidding thirty-five cents a pound,
thirty-five and a quarter, thirty-five and a half, and
so on, until she conquered, at thirty-nine and three
quarters, her competitors, and at a convenient time
extolled the excellence of the article she had so
studiously
decried.
The state of them Brussels carpets is a shame,
said a busy personage, whose daughter,
contemplating
matrimony, was eyeing them with irrepressible
desire. Miss Tom Talmage never had a chick or
child to wear out any thing, and I'm sure they're
desp'ate defaced. Look! look! (bending double
and peering through her spectacles) is not that an
ile-spot? And them 'ere marble-topped tables are
considerable out o' fashion; hastening, however, to
purchase them, and superintending their removal
with an inward chuckle of delight.
A similar struggle went on among persons of
lighter purses, concerning the kitchen utensils.
You can't in conscience ask much for that lot of
worn-out tins, Mr. Auctioneer. They are scoured
up pretty bright for the occasion, but they are
e'en-a-just
ruined, for all that. The major part of them
arn't worth carrying home, I declare.
The shrewd housekeeper who secured them was
heard to say to her husband that evening, that she
had made a grand bargain, and got them at about a
quarter of their true value; and, while she extolled
her own sharpness, added, She'd be bound the
people
who sold them, would not get as many more good
things to eat, as had already been cooked in them.
The auction was nearly finished, and most of the
purchasers had withdrawn, when a coarse-featured
woman, with a patronizing air, said, in a half-whisper,
Miss Tammage, you ha'n't got a new gound or
two, have you, that you'd sell cheap?
Mr. Talmage colored, and drawing the hand of
his wife within his arm, would have led her away;
but with a sweet, confiding glance, and a few
whispered
words, she assured him, and he gazed at her
with a tender respect, as on a superior being. Her
clear, good sense convinced her, that her wardrobe
comprised some articles which, in the changed state
of their fortunes, would be both useless and
inappropriate
,
18
and with perfect good temper she produced
them. The lady minutely examined their fabric and
fashion, professed both to be in fault, and vastly
inferior
to what she expected, yet, after cheapening
them to the lowest point, possessed herself of them,
and exhibited them afterward to her friends who
called as some of the trappings which the proud
Miss Tom Tammage, the broken marchant's wife,
was glad enough to sell.
When night came, the house of Mr. Talmage was
stripped both of its ornaments and comforts. It was
empty, but not deserted, for in it were hearts
sustained
by the consciousness of rectitude, and firmly
resolved
in duty; hearts united in love, submissive to
the Divine will, and strong to strengthen each other.
The former master and mistress of this once elegant
mansion, sat together upon a coarse joint-stool, near
a few coals in the kitchen grate. A candle, placed
in the neck of a bottlefor every lamp and
candlestick
had been soldand a little ink in the bottom of
a broken tea-cup, aided them in the arithmetical
calculations
which they were busily making.
Husband, am I right? said a clear, animated
voice; am I right? My little account-book here
gives a result that we are able to pay all our debts.
Yes, dearest, all, every one in full; and this
auction
leaves us a little surplus.
God be thanked! What heartfelt happiness!
But, Mary, how different must our mode of life
be from what you have been accustomed to, and the
prospects that you had a right to encourage at the
time of our marriage. I could not bear to see that
costly and tasteful furniture, which I can never
replace
,
taken away from you. Those beautiful sofas,
on which you used to love to rest after a long walk,
cost me many a pang.
See if we will not be just as happy without them.
Indeed, if God pleases, we will be a great deal
happier
than ever we have been. A life of fashion is
not agreeable to either of us. To tell the truth, I
have long suffered anxiety, not that I thought we
were inclined to extravagance, but our situation
forced us to many useless expenses, and the
pressure
of the times on mercantile effort made me so
fear that some misfortune would come, and leave us
unable fully to pay our debts. Now no human
being
will suffer by us.
Yet we have but a mere pittance left.
Never mind; it is our own. Poverty is better
than unjust gain. I would not like to tread upon
nice carpets, and feel that those whom we owed were
reproaching us. How sweetly shall we rest to-night,
every claim discharged, and the injunction obeyed
to `owe no man any thing, except to love one
another
.'
I bless God for your fortitude, for your cheering
smiles. They put new life into me.
These expressions of commendation and love, so
dear to the heart of a wife, were interrupted by a faint
knock at the door. A poor boy was found standing
on the threshold, who had occasionally been
employed
in the lower services about the store or the house.
He was in tears, and with faltering words expressed
his desire to live with them. He said he had no
parents
,
no friends able to take care of him, and that
the voice of the kind lady, who had sometimes
spoken
to him when he brought a parcel, reminded him
of that of his dead mother.
We are poor ourselves now, my boy, said Mr.
Talmage. We can do nothing for you. We are to
move away in a few days.
Please to let me go with you;
please do!
The lady looked imploringly at her husband.
What, my Mary?
Let us take him, and trust that He who feedeth
the sparrows will not fail to provide for the orphan.
The husband assented, more because his wife
desired
it, than from any conviction of expediency.
Poor Richard thankfully received a portion of the
baker's loaf which had been left from their evening's
repast, and slept soundly on the temporary bed the
kind lady spread for him.
The next week the family became residents of a
distant, agricultural village. They rented a few
acres of land, and a small tenement, furnished only
with what was necessary for comfort. Yet the
perfect
neatness that reigned there was beautiful; and
when the occupations of the day were past, and by
the bright lamp, Mr. Talmage read aloud from some
one of the books which they retained as chosen
companions
,
his wife seated by his side with her needle
or knitting-work; the beaming smile, the animated
remark, the occasional song, involuntarily bursting
forth, showed how serene and sincere was their
enjoyment
.
A summer or two spent in the country
during his youth had given him a taste for rural
employment; and now freedom from the harassing
cares of business, with a life of simplicity and active
exercise, imparted a degree of health which he had
never before enjoyed. His wife also found her
elasticity
of spirits proportionally heightened, while the
charge of her household, her earnestness to learn the
policy, and promote the welfare of the poultry and
beeswhom she styled her own immediate subjects
and her interest in all that her husband undertook,
particularly in the pursuits of horticulture, occupied
her both usefully and pleasantly. Richard proved
himself an invaluable assistant, having considerable
knowledge of practical agriculture, acquired by
passing
his early childhood on a farm, while his gratitude
to his benefactors prompted the most untiring efforts.
The state of society, as is often the case in our
agricultural villages, was marked by intelligence,
morality, and a disposition for friendly intercourse.
The new-comers were greeted with kindness, and
ready to reciprocate it, and to take part in those
social
duties which give due exercise to the tender
Christian sympathies. Their moderated desires
embraced
,
at first, only the prospect of a living, free
from debt, with the satisfaction of being able to aid
A a
those who might need their charity. More than this
came, almost without their seeking. As from
principle
they wasted nothing, their small gains annually
accumulated, until they became owners of the spot
where they were originally tenants, and which had
constantly been improving under their occupancy.
Thus years fled away, until faithful Richard,
desiring
,
with their entire approbation, to marry a
deserving
young woman, it was decided to intrust to their
tenantry the place hitherto occupied, and erect a new
habitation on some land recently purchased.
Soon a tasteful cottage reared its white front on a
neighboring knoll, with a lofty walnut-grove for a
background. An acacia-hedge, intermingled at
regular
intervals with the graceful sumach, bordered its
sloping lawn; and the fruit-trees, which had been
prospectively planted, were in full prosperity.
Flowering
shrubs and vines imbowered the lovely
mansion
,
clustering roses adorned the winding
gravelwalk
,
and a noble, drooping elm, in patriarchal
majesty
,
spread its broad arms over the rustic gate. The
traveler often paused to admire the symmetry and
simple elegance of the building, and the quiet
repose
of the shades that imbosomed it.
There, still in those habits of rural industry which
promote and preserve health, but in the enjoyment
of all the leisure they could desire, and which they
so well knew how to render improving both to
themselves
and others, their time passed in felicity and in
love. The lady of the cottage, as years flowed on,
delighted more and more in the society of the young
of her own sex, because she felt that it was in her
power to do them good. The inhabitants of the
village
,
knowing that she had enjoyed the advantages
of a superior education, were anxious that such of
their daughters as had attained sufficient age to
appreciate
its value, should profit by intercourse with
her. Yielding to their solicitations, she consented
to give them regular instruction in the studies and
accomplishments that were to her familiar. Four
afternoons in the week, she saw her parlor
pleasantly
filled with the bright faces of the young whom
she loved, and by whom she was beloved in return.
While imparting to their docile minds the healthful
aliment of knowledge, she was sometimes led
silently
to contrast the pure, unostentatious pleasure which
she thus enjoyed, with that period of wasting
excitement
when the splendor of her dress, or the elegance
of her entertainments, won the adulation of a
heartless
throng, she herself wearied and ill content with a
profitless existence. Striving to prepare her pupils
for the faithful and graceful discharge of every
feminine
duty, she earnestly impressed those precepts
of morality and piety, whose sustaining influences
she had from her youth experienced. Some of her
favorite lessons were, that there may be happiness,
respectability, and influence, without wealth; that
the pursuit of it, as the main object of life, is
mistaken
and dangerous; that all expenditure beyond
income
is injustice; and that to live in luxury upon
the property of others, withheld from them against
their will, and to their inconvenience or suffering,
is a sin against conscience, of which no consistent
Christian could be guilty. Pay your debts, my
dear young friends, she would say, and when you
have husbands, do not lead them into extravagance,
but be their helpers.
The good she accomplished, and the affection she
acquired by her judicious labors as a teacher, could
not be bounded by this fleeting existence. And as
the husband and wife, arm in arm, walked, at the
close of day, around the grounds, which every year
became more beautiful, they said to each other,
How much higher enjoyment have we here found
than great riches, with their cares and dangers, could
have afforded; and how superior is the quiet rest of
an approving heart to the pursuit of those shadows
which the gay world calls happiness.
A a 2
THE LOST CHILDREN.
I ask the moon, so sadly fair,
The night's cold breath through shadows drawn,
Where are they who were mine? and where?'
A void but answers, `All are gone.'
Miss H. F. Gould
.
There
was sickness in the dwelling of the
emigrant
.
Stretched upon his humble bed, he depended
on that nursing care which a wife, scarcely less
enfeebled
than himself, was able to bestow. A child,
in its third summer, had been recently laid to its last
rest beneath a turf mound under their window. Its
image was in the heart of the mother, as she
tenderly
ministered to her husband.
Wife, I am afraid I think too much about poor
little Thomas. He was so well and rosy when we
left our old home scarcely a year since. Sometimes
I feel, if we had but continued there, our darling
would not have died.
The tear which had long trembled, and been
repressed
by the varieties of conjugal solicitude, burst
forth at these words. It freely overflowed the
brimming
eyes, and relieved the suffocating emotions
which had striven for the mastery.
Do not reproach yourself, dear husband. His
time had come. He is happier there than here.
Let us be thankful for those that are spared.
It seems to me that the little girls are growing
pale. I am afraid you confine them too closely to
this narrow house, and to the sight of sickness. The
weather is growing settled. You had better send
them out to change the air, and run about at their
will. Mary, lay the baby on the bed by me, and ask
mother to let little sister and you go out for a
ramble
.
The mother assented, and the children, who were
four and six years old, departed full of delight. A
clearing had been made in front of their habitation,
and, by ascending a knoll in its vicinity, another
dwelling might be seen, environed with the dark
spruce and hemlock. In the rear of these houses
was a wide expanse of ground, interspersed with
thickets, rocky acclivities, and patches of forest trees,
while far away one or two lakelets peered up, with
their blue eyes deeply fringed. The spirits of the
children, as they entered this uninclosed region, were
like those of the birds that surrounded them. They
playfully pursued each other with merry laughter,
and such a joyous sense of liberty as makes the blood
course lightsomely through the veins.
Little Jane, let us go farther than ever we have
before. We will see what lies beyond those high
hills, for it is but just past noon, and we can get back
long before supper-time.
Oh! yes, let us follow that bright bluebird, and
see what he is flying after. But don't go in among
those briers that tear the clothes so, for mother has
no time to mend them.
Sister, sweet sister, here are some snow-drops in
this green hollow, exactly like those in my old, dear
garden so far away. How pure they are, and cool,
just like the baby's face, when the wind blows on it!
Father and mother will like us to bring them some.
Filling their little aprons with the spoil, and still
searching for something new or beautiful, they
prolonged
their ramble, unconscious of the flight of time,
or the extent of space they were traversing. At
length, admonished by the chilliness, which often
marks the declining hours of the early days of
Spring, they turned their course homeward. But
the returning clew was lost, and they walked rapidly,
only to plunge more inextricably in the mazes of the
wilderness.
Sister Mary, are these pretty snow-drops good to
eat? I am
so
hungry, and my feet ache, and will
not go.
Let me lift you over this brook, little Jane, and
hold tighter by my hand, and walk as brave as you
can, that we may get home, and help mother set the
table.
We won't go so far the next time, will we?
What is the reason that I can not see any better?
Is not that the roof of our house, dear Jane, and
the thin smoke curling up among the trees? Many
times before have I thought so, and found it only a
rock or a mist.
As evening drew its veil, the hapless wanderers,
bewildered, hurried to and fro, calling for their
parents
,
or shouting for help, until their strength was
exhausted. Torn by brambles, and their poor feet
bleeding from the rocks which strewed their path,
then sunk down, moaning bitterly. The fears that
overpower the heart of a timid child who for the
first time finds night approaching, without shelter or
protection, wrought on the youngest to insupportable
anguish. The elder, filled with the sacred warmth
of sisterly affection, after the first paroxysms of grief,
seemed to forget herself, and sitting upon the damp
ground, and folding the little one in her arms, rocked
her with a gentle movement, soothing and hushing
her like a nursling.
Don't cry! oh! don't cry so, dearest; say your
prayers, and fear will fly away.
How can I kneel down here in the dark woods,
or say my prayers, when mother is not by to hear
me? I think I see a large wolf, with sharp ears, and
a mouth wide open, and hear noises as of many fierce
lions growling.
Dear little Jane, do say, `Our Father, who art
in heaven.' Be a good girl, and, when we have
rested here a while, perhaps He may be pleased to
send some one to find us, and to fetch us home.
Harrowing was the anxiety in the lowly hut of the
emigrant when day drew toward its close, and the
children came not. A boy, their sole assistant in the
toils of agriculture, at his return from labor, was sent
in search of them, but in vain. As evening drew on,
the inmates of the neighboring house, and those of
a small hamlet at considerable distance, were
alarmed
,
and associated in the pursuit. The agony of the
invalid parents through that night was
uncontrollable
;
starting at every footstep, shaping out of every
breeze the accents of the lost ones returning, or their
cries of misery. While the morning was yet gray,
the father, no longer to be restrained, and armed
with supernatural strength, went forth, amid the
ravings
of his fever, to take part in the pursuit. With
fiery cheeks, his throbbing head bound with a
handkerchief
,
he was seen in the most dangerous and
inaccessible
spotscavernsravinesbeetling cliffs
leading the way to every point of peril, in the
phrensy
of grief and disease.
The second night drew on, with one of those
sudden
storms of sleet and snow, which sometimes chill
the hopes of the young Spring. Then was a sadder
sighta woman with attenuated form, flying she
knew not whither, and continually exclaiming, My
children! my children! It was fearful to see a
creature so deadly pale, with the darkness of
midnight
about her. She heeded no advice to take care
of herself, nor persuasion to return to her home.
They call me! Let me go! I will lay them in
their bed myself. How cold their feet are! What!
is Jane singing her nightly hymn without me? No!
no! She cries! Some evil serpent has stung her;
and, shrieking wildly, the poor mother disappeared,
like a hunted deer, in the depths of the forest.
Oh! might she but have wrapped them in her arms,
as they shivered in their dismal recess, under the
roots of a tree uptorn by some wintery tempest! Yet
how could she imagine the spot where they lay, or
believe that those little wearied limbs had borne
them, through bog and bramble, more than six miles
from the parental door? In the niche which we
have mentioned, a faint moaning sound might still
be heard.
Sister, do not tell me that we shall never see the
baby any more. I see it now, and Thomas too!
dear Thomas! Why do they say he died and was
buried? He is close by me, just above my head.
There are many more babies with hima host.
They glide by me as if they had wings. They look
warm and happy. I should be glad to be with them,
and join their beautiful plays. But O, how cold I
am! Cover me close, Mary. Take my head into
your bosom.
Pray do not go to sleep quite yet, dear Jane. I
want to hear your voice, and talk with you. It is so
very sad to be waking here alone. If I could but
see your face when you are asleep, it would be a
comfort. But it is so dark,
so dark!
Rousing herself with difficulty, she unties her
apron, and spreads it over the head of the child, to
protect it from the driving snow; she pillows the
cold cheek on her breast, and grasps more firmly
the benumbed hand by which she had so faithfully
led her, through all their terrible pilgrimage. There
they are! One moves not. The other keeps vigil,
feebly giving utterance, at intervals, to a low,
suffocating
spasm from a throat dried with hunger.
19 B b
Once more she leans upon her elbow, to look on the
face of the little one, for whom as a mother she has
cared. With love strong as death, she comforts
herself
that her sister slumbers calmly, because the
stroke of the destroyer has silenced her sobbings.
Ah! why came ye not hither, torches that gleam
through the wilderness, and men who shout to each
other? why came ye not this way? See! they plunge
into morasses, they cut their path through tangled
thickets, they ford waters, they ascend mountains,
they explore forestsbut the lost are not found!
The third and fourth nights come and depart.
Still the woods are filled with eager searchers.
Sympathy
has gathered them from remote settlements.
Every log-cabin sends forth what it can spare for this
work of pity and of sorrow. They cross each other's
track. Incessantly they interrogate and reply, but
in vain. The lost are not found!
In her mournful dwelling, the mother sat
motionless
.
Her infant was upon her lap. The strong duty
to succor its helplessness, grappled with the might of
grief and prevailed. Her eyes were riveted upon
its brow. No sound passed her white lips. Pitying
women, from distant habitations, gathered around
and wept for her. They even essayed some words
of consolation. But she answered nothing. She
looked not toward them. She had no ear for human
voices. In her soul was the perpetual cry of the lost.
Nothing overpowered it, but the wail of her living
babe. She ministered to its necessities, and that
Heaven-inspired impulse saved her. She had no
longer
any hope for those who had wandered away.
Horrid images were in her fancythe ravening beast
black pits of stagnant waterbirds of fierce beak
venomous, coiling snakes. She bowed herself down
to them, and travailed as in the birth-hour, fearfully
and in silence. But the helpless babe on her bosom
touched an electric chord, and saved her from
despair
.
Maternal love, with its pillar of cloud and of
flame, guided her through the desert, that she
perished
not.
Sunday came, and the search was unabated. It
seemed only marked by a deeper tinge of
melancholy
.
The most serious felt it fitting to go forth at
that sacred season to seek the lost, though not, like
their Master, girded with the power to save.
Parents
remembered that it might have been their own
little ones who had thus strayed from the fold, and
with their gratitude took a portion of the mourner's
spirit into their hearts. Even the sad hope of
gathering
the dead for the sepulchre, the sole hope that
now sustained their toil, began to fade into doubt.
As they climbed over huge trees, which the winds of
winter had prostrated, or forced their way among
rending brambles, sharp rocks, and close-woven
branches, they marveled how such fragile forms could
have endured hardships by which the vigor of
manhood
was impeded and perplexed.
The echo of a gun rang suddenly through the
forest
.
It was repeated. Hill to hill bore the thrilling
message. It was the concerted signal that their
anxieties
were ended. The hurrying seekers followed
its sound. From a commanding cliff a white flag
was seen to float. It was the herald that the lost
were found.
There they werenear the base of a wooded
hilloc
,
half cradled among the roots of an uptorn
chestnut
.
There they lay, cheek to cheek, hand clasped
in hand. The blasts had mingled in one mesh their
disheveled locks, for they had left home with their
poor heads uncovered. The youngest had passed
away in sleep. There was no contortion on her
brow, though her features were sunk and sharpened
by famine.
The elder had borne a deeper and longer anguish.
Her eyes were open, as though she had watched till
death came; watched over that little one, for whom,
through those days and nights of terror, she had cared
and sorrowed like a mother. Strong and rugged men
shed tears when they saw she had wrapped her in
her own scanty apron, and striven with her
embracing
arms to preserve the warmth of vitality, even
after the cherished spirit had fled away. The glazed
eyeballs were strained, as if, to the last, they had
been gazing for her father's roof, or the wreath of
smoke that should guide her there.
Sweet sisterly love! so patient in all adversity, so
faithful unto the end, found it not a Father's house,
where it might enter with the little one, and be
sundered
no more? Found it not a fold whence no lamb
can wander and be lost? a mansion where there is
no death, neither sorrow nor crying? Forgot it not
all its sufferings for joy at that dear Redeemer's
welcome
,
which, in its cradle, it had been taught to lisp
Suffer little children to come unto me, and forbid
them not, for of such is the kingdom of Heaven.
THE END.